Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
1
After the Oracle
by Shane Anderson
One does not need to imagine that lemon􀀀 one needs to discover it – Jack Spicer
I. Some Starters
II. Joy
III. Mindfulness
IV. Compassion
V. Competition
VI. Beginning, Again
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
2
Some Starters
Basketball is humiliating. In any given play, you might get hit with a back
screen, leaving you bottled up, confused. Or you might get switched onto a
bigger opponent who will feast on your smaller body, backing you down
into the paint, dunking all over your face. Or you might dribble the ball off
your foot or forget the second or third option of a play. Or even worse, you
might get “nutmegged.” The ball might be bounced between your spread
legs and while everyone praises your opponent’s craftiness, you are once
again flatfooted, caught in a web of reflections about your posture and foot
positioning. It can be rather discouraging.
But then􀀀 “basketball is about getting embarrassed.” Kevin Durant
was not saying this to console me. It was not at some basketball camp
where weekend warriors like yours truly attend to get better. Durant’s
words are a reminder to his colleagues. There is no such thing as a perfect
game or a perfect player – everyone has been dunked on or has missed an
easy layup. Even in statistically flawless games there are unnecessary
passes, missed assignments, silly fouls. The important thing is to keep
playing. Durant’s words, then, are also a challenge. You are supposed to get
embarrassed when you play basketball. You have to challenge the dunk
attempt of your opponent. You cannot worry about “getting put on a
poster.”
We must be willing to be humiliated while renouncing the word
humiliation. We must give our full effort and despise the fear of failure,
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
3
making a vow with ourselves to never relinquish our lives to mere
contingencies, imagined to be inevitabilities. This is what I took from
Durant’s tangential rant in a larger diatribe against the “blog boys” who
endlessly quantify professional basketball, preferring a “flawed” set of
metrics to the drama of watching a forty􀀀eight minute game. What is much
more important than Effective Field Goal Percentage for Durant is the
lived experience. This is because there is potential for a transformative
experience that goes beyond any potential number crunching. Watching
the game can be as good as attending a preacher’s sermon. You can feel
galvanized, excited, tingly. And this should not be underrated. As Durant
said in his 2014 MVP speech, “basketball is just a platform for me to inspire
people.”
Watching Durant play around 100 games in each of the last three
seasons since he joined the Golden State Warriors, I can attest to being
inspired by his crossovers and dunks and fade􀀀away jumpers – and
especially by his pull􀀀up transition threes from the wing. There is an
elegance to his game that touches my aesthetic sensibility much more than
art expresses disdain for the audience. It has taken years for me to realize
this but an artist does not need to be “challenging” – i.e. purposefully
difficult and􀀀or confrontational. An artist can instead elevate higher by
digging deeper, into and beyond the self, with everyone holding their
breath, in the stands, together.
This has been another reason why watching my childhood team, the
Golden State Warriors, move from a low􀀀key NBA League Pass favorite in
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
4
2013 to an established dynasty has been endlessly electrifying. The
Warriors have won three􀀀􀀀􀀀 championships in the past five years by
playing some of the most beautiful and inspired basketball I have ever seen
and they have achieved individual and team heights like no group of
individuals has done before them. As impressive as this is, it is the way in
which they have done this that is truly inspiring and transformative, that
borders on the unnamable.
There is a phrase favored by mystics to explain the divine order of
the universe􀀀 as above, so below. The idea is that there are
correspondences and synchronicities between the astral plane and the
world we live in􀀀 what happens in the one happens in the other. Another
way this can be read is that the nature of the universe can be found within
the individual. One only needs to dig deep enough into one’s own soul to
discover the divine reality. Or it can also be interpreted with regards to
organizations – whether that be familial, political or occupational. What
happens at the top, happens at the bottom and vice versa. The phrase
certainly explains the correspondences between the Warriors team
members and their head coach Steve Kerr, who led the team to a
championship his first year at the wheel and who embodies the same
qualities he has established as the four core values of the team􀀀 joy,
mindfulness, compassion and competition.
And so􀀀 as above, so below. In what follows, I have unpacked these
four core values, showing what they mean in the context of the team while
also allowing myself to be inspired by their example. This book, then, is not
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
5
a team history, a biography of Kerr or the other Warriors’ players or even a
document of the last five seasons in Oracle Arena. It is rather an
experiment in living that has gone beyond these pages with results that
have often been embarrassing. But that’s what it’s about.
Durant’s words have inspired me. They have become an affirmation
to be repeated and re􀀀encoded so that they no longer have anything to do
with basketball on the surface. This may seem like a big leap but it should
be remembered who Durant was speaking to. He was on the Bill Simmons
Podcast and Simmons had written a history of the game, The Book of
Basketball, based on a ranking of players where the deciding factor between
seemingly equal players was not statistics but whether the players
understood “the secret” to basketball􀀀 “the secret to basketball is that it is
not about basketball.” It’s about being in the world.
And so, the Warriors have now left the Oracle Arena, a place they
played for 47 years. Much will change after the move to San Francisco. But
we will always have the WAAAAARRRRIOORRRS chant and RUN TMC, We
Believe, the Super Villains, and even Jim Barnett. I have listened to the
oracle and I will follow whatever comes next.
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
6
Joy
My sister’s getting the health care she needs and my mother’s no longer
living on the streets. Bitte􀀀 Please􀀀 Excuse me, I know. That could have
been more graceful. It could have used some padding between the clauses,
some form of explanation. But as I sat on a park bench on Fasanenplatz,
glowing, I was oblivious to any incredulity, except, of course, I wasn’t. The
woman sitting next to me had asked about my family, hadn’t she􀀀 And I
had tried to explain the changes America was undergoing with experiences
I knew, right􀀀 It wasn’t my intention to shock her. Like I said, I was happy. I
was happy my family was receiving the services they need. I did say I was
happy, didn’t I􀀀 Excuse me, I… After this outburst though, she didn’t want
to hear any more. She was staring at me as if I were a madman. And… What
could be more depressing􀀀 That she didn’t believe me􀀀 Or that now my
reasons to be happy are being threatened by the new administration􀀀 Or
worse􀀀 that happiness and luck are practically indistinguishable. You don’t
believe me􀀀 Look it up in the dictionary. While used differently, Glück,
which was the word hovering over both of our heads, means both happiness
and luck. And this isn’t some German perversion. The cognate for
happiness is luck in every Indo􀀀European language. The heur in bonheur is
salvaged from the Old French for luck, and English happiness comes from
the Old Norse hap for – you guessed it – luck. Chaucer􀀀 “Thus kan Fortune
hir wheel governe and gye, 􀀀 And out of joye brynge men to sorwe.” Translation􀀀
our happenstance and hence our happiness are dictated by the wheel of
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
7
fortune. We forfeit our joy, which is only an extreme form of happiness, to
the casino floor, the roulette wheel or craps table, and that inalienable right
of the American Constitution to pursue happiness has bad odds, high
stakes, and payment in steak dinners at a restaurant you’d never want to
eat at anyway. Please􀀀
Modern English has made its Old Norse origins subterranean in
comparison to German’s birch􀀀like surface roots snaking along the mossy
floor of the forest, yet we still live as if happiness is conditional in English􀀀
that it hinges on whatever follows the relative pronoun or preposition􀀀 I
am happy that 􀀀􀀀􀀀􀀀􀀀 or, I am happy for 􀀀􀀀􀀀􀀀􀀀 etc. And long before I spoke
about my happiness to this complete stranger on a June afternoon in
Wilmersdorf, I had learned to believe that joy was nothing more than a
category of snapshots to be bought from Shutterstock or a morsel sold with
a jingle. Although both subscribed to effervescent forms of happiness, this
belief didn’t come from my culture or upbringing. It sprung from my
studies of “the most noble discipline,” where I learned that philosophy’s
principle goal is to learn how to perish. My cumbersome, life􀀀sapping
student debt may be testament to my investment in this pursuit but I
confess I never found a compelling answer to these fundamental questions
in analytic philosophy’s acrobatics of necessary and sufficient conditions
for things as simple as walking to the bathroom. More discouraging than
investing years in the baroque rabbit holes of modal logic and JTB􀀀 􀀀don’t
look it up􀀀 was that analytic philosophy never offered any alternatives to
them and insisted that once we die we’re only dust and bones. If living
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
8
meant being busy with such loveless schemes in preparation for a death
that was final and without reward, I began to wonder􀀀 where did we go
wrong􀀀 Shouldn’t we prepare ourselves to die by living􀀀 And􀀀 whatever
happened to happiness􀀀 Did the lake dry up􀀀 Was it drained􀀀 I thought this
was a protected forest􀀀
It wasn’t. We cleared it away. When􀀀 Sometime after Aristotle had
said, “happiness is a life lived according to virtue.” Now we dodge between
the stumps of Theodor Adorno’s “there is no right life in the wrong” and
forage for gobs of luck. Even worse􀀀 if Adorno is right, then it had never
been any better. Slavery permeated every ancient culture and the
American Dream was the privilege of slaveholders. As such, it seemed easy
to give in to evil if you wanted to be happy. It was as inevitable as a black
hole. So, I dyed my hair black and listened to The Cure’s Pornography,
repeated its “it doesn’t matter if we all die,” dreamed of smoking cloves. I
concluded􀀀 it was not wrong to live wrongly. It would be unjust of a deity,
should there be one, to punish me, a fallible being, for acting terribly down
here in the muck. How can I be to blame for what I could never know􀀀 As
for happiness􀀀 a total bluff. This, of course, was before my regrets began to
pile up and I began to lose faith in this faithlessness. I began to dream of
finding an operating manual for life on planet Earth, a golden tome giving
instructions for adversity. I hoped there would be an appendix in this
booklet about what to do in an emergency, a crash landing, a burn the body
would not return from. I turned back to what philosophy denied, a life
beyond dust and bones. I read the Bible and couldn’t get past the begetting.
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
9
The lists of generations didn’t help me to get rid of that sick feeling. Which
I needed. Desperately. Most of all, I needed to cut my hair. Everyone
together􀀀 Please􀀀
But wait. What was it I had learned again about the wager with God􀀀
Oh, right􀀀 why not believe􀀀 You’ve got nothing to lose if you do and you’re
wrong, and everything if you don’t and you’re wrong. Ha􀀀 What rational
gambling􀀀 Card counting􀀀 As for happiness􀀀 Next question􀀀
I refused to give up. For all those years, beyond it being absurd. What
was that definition of insanity again􀀀 Doing the same thing over and over
and expecting different results􀀀 It sounds familiar. Perhaps happiness
needs different tactics then. Perhaps it needs to be approached like a battle.
Maybe we should go to war with that which oppresses us and bars the door
to fulfillment and pleasure. But how many survive such a mutiny􀀀 And how
many survivors require medication after the trauma of warfare􀀀 Could it be
that Aristotle was right􀀀 That happiness is not rebellious but mundane􀀀
Does that take luck to find􀀀
I picked up the phone, called an old professor, decided to give it
another go. I wanted to know if there was a definition of joy that was
applicable given our conditions. After catching up, this ancient Greek
expert laughed at my questions. “Some things never change,” he said. Fine
then. Perhaps I should get a second opinion, I said. From where􀀀 An
alternative practitioner. Long drawn out sigh from said professor. He
repeated what he had told me before. “It’s not about getting answers, it’s
about asking the right questions.” Is wanting to be happy a bad question􀀀 It
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
10
isn’t even a question. I guess philosophy is no help then. More laughter.
Good luck and goodbye. The next morning, I got a number from a friend.172
by Emily Dickinson􀀀
‘T is so much joy􀀀 ‘T is so much joy􀀀
If I should fail, what poverty􀀀
And yet, as poor as I
Have ventured all upon a throw􀀀
Have gained􀀀 Yes􀀀 Hesitated so –
This side the victory􀀀
Life is but Life􀀀 And Death, but Death􀀀
Bliss is, but Bliss, and Breath but Breath􀀀
And if I indeed fail,
At least, to know the worst, is sweet􀀀
Defeat means nothing but Defeat,
No drearier, can befall􀀀
And if I gain􀀀 Oh Gun at Sea􀀀
Oh Bells, that in the Steeples be􀀀
At first, repeat it slow􀀀
For Heaven is a different thing,
Conjectured, and waked sudden in –
And might extinguish me􀀀
This was great􀀀 But wait􀀀 What about that stutter step in the definition of
bliss􀀀 It seems to be infected with desperation􀀀 Then there’s the end, which
seems to be no better than Chaucer’s wheel of fortune. Heaven might not
only brynge me to sorwe but also destroy me􀀀 I was back at contingency.
And gloom. I felt very near what I was trying to leave. It gave me the
creeps.
Fast􀀀forward for the sake of mercy. To not have to watch years of
senseless, brain damaging repetition. Today I know I condemned every
grape for the hangover it might contain – then drank the wine anyway.
Through a slow process of anamnesis, I was able to discover what every
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
11
child already knows. Joy is not a noun. It’s in the verb. It wasn’t rereading
philosophy that taught this to me, it was my mother and a 6’3” reserve
guard turned head coach named Steve Kerr.
Sidelined from his team’s historic start to the 2015–16 season by a
botched back surgery, Kerr visited the Golden State Warriors practice
facility in November 2015 to talk to the team and interim head coach Luke
Walton about the state of things. The Warriors had just won sixteen games
in a row and Kerr was proud of their performance in his absence. Not
because they were winning, which was great of course, but because they
were executing according to his four core values. The first of them􀀀 Joy.
Please􀀀 You heard me. Kerr wants his team to be happy. He wants them to
have fun and enjoy what they’re doing. Not only because they’re privileged
to be earning more money yearly than the average American will in a
lifetime – which they are 􀀀even the Warriors’ superstar point guard
Stephen Curry said in 2016 that if he were ever to complain about making
􀀀11 million a year, which was “cheap” for what he brings to the team in
terms of revenue, then his problems would be bigger than money􀀀 NB􀀀 he
now makes much more after a contract extension in 2017􀀀 – but because
they are able to do what they love and they should love what they do􀀀 both
on and off the court. As already implied, the team had listened. They
adopted this value individually and as a whole and they implement it, for
instance, by having music blast during practice. They are there to work and
to have fun. It’s a game after all. The result of playing joyfully was not only
the best record in NBA history for the start of a season 􀀀24 W – 0 L􀀀. Their
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
12
joy created more joy. For the team members and for all of us. It was
something so remarkable that even news agencies like the Guardian that
had never consistently written about basketball began covering them. No
one could help but write about the Warriors in wonder and it became a
feedback loop we could all tune into. The Warriors eventually lost, yet the
joy continued. Months later, when Steph Curry pulled up from half court
against the Oklahoma City Thunder to win in overtime on February 27,
2016, for instance, I was ecstatic. The team was ecstatic. Even opposing and
bandwagon Warriors fans in attendance in Oklahoma City were. We had all
just witnessed something incredible. So incredible, in fact, that it’s worth
looking at.
With the game tied at 118 after the Thunder’s Russell Westbrook
missed a contested shot, the Warriors’ Andre Iguodala secures the
rebound. There are 6.8 seconds on the clock and Iguodala passes the ball to
Curry. Curry, almost casually, brings the ball to the half court line, and, out
of nowhere, enters his shooting motion. With two steps, he crouches and
shoots a shot defying all conventional wisdom. He is wide open, yes, but no
one shoots from that distance with that much time on the clock 􀀀3.4
seconds􀀀. No one “settles” for such a shot when your team still has a
timeout like the Warriors did. A heave like this is reserved for the final
tenths of a second. This was why the Thunder defender, Andre Roberson,
was not there to block it. He was hovering, wisely, around the three􀀀point
line where it could be expected Curry would approach and shoot from – if
he didn’t call a timeout. The problem is that Curry has changed the
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
13
dimensions of the game, forcing us to redefine our ideas about shot
selection and solid defense. His release is so quick and his aim is so
accurate that, statistically, a contested deep three is a layup for him. And
this shot certainly looked as easy as a lay􀀀in. After the ball went through
the net, Curry tied the record for the most threes in a single game 􀀀a record
he would break the next season􀀀 and broke his own record for most threes
made in a season with another month and a half remaining. While Curry
danced and the rest of the squad celebrated, I was covering my mouth,
trying to not wake up my neighbors. I couldn’t believe it. I was insanely
happy and not only because my childhood team had finally pulled out of
the decades of doldrums, they were doing something incredible and they
were having a lot of fun doing it. Game after game, we all kept cycling
through it. It was like cicadas waking up in the forest after years of staying
subterranean, dormant. It was even more than a preposition or
conjunction. That night, I realized what Donna Haraway, the feminist
theorist and daughter of a sportswriter, meant when she said joy is the
“eternal suspension of time, a high of ‘getting it’ together in action.”
Which is where we reach the chicken and the egg. Some might say
the Warriors wouldn’t be happy if they hadn’t won the championship the
season before, that joy is dependant on victory. This won’t do. The value of
joy had been instated the day Kerr took the job of head coach. Instead, it’s
like what William James said. There are “cases where a fact cannot come at
all unless a preliminary faith exists in its coming.” If we learned to live as if
joy were already present and not contingent on success then the weird
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
14
thing is that the championship, “the ring,” is more likely to come. As the
Warriors teach, the trophy is yours if you learn to have fun in the daily
grind. If it does, your happiness will only be briefly increased by it. Joy
cannot be dependent on results. It must be its own reward. The one catch is
you can’t trick yourself and pretend to believe. There can be no rational
gambling. You actually have to. It’s so simple, insane even, and it actually
works. This doesn’t mean that everything will work to your advantage
through belief alone. It needs hard work too. Even then you might fail.
Though the Warriors had a superlative bursting 2015–16 season, they lost in
the Finals to LeBron James and the Cleveland Cavaliers in the final seconds
of Game 7. Still, joy is the first, most crucial step. And this seems applicable
off the court as well.
At the same time I was following the start of the 2015–16 NBA season,
my mother was finalizing the paperwork for her third attempt at a
disability claim. She had been denied twice before for very questionable
reasons, yet she never gave up. She followed up with the doctors and
psychologists, delivered their reports to pro bono lawyers and was early for
every court appearance. She had high spirits whenever we talked although
she was living on the streets of San Luis Obispo, California. She would
report about her daily comings and goings and we had finally developed
some rapport after a decade of estrangement. Previously, I had been
enraged or disengaged on those rare occasions we spoke, reserved for
holidays or emergencies. I would try to give advice about finding an
apartment, a job or maintaining friendships but these finer details got lost
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
15
in our battles about accountability, about who ruined whom and how they
weren’t sorry but would be. There was often rage in her voice as well as
desperation. There was also an occasional slur, and when that happened
her threats to commit suicide were threats as often as not. When they
weren’t and she survived, I became acquainted with a whole new
vocabulary of hospitals and law enforcement. There was the 5150, the NFA,
the BOP and their consequences. There were dropped charges and storage
units and new numbers. There were the years of absolute silence. The last
time I saw her before I spoke to this German woman was when I visited her
one Christmas Day and she was drunk and alone in her mother’s house in
South Lake Tahoe, where she was living at the time. She was saying that
everyone had abandoned her except me and that she had repaid the favor
by taking care of me in the hospital after my spinal fusion in 2005. She
talked about how the catheter band had slipped below my knee and yanked
on my urethra when I was unconscious but in pain and how she had held
my grown penis in her hands, which she described in detail. She then said I
was the only good man in her life and tried to kiss me with her tongue. I left
immediately and later heard that she had fallen down the stairs, into the
snow, and was found by the neighbors, near hypothermia I was told. She
didn’t stay there very long. She kept moving. For years when I never
bothered to write down the address of where she was staying because a
letter would never arrive in time. She’d already be gone. To the next town
where no one could harass her. To the next place, away from some
malignant family member. To some mythical land where she could start all
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
16
over. This felt familiar. I too had left El Dorado County to find a new land
of gold in Germany until I finally settled into reality. Also in Germany.
As my mom’s physical mobility declined in San Luis Obispo, she
experienced a heightened sense of liberty. Her back problems – which are
inoperable, unlike mine or Steve Kerr’s – caused her a lot of pain and still
do yet she was no longer asking for a handout, a divine retribution for the
numerous injustices she had experienced at the hands of men. Her
assuredly justified rage inside her had subsided. It had proven itself to be a
bad strategy. What was done was done and what could be done – now that
was exciting􀀀 She could help others without residence get off the bottle by
listening to them. She could talk to the librarian about crystals and get
more reading material. She could listen to the shelter’s acclaimed street
preacher and see scripture from the eyes of people like her. She could help
with the distribution of meals and get to know the volunteers when
receiving her pain medication. She could walk in the sun in February and
smile. She could eternally suspend time, in action.
One morning, when she was on the way to her social worker, I called
her as she was getting on the bus and she greeted a couple of people. It
sounds like you’ve got a lot of friends, I said. And some enemies, she said,
but whatever. She laughed. I laughed as well. I tried to picture who these
enemies were, whether they were the ones she had greeted. It was then that
I first noticed my mother had become much happier since she was
definitively homeless. Sure, she hadn’t had her own apartment or a bank
account for a decade but she had always stayed with family members and
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
17
entered a complicated economics of gratitude and obligation. A mental
reckoning of indebtedness tallied out in beds and groceries and
accusations. As the eldest daughter who had continuously been raped by
her father, she felt entitled to receive help from her mother and two
younger sisters who had always been aware of his transgressions. She felt
entitled to receive occasional payment from my father after he had
lowballed her during their divorce proceedings. And she was. When he lost
basically everything during the financial crisis, she reconsidered. She
reconsidered accepting my offers to help her get off the streets as well and
denied my offers to fly her over to Germany. She asked for only one thing􀀀
love.
Now on the streets for an extended period of time, she was changing.
It would be foolish to believe this cheer had anything to do with luck. Her
luck couldn’t have been any worse􀀀 At the bottom of society, she had lost
everything, repeatedly, and had found something more valuable. If this is
luck, it is the luck of discovering what was already there. That rage towards
the past only clouds the present and disallows a better future. Some might
object that they know this from somewhere. It’s a cliché, they’ll say. It’s in
some film. Maybe it is. Maybe once you “lose it all” you realize there was
nothing much to lose. Or maybe – and I find this much more compelling –
she had learned that everything depends on your attitude. Our family
motto, inherited from our Georgian Molokan ancestors 􀀀an Eastern
Orthodox sect that was thoroughly defiant to authority figures􀀀 has always
been􀀀 “the only person you can change is yourself.” It was our secret family
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
18
wisdom that none of us bothered to listen to. Whenever things got tough,
though, one of us would repeat it. Out on the streets of San Luis Obispo,
my mom seemed to finally be getting it. Instead of seeing life as a challenge,
even though it was challenging, she laughed as she went from homeless
shelter to library to social worker to doctor to library to lawyer to church
to shelter. She was doing something. The only thing I hate is boredom, she
once told me. This seemed right. My mom was relearning the joy of doing
and I was relearning with and from her – and from Coach Kerr as well.
As Kerr stated in an interview with the Positive Coaching Alliance,
“we’re all in the development business.” And we are. In the time between
now and my conversation with the elder German woman on the park
bench, my mom has lost the roof over her head and is homeless again.
She’s spending time at a shelter in Chico, California but she hasn’t lost her
determination. For a while, she had tried to help my sister. They had lived
together to get my sister to come to terms with her panic disorder. It didn’t
work. Cue up our old Georgian wisdom. Cue up the will to believe. My mom
is lucky to finally receive social security and to have the chance to get on
some housing listings in a culture that doesn’t see shelter as an inalienable
right and I am happy that she won’t always have to walk on the streets all
day in pain. This is what I was trying to tell the elder German woman on the
park bench and this hasn’t changed even though her situation has changed
again. I hope it will soon change for the better but there are no guarantees.
It will take some work. It will take some luck too. What I am trying to
intimate here, however, is that her happiness is not dependent on this and
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
19
neither is mine. I am happy to be on the miserable planet, working to end
suffering, believing this can be done together. I cross my fingers my sister
will fully realize this as well. That she will find the high of getting it right.
Together we will. All she needs is to want to. She says she’s trying. And I
believe her. But like I once told her and will now tell you, dear reader􀀀 “not
to get all Yoda on you but there is no try, do.”
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
20
Mindfulness
Let’s say you were right. If you lasered your eyes, your life would be better.
You would no longer stumble through entrances or rooms when your
lenses fogged up in winter and there would be no awkward encounters at
the pool when you mistook someone for another. You said it again. If you
had the cash, you’d fix your astigmatism. Then you’d buy supplies, a
generator and a gun as well as some property in Brandenburg, away from
the coast and the city. With your new eyes, you would be able to read the
amount of protein on a can of your stockpiled chili without squinting and
you’d never be distracted by reflections whenever you emptied cartridges
into a silhouette at the range on the weekend. You’d even consider getting
a dog, for companionship and protection. At night and in the forest, full of
wild boars and nocturnal marauders, another set of optics would be crucial.
An emergency protocol set off within me. Little bells and flashing
imagery. We had been talking about the prospect of a cataclysm in St.
George’s English Bookshop, my place of employment, but I didn’t expect to
hear you were gaining experience with weapons. Was this still in the
hypothetical􀀀 A mental gymnastics performed out of boredom􀀀 The
specificity was telling. It felt like an annoyance that could only come from
repetitions, at a shooting range – where􀀀 – here in Berlin􀀀 I was worried but
this worry got stuck in my shoulders. They were tightening with negative
energy. The nerve endings in my right trapezius, levator scapulae and
deltoid were on fire and my proximal interphalangeal joint on my right
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
21
middle finger needed to be cracked, desperately. That and I needed a
cigarette. No. I didn’t. Stop it. I needed to breathe. Breathe. I did. And as I
simulated the warm sensation of inhaling smoke, the emergency beacon’s
redness strobed slower inside me. I turned my head, right then left and
right then left, then rotated my wrist to release the tension in my elbow.
I played stupid.
If doomsday did come and you survived, I asked, cracking my
knuckles, wouldn’t your vision be clouded over by the implications􀀀 I
mean, wouldn’t it be wrong for the rich to survive just because of their
money􀀀 Whatever, you said, quoting Brecht, “erst kommt das Fressen, dann
kommt die Moral.” You smiled wryly. It was an old joke between us that
wasn’t funny. I turned around to rearrange some books on the reserve shelf
behind me as a sleight of hand, a distraction from my real motivation, to
breathe again, deeper and with purpose. Which worked for about two and a
half seconds. My mind raced ahead of me. I needed a cigarette and you
were accusing me of something – that was clear through the withdrawal’s
irritability – since this tidbit fit into our past arguments. I remembered how
you, breathe in, had once come into the bookstore and sworn allegiance to
a group of activists in Hamburg who had dressed up as superheroes to steal
foodstuffs from upscale supermarkets and redistribute them to the
homeless at the central train station. Breathe out. I remembered how I had
said this sounds more like a publicity stunt than activism, breathe in, and
how you had said, exactly, we need to broadcast inequality. Breathe out.
You then quoted these same words of Brecht after I said it was pointless,
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
22
breathe in, and maybe even immoral to put the homeless in a position of
having to explain themselves to the ever􀀀present authority figures at the
train station for the crémant, caviar and beef tartar at their disposal.
Breathe out. It was also presumptuous to believe the recipients would even
eat it – my mother, for one, hates caviar􀀀 And how often is unwanted food
thrown away by panhandlers􀀀 Breathe in. You can only eat so many belegte
Brötchen in a day and maybe you don’t like salami or hardboiled eggs. You
might be vegetarian􀀀 Or have a gluten allergy􀀀 Breathe out. And maybe you
want a bottle of water or beer and not the patronizing gesture of some
supposedly good􀀀natured citizen who gives you bread instead of money so
that you don’t quote spend it on alcohol or drugs end quote. Breathe in. As
if you have any right to act paternally and not like a sister or brother􀀀 As if
you hadn’t been subjected to a life of dejection long before the needle􀀀
Breathe out. What you need is to be free to make your own decisions􀀀 The
warmth of a smile􀀀 A cigarette􀀀 True generosity􀀀 Without averting your
eyes􀀀 You cannot atone for your sins in a gifted pretzel􀀀 Look closer􀀀
Breathe in􀀀 We are human􀀀
The craving was passing. My breath was getting longer, my ribcage
disentangled. But the lamb’s wool inside my boots had dampened. This was
nothing new. My toes had also sweat on Day Two and Three and I had
brought an extra pair of socks in my backpack for exactly this emergency. I
didn’t want to change them right now though. I’d have to explain what I
was going through and the store was too full to leave the counter and go to
the bathroom. You hadn’t stopped plodding along with your gloss on God
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
23
knows what while I shot into orbit and I realized I must have given you
verbal cues to keep talking without paying attention. When I turned back
around, you were leaning back with one hand on the counter as other
customers tried to navigate around you, which you were oblivious to. My
agitation and physical discomfort were not transmitted to the room, it
seemed, since your unshaven face, smoothed over by placid gravity,
betrayed no changes, nothing. It was good, I thought, you didn’t have that
dog􀀀 its olfactory system would have been hijacked by my hormonal
fluctuations caused by the withdrawal. Your guardian would have blown my
cover, trying to keep a cool demeanor, through barking. I sat back in the
tall swivel chair, adjusted my glasses and tuned back in to your narration.
Außerdem, it would be your intelligence and planning that would
ensure your survival, not your money, and it would be your right, if not
your duty, to do so. Easy, I said, easy. I gestured towards the German
History shelf towards the end of the middle room. Another customer came
to the counter and you folded your arms in like a beach chair, reluctantly
moving over. I typed in the books’ authors, titles and prices into the
spreadsheet, Morrison, Beloved, 6.50, Adichie, Americanah, 6, Butler,
Kindred, 7.50, then asked the same five questions I always do, or should do,
when I ring someone up. Cash or credit􀀀 Would you like a receipt􀀀 A bag􀀀
Do you know our buy back policy􀀀 Would you like a bookmark􀀀 As I
mindlessly performed this, I was watching you in my peripheral vision. I
couldn’t tell whether my coded suggestion had made an impression. You
were dismissively reading the back matter of a recent art theory
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
24
publication and snickered. Then, my curiosity peaked. Do you really think
you’d be ready􀀀
Let’s say you practiced packing your backpack with local maps,
nutrition bars, water filters, first aid supplies and a farmer’s almanac or
whittled down the time it takes to find your hidden .45 mm, ammunition,
jewelry, computer and wallet. Even if you made record time, you still
couldn’t plan for what would be outside your door. There might be
collapsed buildings, fires in the streets, pandemonium. You’d have to
somehow reach your property in the countryside, hope that the roads still
existed and weren’t overrun with checkpoints, robbers. Who’s to say your
cellar wouldn’t already be raided􀀀 And what if you weren’t at home in the
city when everything collapsed􀀀 Since you can’t carry a concealed weapon
in Germany, you’d have to first go to your apartment, then pack and leave.
Which means your apartment building would still need to be standing.
These are a lot of big ifs that you can’t control, I said, so why not stop
dreaming up fantasies of escape and stick with the present. I cracked my
knuckles again, the water separated, mobility increased. It would be better
to use such strategic thinking to make sure we never have to live in such a
grim reality. It’s inevitable, you said, like the four seasons.
Historical information would suggest we are entering society’s
winter and it only makes sense to prepare for the coming darkness. After
years of growth were followed by the heated upheaval of changing opinions,
things cooled down, died off and we are approaching the subzero. The 2008
financial crisis was only a dip into winter’s destruction, the first taste of the
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
25
subarctic austerity to come. You didn’t seem upset about this. You were
like a waiter reporting that not all dishes on the menu were available. You
said the market’s implosion was like the first day the temperature drops
before recovering for an “Indian summer.” Soon it would plummet though.
And, you said, in your strange accent that had a British inflection although
you mostly retained the informal lexicon of your native US America, this
shit will last much longer than projected.
Setting aside climate change, which will alter normal weather
patterns and hence the regularity of this seasonal metaphor, I wondered,
even if you were liquid in silver, seeds and cryptocurrencies, they could
lose their value, right􀀀 Changes in the soil caused by rising temperatures
might deplete the levels of carbon needed for growing leafy vegetables, and
the trajectory of Bitcoin has been anything but reliable. These are only
variables, you said, potentialities that never have to be actuated. When shit
hits the fan, the more possibilities you have mapped out, the better your
chances to survive society’s hibernal. You actually used the word hibernal.
You had even researched aquaponic systems, to grow food and fish
together. It’s richtig krass, you said, peppering your phrases again with
Germanisms 􀀀since you are lost between the languages like me􀀀, it may
even curb weather patterns by releasing less greenhouse gases. So, I
thought, adjusting the waist of my pants, there’s still some of the old you in
you􀀀 then said, where are you getting this􀀀
You had bought the SAS New and Updated Survival Handbook by
John “Lofty” Wiseman at a shop in London, used but in mint condition, and
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
26
it was like an Anarchist Cookbook for the reality after the meal is served
from the cookbook’s recipes. After reading this manual, where you learned
that self􀀀preservation is a force more powerful than a jet engine as well as
technical information about skinning a reindeer, making snowshoes and
weaving a thatched roof from reeds, you started doing lots of little things
differently, like collecting bags of salt from fast food restaurants and
keeping a dozen of them in your wallet. The paper pouches are good to
start a fire and you need salt in your body to retain water. I felt triggered.
My vanity had been injured and hard to palliate no matter how much I
tried to ascribe the size of my blimping gut to my body’s changing water
retention from nicotine cessation. The weight gain doesn’t last forever, I
had been told, and I tried to accept this allegedly temporary reality as well
as the discomfort of not being able to go to the toilet. I had been bloated for
two days already and no combination of plum juice, fennel􀀀anise teas,
apricots and chia seeds or excess water seemed to make a difference. It was
maddening that you had to feel worse to feel better and that you had to be
so god damned aware of it. You don’t look like a person who eats fast food,
I said, so why go to so much trouble for something so improbable􀀀 You
lifted your anachronistic tweed flat cap and scratched your widow’s peak.
Dandruff confettied.
You became interested in this “eventuality” when you watched the
National Geographic Channel’s show Doomsday Preppers in 2014. At first
you seesawed between laughing at the protagonists – whose improbable
scenarios and medieval fears about solar blasts, market crashes and
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
27
volcanoes could easily be traced to their professional traumas as insurance
salesmen, firefighters and law enforcement – and being worried about their
negative portrayals of human nature in times of crisis. Everyone was
convinced of the next person’s evil and only interested in themselves and
their next of kin. It was a perfect reflection of the morality of the market,
the selfishness, and it ignored the wisdom of mole􀀀rats, ants and
crustaceans who work together and overlap generations. We’re more
intelligent than them, you said, and it’s wiser to have a gene pool that
extends to more than one hundred and sixty members. What was the point
of surviving if inbreeding deformed your grandchildren􀀀 I couldn’t really
follow. The point is, you said, these are shortsighted answers to a problem
with long􀀀term consequences. Just sticking with your next of kin was a
leftover tin of spam in a Cold War era bunker that only had enough oxygen
for a week. This kind of planning was also the height of capitalism. Buying
goods you don’t need and probably never will, spending to spend and
consuming so that production didn’t end – without even ever enjoying
them, you added. How many of these tins go bad on the shelves before you
can eat them􀀀 And how many decent meals do you forsake so that you
don’t waste the money you spent on these meal packs of freeze􀀀dried
entries and powdered mashed potatoes􀀀 It’s also just giving in to fear, I
said, adjusting my belt and referring, below the surface, to your salt
packets. To dread The End is human, yes. But to prepare for the Second
Coming with gas masks was irrational, impulsive. If these people
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
28
confronted their anxiety, they wouldn’t need any flamethrowers. You used
to agree.
But when you read a New Yorker article about Silicon Valley’s plans
for the apocalypse, you reconsidered. If the very people who believe, almost
painfully, in the possibility of building a better future through technology
have initiated plans of exiting society, it was time for you to fundamentally
reevaluate your trust in the mechanisms that make our world function. If
they were planning their grand departure from the society they had built,
why should you do any different􀀀 More importantly, why should you
believe their words when they didn’t􀀀 Nee. You felt naïve, deceived. You
had always been upset by the discrepancy between their corporate rhetoric
that promises togetherness and the selfish behavior you had witnessed
when you worked in the startup world but now it was too much, what with
their silent plans to move far away from fault lines, nuclear winds and
civilization to places like the southern island of New Zealand. They really
couldn’t be trusted, you decided. This was authenticated when you learned
that these technological pioneers were weaning themselves and their
children from the devices they had invented. It reminded you of the
preppers preparing for the end times by simplifying their lives except that
the Silicon Valley types knew something about our current reality and
where it was headed. You began to seethe. You had hated most of your
colleagues when you worked at that age􀀀prolonging supplement startup in
New York but now it was time to go into retrograde. You deleted all of your
social network profiles as well as your work profiles, and withdrew from all
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
29
mainstream media without any announcement. No one missed your exit.
None of your so􀀀called friends. They must have all been too distracted by
the next item in their feeds. Still, you needed the Internet for work so you
installed Tor and an alternative browser. There you could get all the
information you needed without providing the larger companies with ad
revenue and you could learn more about the prepper world without being
spied on. There were a lot of people who shared the same opinion and who
were aware of things nobody else reported on. In a forum that you insisted
was very reliable, you learned how a computer glitch depreciated all the
stock prices of tech companies to the same price, 123.47, on July 4, 2017. It
was Wahnsinn. In Pythagorean numerology, these numbers spell out
“study.” Was it a coincidence, one commenter in the forum asked, that this
happened on the Day of Independence􀀀 You doubted it.
It was then that you decided to investigate your way of living. You
wrote down everything you did in a day and spent a week unraveling their
operating systems. You were terrified by your dependence on the Internet
and satellites and logistics, on your slavery to electricity and to those who
produce it, the sketchy nations and conglomerates. Not only for
interactions and distractions but also for money and sustenance. Even the
water supply network is automated, you said, growing unexpectedly
impatient. What would happen if all this went down􀀀 If the systems were
hacked, intentionally, to create chaos􀀀 You’d be fucked, you decided,
loudly. Unless you had some land, reserves, seeds and a well. Then you
could be self􀀀sufficient and build an Earthship to survive life off the grid.
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
30
My breath shortened again. I felt disorientated. Slightly tingly. You
sound like a deranged Thoreau, I said, smiling and hiding my anxiety.
Another craving was coming up quick and we were getting into deep
conspiracy territory. I had been led to believe the intensity of the cravings
disappeared after Day Three but this hunger that is not hunger felt as
strong as ever and it was only a matter of time before you started getting
loud about chemtrails or the inexistence of dinosaurs. I felt tired, weak,
irritable. And my fingers and toes were cold and warm, distant and ample,
clammy. A single cigarette wouldn’t matter. It would relieve my discomfort
and I could wait to quit until I felt stronger. Next week would be better
because – because. I contradicted myself with a deep breath. I had chosen
this week since my partner, Melanie, was in London for a lecture and I
would not make anyone else victim to the clawing nicotine demons. I had
even planned it so that I would only work on Day Four, the day the
cravings are supposed to taper. But then these were just plans, I said to
myself, a rational structuring of an irrational world. Fuck. Just one
cigarette􀀀 No. Breathe. Speak. Is it true that Thoreau’s mother and sister
did his laundry while he roughed it at Walden􀀀 Breathe. You admitted it. A
community would be necessary. Did I want to chip in􀀀
What I wanted was to kick everyone out of the store and go to the
kiosk on the corner and buy a pack of cigarettes and smoke until I felt
nauseous. Instead I excused myself and told you to keep an eye on the
store. I ran across the street to the wine shop, where Irma was standing
outside in her down vest and enjoying a cigarette with a four o’clock glass
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
31
of Beaujolais nouveau. I left two Euros on the counter for fresh bottles of
sparkling water, the third and fourth liter already. As I walked back across
the street and concentrated on my breath, my heart was racing my brain
on the Autobahn of Anxiety. This was worse than a conspiracy theory. It
was a pickle. There was no way I would want to live with you but what did it
mean that you had turned to me, your book dealer, to build a compound in
the wilderness􀀀 Was there no one else to share with􀀀 I had a headache and
through the headache a blurry memory of a mutual acquaintance saying
you had isolated yourself. Back in the shop, I sat down again and looked in
the till for an ibuprofen. There was nothing. As my pounding heart and
brain shifted into sixth gear, I remembered that she made a point to say
you were reading an Italian esotericist and that this author’s blend of
traditionalism and mystical thinking had been a huge influence on
Futurism and Mussolini. I asked you if you had something. At the time, this
seemed unlikely. Your alliance had always been with the French avant􀀀
garde􀀀 Plus, your purchases had always been left leaning. Off the top of my
head, which was aching, I would have guessed that most of the books you
bought were published by Semiotext􀀀e􀀀. It didn’t make sense. Just one
more cigarette. If I told you I didn’t want to live with you would your
isolation only become more, what’s the word, definite, fixed􀀀 Would it
strengthen your convictions􀀀 Damn it. Another customer heard me and
gave me a paracetamol. Which would help with the headache but not the
swollen joints in my arm. I swallowed it with the excess saliva I was
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
32
producing from each conjuration of tobacco products. Thank you. Do you
also have a cigarette􀀀
Trying to resist asking this treacherous question, I distracted myself
and said listen to this. I went to the poetry shelf and searched for a book to
introduce to the discussion. It was a game I liked to play, a form of
astrology with poems. I grabbed a book, flipped to the poem whose number
was the same as my birth year but this didn’t work since the first line would
take too much time to explain. I flipped ahead two poems, to the year my
sister was born. I took a deep breath and read poem number 84􀀀
To wander free among the mountains
you don’t need to buy them.
For a steep climb you need a stout staff,
and a good strong vine helps when it gets steeper.
The pines beside the creeks are always green,
but the rocks in their beds come in all colors.
You might get cut off from all your friends,
but in the spring the birds will sing for you.
􀀀 translation Red Pine
That helped. I could almost smell the pinesap. It was dusty and there was a
hint of old sweat. Was that me or you􀀀 You looked at the “kitschy” cover of
Cold Mountain Poems and laughed at my gullibility. There are no
mountains, only private property. I wouldn’t even be able to settle for
flooded meadows or unfarmable moors after the cataclysm because these
zones would also be owned. Whoever holds the deeds when order crumbles
will protect their property at any cost. I didn’t understand how the deeds
would still have any value if there were no states. You shrugged your
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
33
shoulders. I drank some water. The water hit my abdomen. My abdomen
tightened. I felt like I needed to fart, knew I couldn’t. The fecal matter
seemed to be lost in a secret chamber inside me and the pain was now more
of a stabbing. I wasn’t sure I would survive this. You said that wasn’t what
mattered. What mattered was who claimed them. I wanted to protest but
another customer wanted to make a purchase􀀀 Dahl, James and the Giant
Peach, 4.50, Le Guin, The Dispossessed, 7, new, Moyn, The Last Utopia, 12, and
Liu, Death’s End, 10, new. Breathe. I made my usual stupid joke about the
children’s book being for the adult and asked the child if the other books
were for her. Like always, everyone was a little embarrassed and my canned
laughter was flatter than usual.
It was getting worse. You started talking to the mother about her
purchases and my guts were a double constrictor. My molars were sweating
and my tongue was covered in shagged carpet. A star burst in my chest and
it was trying to exit through my legs. The only thing that would stop it, the
one thing that would be medicine to this torment, would be another last
cigarette. And then another one. And another. To the withdrawal
symptoms, I added cursing at my stupidity. It was shameful. I couldn’t even
blame it on adolescence􀀀 There was no older brother I had tried to impress
or friends huddled outside of the recreation center taking turns hitting a
pipe then a cigarette at a Friday night dance, or rather, there were exactly
these kinds of friends but I always declined the peer pressure since I hated
the way my mother smelled when she came out of the garage after a smoke,
and pot made me paranoid. There was not even the desire to smoke to get
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
34
over my shyness later as a teenager at raves and be able to start up
conversations in the chill room with all the beautiful, kind people after a
simple question, a request for a light, although I did once steal a lighter
from my mother and lit the cigarette of a beautiful woman who then
offered me one in return and then shied away from my creepiness when I
admitted I had never smoked and so couldn’t explain why I had a lighter.
Smoking even somehow stayed foreign to me after I moved to Berlin and
attended art openings where everyone stood around delabelling beer
bottles with their fingernails or rolling loose tobacco cigarettes and I would
wake up the next morning after a long night out and my clothes and hair
had turned my apartment into a humidor. No, smoking would only enter
my life as a bridge, a transitional period when I left a tumultuous
relationship and didn’t want to return to psychiatry’s pharmaceuticals to
deal with the creeping levels of anxiety and depression. I had only ever
puffed on a cigarette once on vacation and I remembered the
intensification of my concentration. I thought this was what I needed to get
through this difficult period, I mean, focus. And so, I focused on myself like
my therapist told me to and I focused on something else as well􀀀 Paradise
Lost. Not to be melodramatic, but because it was the only big book on my
shelf that I had never spent time with. I was convinced the cigarettes would
help me get through this with their heightened sense of concentration. It
was incredible. I was thirty􀀀two and had never smoked or read Milton. I
was mad at myself for having jumped into another doomed relationship
and for adding a bad habit to this act of purgation but there I was, sitting in
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
35
Mama Bar on Hobrechtstraße, drinking trübes Bier and zeroing in on the
different strategies of Satan and his legions to regain their kingdom. Every
friend who smoked or used to smoke or never smoked told me how stupid
smoking was at the time and some people even had the decency to tell me
how stupid I was acting even though they thought it was good I was single. I
could never quite master the elegance ascribed to cigarettes and one friend
even took a picture of me smoking and added it to my profile on her phone
so that whenever I called her, she would be pissing herself when she picked
up. The only person who thought my smoking was a good thing was my
therapist. He asked a lot about it and had admitted he found it difficult to
quit. He wanted to know what brand I smoked and since he had quit
decades before American Spirit landed on the German market, he wanted
me to describe the taste in detail. The whole thing was confusing. The
feeling of smoke entering my lungs was one of my least favorite sensations.
But for three years I couldn’t quit – or rather, I couldn’t quit quitting. It
became one of my favorite activities. To cycle through bliss, condemnation,
crisis and hope was something I secretly loved even before I started
smoking and I did not want to abandon it, or rather, I wanted to contain
this cycle in the cigarettes and keep them as ritual, an amulet, and harness
its energy in a single aspect of my life so that it wouldn’t affect the others
until I was ready to let it go as well. And then whenever I did quit, I was
miserable. Nothing had changed except I wasn’t smoking. The energies
were still the same and they had no outlet. My meditation practice helped
but I was just a beginner and my concentration would falter. I would start
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
36
up again. Focus would return but also a negative monologue about myself
and failure. I could identify with the devils’ plans to regain paradise and
their feelings of anger. I would live in the latent greatness of a better future
and I could find resolution, again and again, to be better in this future.
Weirdly, I also believed that smoking made me a better person. When I had
tried to quit before, I was self􀀀assured and arrogant, pointing out the faults
of my friends and criticizing their inability to get over them. If I could quit
smoking, then they could do anything. I was the zealot past smoker I never
thought I could become. Another good reason to get back on the wagon –
or was it off it􀀀
Suddenly, another craving had been outlived. You were giving your
email address to the mother. Perhaps you had recruited her, I don’t know,
and then said your farewells. I hoped that you were the one leaving but
knew better. In the past you would hang around for hours and would ignore
my pretexts to end our conversation when I would begin, sometimes
rudely, pricing up books and shelving them. You would lounge on the sofa,
reading from random books on display, waiting until you heard something
interesting another customer said and insert yourself. My guess had always
been that you were lonely. I had projected that you just wanted someone to
talk to. And so, even though I found our conversation exhausting, I
continued. I wanted to know whether you really were as bad as everyone
had said you were. And, selfishly, what else was I supposed to do with all
these hours behind the counter to distract myself from smoking􀀀
Where were we􀀀 Right. Excuse me.
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
37
Survival stories are as old as Adam and Eve – the memory of Milton
was serving me well – and as a bookseller I’ve seen the fear of collapse be
printed and hyped and remaindered, year after year after year. When the
world refuses to die in the ways these authors predicted, their books collect
dust in the used politics section. Then they are thrown away when deemed
unsellable. I was losing the thread. I felt slightly outside myself, like my soul
was keeping mere contact with my body. I found it again. There’s nothing
wrong with plans for the future or dreams of self􀀀sufficiency when they’re
a counter to tyranny, I said, but even Transcendentalists and hermit Zen
monks who practiced autonomy with varying degrees of success always had
to return to the city to make a living, at least intermittently.
Is that your Rechtfertigung to keep the status quo, you asked􀀀 This
isn’t what I’m saying, I said but wasn’t really sure whether that that wasn’t
what I was saying. I just mean that stepping out of the system has never
proven to be a tenable alternative for everyone. You would need a new
system. You didn’t seem convinced. I tried to backpedal and be less
aggressive, something that I struggle with. I understand the desire to damn
it all, I said, but isn’t it weird that every age says we are getting further
from Nature and more dependent on the technological “fictions”
populating our heads and that we express this through the same medium
we condemn􀀀 You didn’t see the connection. I tried again. We may have an
ambivalent relationship to all of this – I actually threw my arms up, a
fortissimo – but I’m not sure I know anyone who actually wants to stop
taking planes or using the Internet. Even though every vacation to an
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
38
island is another hole in the atmosphere above it and the world of servers is
the fastest growing contributor to global warming. Every email is a melting
glacier – that felt good, poetic, to be remembered – so what do we do􀀀
Communicate through smoke signals􀀀
Prepare for the bleakest of futures.
There was a pause. A customer wanted a book from the highest shelf
in the front room, where the fiction is, and was scared to use the moveable
ladder. I climbed myself and felt unsettled. I was about 70􀀀 in my body and
all these novels suddenly reeked of annihilation. Was there a single one
between Brönte and Capote that ended well􀀀 Is that what makes literature
literature and not self􀀀help, I wondered􀀀 Halfway back down, my eyes
dragged over Cervantes’ Don Quixote, which pokes fun at the madman who
wanted to revive chivalry and bring justice to the world. Here was a man
who completely submitted to his own fictions after literature evaporated
his brain, a man who was able to die only after renouncing it entirely. Lost
in thought, I handed over the book the customer wanted. Junky.
We must sound ridiculous. I mean, have you ever read Flaubert’s
book about the two scribes who abandon the world of literature􀀀 Nöö, you
said, but it sounds good. It is. Sad too. And funny. When these two fools try
to become men of the world, they know nothing about gardening and
carpentry. They revert back to learning about them from books and fail
miserably in applying this knowledge. How flattering, you said. And wrong.
You knew more than a dozen knots and could build a raft out of cooking oil
drums and two􀀀by􀀀fours. Wiseman, you said, had provided you with all the
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
39
knowledge you needed. I let your braggadocio tone go unnoticed. And
whereas you’re the pessimist, Pecuchet, I sound like the optimist, Bouvard.
Which, I thought, was a major role reversal. Before you had been me, I
mean Bouvard, and had wanted to start a reading group in the bookstore
after your time at Occupy. I had rejected this idea because I never
particularly liked your bravado at the counter and could only imagine what
that would be like if the floor was given to you as the ringleader. I might
never go home. At the shop I was captive to all kinds of lunatics and lonely
men and I had mastered a form of sarcasm I once described as healthy and
natural but now knew to be something different, something more
fraudulent. And whereas I could account for my own slowly changing
attitude, I could find no transition between you and your various
incarnations.
You were the one who had described your time in Zuccotti Park as
“transformative” and “inspiring,” weren’t you􀀀 Or was I confusing you with
someone else􀀀 No, it was you and you were different. You were a legion of
shifts and opinions. A fiction. Thinner, you had ditched your Bolshevik
goatee and had grown out your hair beyond a buzz cut. And your outfit was
no longer limited to black high performance gear, a black hoodie and black
designer sneakers. You were wearing an olive Barbour hooded jacket, a
merlot Oxford, forest green khakis and brown boots and I felt like you
looked like me, sans the flat cap and sandbags under your eyes 􀀀I hoped􀀀.
You looked tired. Actually, you always did.
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
40
How does it end, you asked. Where it began, I said, with a lecture. I
grabbed the Dalkey Archive edition of Bouvard and Pecuchet off the shelf,
the same one I had at home, and flipped to the last pages of the novel.
Pecuchet, preparing his notes, predicts “there will no longer be any ideals,
religion or morality” and that “America will conquer the earth.” Genau, you
said. Flaubert is a prophet, a prepper. Bouvard then counters, I countered,
“we will go to the stars – and when the earth is used up, humanity will
spread to other planets.” Sounds like Philip K. Dick. When was it published􀀀
Sometime after Flaubert died. Ach so􀀀 It was never finished. I handed you
the book and pretended to answer some emails while you read, happy to
have a moment to myself.
A moment I filled with you to avoid thinking about cigarettes, which
were there or almost there or not there at all􀀀 I couldn’t tell but it was all
coming together. I remembered the last time I saw you, about a year ago.
That day, the sun was shining and Berliners were leaving the never􀀀ending
gray cave of February. The city is like a religious festival on these last days
of winter and everyone sits outside at the cafés, staring upward with eyes
closed, soaking up the ultraviolet rays, the divine communication, wrapped
in blankets. You were very quiet for you and you brought in a load of books
to sell. The shop was busy so I got straight down to business. Our sticker
wasn’t on them􀀀 there were none of our pencil marks on the first page and
I could see none of them in our order sheet. You admitted that you hadn’t
bought them here. I thought you might have felt guilty for shopping
elsewhere or embarrassed by this pile of books, which, for all I knew, might
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
41
be from a friend who had left them with you since they couldn’t fit them
into their luggage. My old therapist would have said I was projecting but I
knew you were particular about what was allowed on your shelves and that
you sold back almost all of the titles you purchased. In that stack there
were a number of titles on enhancing the tools of capitalism to accelerate
its destruction. You took the cash and said you had to run. That was out of
character, strange. And so was the simultaneity of the announcement for
the lecture you planned to give on the Italian esotericist popping up on
Facebook. The words “dark enlightenment” hovered in the distance and
when I looked an hour later, I saw that my poet friends were arguing with
the bookstore owners on the event page. After getting the gist of the
argument – that this theorist you planned to lecture on should not be
celebrated as an “important figure” – I broke my code of ethics and looked
through your order history in the spreadsheet. It should be none of my
business what our customers want to read that we don’t stock but this
seemed different. Had we provided you with the Italian proto􀀀fascist
thinking􀀀 We hadn’t. You had ordered Louis Althusser’s Reading Capital,
György Luckács’ notes on Georg Simmel lectures as well as Raymond
Roussel’s New Impressions of Africa. Twice you had ordered Antonin
Artaud’s Watchfiends 􀀀 Rack Screams. There was nothing that didn’t match
up with what I knew of you, not even the fact that you had ordered used
copies of all of them – despite the fact that we had new editions of Roussel
and Artaud in stock for only a few Euros more. It seemed to me that you
might be reading this esotericist in the light of recent current events, the
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
42
US election, and through the ideological bent I guessed you belonged to.
The only thing that surprised me on that day in February was that your
most recent order was two years ago. When was the last time you actually
purchased something and didn’t just peruse through books on the sofa in
the middle room􀀀 At the time, I forgot all of it but now something clicked.
You were not Bouvard or Pecuchet. You were a character from
Roberto Bolaño’s Nazi Literature in the Americas. You needed the money
for your compound in the forest and were flirting with radical rhetoric as
an outlet for frustrated ambitions or a form of imaginary revenge and you
wanted to leave and􀀀or destroy society as you knew it. You had turned to
the far right out of resentment for your peers who never accepted your
brilliance. A convert, a caricature, a villain, that I was, admittedly,
embellishing in chiaroscuro for clarity – which didn’t make you any less
real – or dangerous. Dangerous􀀀 That seemed like a stretch. If I looked
closer, you were the same acerbic person only perhaps sadder and more
evasive. You seemed lonely but not any more lonely than most of the other
young foreign writers I know. Like them, you had often described feeling
aimless and lacking community and I understood that you must have been
aware of the weight of absolute freedom in a city where you could live on
next to nothing and thus had no excuse to not do the things you came here
to do. There was no one to blame but yourself. And I knew this like all of
the rest. And I had found myself in my darkest moments almost agreeing
with the you I imagined. The one that just wanted to be seen for the person
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
43
you were. But then there were the guns. Were there guns􀀀 I couldn’t prove
anything.
The phone rang. I picked up and hung up. I had had enough for the
day and put the phone on silent. I went to grab something from the front
pocket in my backpack at my feet then stopped as pain jolted up my spine.
It was like the game Operation I played as a child. I had to navigate between
the shocks to save my organs but my lack of calm and focus was not strong
enough to extract the ailments without doing more damage. Fuck it. I
grabbed my bag, opened a plastic tin and slipped something into my mouth.
I started salivating and drank some more water. Tomorrow. I didn’t care. I
changed my socks right then and there. I felt good again. My neck more
pliable and my headache was gone. At some point you started laughing. In
the introduction, you said, Flaubert’s goal was to show that “education, no
matter what it is, does not signify much, and that nature does everything,
or almost nothing.” How stupid, oder􀀀 You have to admit it, you said, what
with your lecture about emails and glaciers. I think I understand what he
means, I said, all of a sudden feeling very awake and clear. It’s like what you
said about jet engines.
Just then, one of my favorite customers, a Lithuanian pianist who
had been browsing the books on the front table, interjected. This often
happens at the bookstore when the seal of silence is broken. Questions are
asked, recommendations are made and phone numbers are exchanged.
Everyone feels welcome. For years, I would put on some music, something
violent like Death Grips, whenever this happened and turn it up to get
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
44
everyone to shut up, I mean, to restore the order of quiet I longed for – but
today was different. The pianist was a gem and I was in a good mood again.
Tomorrow.
Had we ever read Marlen Haushofer’s The Wall􀀀 You hadn’t. It’s
criminally underappreciated, the pianist said. I started hiccupping as she
explained how a sole survivor learns to live in an Alpine hunting lodge after
an apocalypse kills, she paused, almost everyone. Living within a
transparent wall that shuts her off from the rest of the world, she holds on
to her previous, educated self because she fears she isn’t human without it.
I drank some more water, burped and switched sides of my mouth. No one
noticed. As time goes on, she said, she eventually gets over her immense
loneliness, inexperience and boredom and learns to care for a cat, a dog
and a cow and to take care of herself. In the end, she identifies more with
the flowers in the meadows than with her previous self. There was a distant
sound of birds, muffled but definitely from within the bookstore. It was too
late and also too early for them to be outdoors. I won’t tell you how it ends,
the pianist said while fishing around in her handbag, in case you want to
read it, but there is this􀀀 the narrator wishes we would have recognized
that our only hope for a better life was love. When did the book come out,
you asked. In the 60s, the pianist said. She picked up her phone, blurted
some forceful words in Lithuanian and said I have to go. Now we were
alone in the bookstore and I began to sing, “love, love, love …”
Don’t give me that hippy shit, you said, half in jest. Did I forget about
the Hells Angels ripping into the peaced out freaks at Altamont􀀀 Or that
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
45
the Hells Angels had been hired as security by the Grateful Dead􀀀 What a
load of rubbish􀀀 That was a casual British colloquialism you had mastered.
There were others I had heard before. Like bin, biscuit and bank holiday.
Their complicity with thugs was ludicrous􀀀
Explain London then, I said, with a note of aggression. You looked
confused. Hesitant, uncertain – then furious. This is all such bullshit, you
said. Don’t you get it􀀀 No one’s going to save you but yourself􀀀
We were still alone and I grabbed the money from the till and
something out of my bag and excused myself to the bathroom. I felt stupid
for mentioning London, where you had defended the “free speech” of a
series of events hosting alt􀀀right thinkers in the face of protestors, because
I didn’t want to hear your perspective. This protest had happened days
before your planned reading at that other bookstore but I only learned
about it later when I watched the videos on Twitter that were posted in the
bookstore’s event page. In them, you stood next to Nimrod Passage in
Dalston and your eyes burned with anger and hatred and disgust as
protestors pushed and shoved you and I didn’t want this rage to be directed
at me. And I didn’t want to defend the actions of some of my poet friends
since I thought they had jumped to conclusions and had been swept up in
repugnant groupthink behavior that had all the non􀀀ideological
characteristics of what it was criticizing, namely, fascism, as well as
abandoning all nuance in the name of defamation. Some of them were even
ashamed of their torch and pitchfork shaming when I talked to them in
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
46
private but no one would say so in public. They didn’t have to. To be
faultless is the privilege of victors.
Alone in the bathroom, I was mad at myself for pouring oil on the
fire and ashamed of myself while I submitted again to the pains of
addiction. I exchanged the Swedish snus under my upper lip for a new one
from the plastic tin I had taken out of my bag and brought with me, the tin
I had hidden from everyone and kept in case of emergency, and this
seemed like an emergency to my addicted brain, the brain that bought a
dozen tins of snus from the airport’s Duty Free store when I was last in
Norway. Much more than the last one, I could taste the blend of cedar,
orange and juniper since I pressed the pouch between my tongue and the
roof of my mouth. The nicotine walloped my consciousness. I took a shit.
Finally. My head pounded with a renewed concentration that did not
diminish even though I was aware that I was betraying myself and the goals
I had set. My inner sense of obligation told me I would have to tell Melanie
and I was worried that she wouldn’t be disappointed or upset more than
she would be. She never was, which is what made quitting so difficult. The
motivation had to come from within. Damn it, I said, then washed my
hands, took off my glasses, splashed water on my face, replaced them and
left. Before I did, I smiled in the mirror, it was crooked. The bulge from the
snus under my lip turned my smile into a smirk. Tomorrow.
I walked out and you were still there, alone. How I wished someone
would come in to the bookstore􀀀 Even if it was only a neighbor picking up a
package or the postman who needs the key to the building’s front door􀀀 I’d
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
47
even settle for someone who was shocked and disappointed to learn that we
didn’t have an obscure title􀀀 We call ourselves a bookstore􀀀 Someone􀀀
Please􀀀 Help me􀀀
Back in the ring, I struck first. I said I don’t really want to get into
what happened in London or that other bookstore since I know a lot of the
people who were protesting you. I don’t think they were right to force the
bookstore to permanently close but your wording in the announcement
was messed up and your responses kept stirring the coals. You then vented
about leftist witch􀀀hunts, baseless character judgments and the death of
free speech. I said speech is not very interesting. I’m interested in what the
syllables mean. That sounded pretty high and mighty􀀀 I’d also be careful
about placing the leftists on one side of the wall and you on the other if you
don’t want to make more enemies. The nicotine was working. I felt
incredibly awake and full of fury. It’s your life though, I said, twisting some
spoon into a shank, a weapon of simplicity and urgency, and using it. I
looked at my phone as a gesture of disinterest and superiority and saw that
Melanie had sent me a text message. I felt too guilty to reply. How could I􀀀
I’d have to pretend nothing had changed or open up a conversation I didn’t
want to have about my failures.
When I looked up again you looked dejected, like I had betrayed you,
like everyone else. Your forearms were flat on the counter and your
shoulders were hunched. Your head looked heavy. I no longer felt the need
to defend myself from an attack that never came and I almost felt sorry for
you. What was it that went wrong􀀀
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
48
Hey, whatever happened to your reading group􀀀 You mumbled that
now any kind of public event was impossible in this city. You had been
vilified to the point where you might have to leave. Now I get it, I said. I felt
like it was possible I had believed everything too readily, that you might not
be a Nazi after all – only foolish, stubborn, naïve or desperate for attention.
I felt like it was possible that a narrative had been constructed around you
and that there was no way that you could escape it without changing your
name or disappearing completely. Was it possible we believed in the same
thing􀀀 That communication and warmth are better than fists since violence
only strengthens convictions􀀀 I doubted it. And my poetry friends didn’t
believe it either. We argued about this whenever I saw them. They wanted
to know whether I would fight for the right thing if it came to it. I always
said yes and that the way I lived my life should be proof of this but that I
believed in non􀀀violent forms of confrontation. They mostly thought this
was naïve and they had me convinced that hatred should not be tolerated
but I often wondered about what bred the hatred in the first place􀀀 A lack
of love and understanding􀀀 Or was it fear􀀀 Are they different􀀀 And didn’t
they also hate the Nazis􀀀 They agreed that these might be the motives and
disagreed that people could change. I found this depressing and fatalistic.
Like saying you could never quit smoking. Could it be that you only needed
an invitation out of the cold􀀀 That with a steady stream of warmth you
would not be so full of disdain􀀀 There was no two􀀀way authentication for
any of this. The data was encrypted. And now I was failing to put the
warmth I advocated into practice. It seemed to be getting to you. Your eyes
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
49
were darker, your complexion bleached. I had to admit that there was a
part of me that had always liked you, that thought you were funny and
strange and that would now stutter step if anyone mentioned you since it
would mean that I too was a Nazi in the words of my friends if I didn’t
condemn you. I couldn’t condemn you, I could only condemn your actions
and the belief systems they stemmed from. What was the right thing to do􀀀
Stop listening or be more confrontational􀀀 Or was there a better way to
proceed􀀀 I considered taking out the snus but didn’t. I pressed it into my
cheek and felt it quickly becoming dry. I replaced it.
Look, maybe you don’t have to leave. Maybe there’s another
alternative, like the one the pianist suggested. You looked confused. Have
you ever considered meditation􀀀 What, like mindfulness􀀀
􀀀
Part of me blindly yessed your critique of mindfulness from the beginning.
It was a kneejerk reaction to whatever is in vogue, a habit our generation
arrogated in an attempt to remain distant, critical, ironic, apathetic and􀀀or
contemptuous to and with and from mainstream culture􀀀 a habit which is
unaware, for all its self􀀀proclaimed criticality, that this position of feigned
neutrality and distaste is also a trope, learned behavior, which could also be
magnified for critique and study, ad nauseam. In any case, I was hesitant to
give mindfulness the time of day since it was a fad likely to fade from the
cultural landscape of wellbeing as fast as Slim Fast, Positive Thinking or
Tae Bo. After all, mindfulness coloring books and cookbooks were no
different from their unmindful predecessors except in their marketing and
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
50
the movement seemed to be just another document in the dominant
culture’s appropriation of Eastern practices.
Added to that was Silicon Valley pioneering the practice as a way to
get ahead in the cutthroat world of business. In 2013, Wired Magazine,
which is more invested in Mountain View than Cold Mountain, published
an article called “In Silicon Valley, Meditation is No Fad. It Could Make
Your Career,” which detailed how Chade􀀀Meng Tan, an engineer at Google,
had introduced mindfulness to the tech world with the course “Search
Inside Yourself” at the Google Campus. This class, which sounds like
treating your soul as a browser, was such a success that other employees at
Google developed courses as well. With names like “Neural Self􀀀Hacking”
and “Managing Your Energy,” the tech industry not only showed interest
in mindfulness, they ingested it like a ketogenic􀀀friendly shake of bacon,
parsley, turmeric and avocado. Why “the source code to spiritual
awakening is open to everyone” might be negative was best expressed by a
caption under the main photo of the article, where a group of people is
meditating on a rooftop in San Francisco. This caption proclaimed that
mindfulness is “not just about inner peace – it’s about getting ahead.” In a
world where emotional intelligence, resilience and focus are all highly
coveted skills that will ensure continued gainful employment, mindfulness
promised to teach meditators these skills. To me, this turned self􀀀discovery
into a good business strategy and one the managers could implement to
elicit productivity. This was corroborated by Chade􀀀Meng Tan when he
expanded his course into a foundation, the Search Inside Yourself
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
51
Foundation, for executives and explained to the Guardian that “if you, as
the boss, are nice to employees, they are happy, they treat their customers
well, the customers are happy to spend more money, so everybody wins.”
Kindness is not negative but using mindfulness as a corporate
strategy felt icky on three distinct levels. Firstly and most readily, it sells
enlightenment, makes it a product that is hawked by the same companies
that create emotional slot machines, addictive apps with predictable input
and random payout. Despite the Buddhist sounding principles on the front
end, each swipe or reload is designed for us to want more and more. We are
supposed to stay engaged with the product, no matter what it’s selling, and
mindfulness had been an untapped vein in the health industry. And
therefore profitable. According to the marketing research firm IBISWorld,
this amounts to more than a billion dollars today. These are rather steep
numbers considering pillows or chairs are optional – meditation only
requires a straight spine and concentration. Secondly, and this is leaning
on the critique you delivered in the bookstore, if mindfulness were adopted
in the workplace it would turn self􀀀betterment into a micro􀀀practice of
efficiency and dedication. This is also what the Wired article caption was
suggesting, although in positive terms. In the same article, one Google
employee described his mental state as being a defragged hard drive, i.e.
functioning perfectly. In the process, however, self􀀀realization becomes a
tool of economic productivity. This is the old trick of Protestants dressed
up in new language. Today, we learn ways of dealing with more stressful
environments without changing the environments. By turning a blind eye
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
52
to the systemic causes of injustice however, organizational life is
depoliticized and individualized. Those who constantly have their drives
frustrated by virtue of social and economic marginalization are regulated
through such practices. And this, then, thirdly, which was your crowning
achievement in the argument􀀀 mindfulness is a tool of oppression. Even if
there’s nothing directly authoritarian about it. It is similar to the so􀀀called
horizontal business structures where nothing changes regarding the
hierarchies. Executives still make more money before lunch than their
employees will in weeks, the only difference now is that they all meditate
together in a conference room and sit at the same table to eat. Moreover,
mindfulness practices help to lower the costs of health insurance, whose
rates have risen by nearly 200􀀀 in the US in the last ten years. This is why,
for instance, mindfulness has been implemented by the military. It makes
better snipers and drone pilots and reduces post􀀀traumatic stress disorder.
People kill better and are less expensive to recover.
This was the gist of the sermon you delivered before you left.
Admittedly, I had some wobbly form of these prejudices when I first heard
about the practice from a friend, a Google headhunter, in mid 2013 and she
had forwarded me the aforementioned Wired article. Since she was one of
the most stressed out people I have ever met, her depiction of mindfulness
sounded like snake oil with a distinctly ayurvedic twist and I never got
much closer to what it was through secondary sources.
Is mindfulness an intimately attentive frame of mind or a relaxed􀀀
alert frame of mind􀀀 Equanimity􀀀 A form of the Buddhist meditation called
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
53
vipassana 􀀀“insight”)? Or another kind of Buddhist meditation known as
anapanasmrti 􀀀“awareness of breath”)? Or is it a way to reduce stress􀀀 A
way to just take it all in􀀀 A social movement􀀀 Or even, as the Time
Magazine article in 2014 called it, a revolution􀀀 If so, for whom􀀀 I’m
borrowing here from the wonderful article “The Muddied Meaning of
‘Mindfulness’” by Virginia Heffernan in the April 14, 2015 edition of The
New York Times, where Heffernan tries to clarify the roots of mindfulness
and whether it is Buddhist or not. What can be said, with relative certainty,
however, is that Jon Kabat􀀀Zinn, who developed this secularized version of
Buddhism as a way to reduce stress and cope with anxiety and illness at the
Stress Reduction Clinic at the University of Massachusetts Medical School
in 1979, has downplayed the connections between mindfulness and
Buddhism from the beginning. As the father of modern mindfulness, he
states this quite clearly in the first sentence of his book Wherever You Go,
There You Are􀀀 mindfulness is a “Buddhist practice that has profound
relevance for our present􀀀day lives” but this “relevance has nothing to do
with Buddhism per se or with becoming Buddhist.” According to Kabat􀀀
Zinn, mindfulness has instead “everything to do with waking up and living
in harmony with oneself and with the world.” The way to do this is by
“investigating inwardly our own nature as beings and, particularly, the
nature of our minds through careful and systematic self􀀀observation.” He
goes to great pains to suggest that this is not necessarily “Eastern” or
“mystical” and maintains that even Thoreau did the same when he left the
city for Walden Pond – Kabat􀀀Zinn seems to have forgotten, however, the
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
54
serious influence Indian and Chinese philosophy had on the famed author
􀀀or perhaps he was trying to sneak the Eastern philosophy in through the
backdoor􀀀.
According to Heffernan, Kabat􀀀Zinn was uncomfortable aligning
himself with Buddhism because “many of the secular people who could
most benefit from meditation were being turned off by the whiffs of
reincarnation and other religious exotica that clung to it.” To appeal to
these people, Kabat􀀀Zinn emphasized the scientifically proven benefits of
mindfulness meditation, which is said to shrink the right amygdala, our
fight􀀀or􀀀flight central station that controls fear and emotion. Scientific
studies have suggested this shrinkage is a natural byproduct of meditation
and it has been shown that mindfulness has further benefits to the psyche.
It is said to help develop a relaxation response to stress, quiet brain chatter
and promote focus. This is done by focusing on the present and only the
present, non􀀀judgmentally. “This kind of attention,” Kabat􀀀Zinn continues,
“nurtures greater awareness, clarity and acceptance of present􀀀moment
reality.” That is, by practicing mindfulness we become more aware of
ourselves and the world. When you meditate, you begin to notice all the
thoughts and perceptions you have that are clouding the present moment.
So far, so good.
Being in the present, mindfulness or sati in Buddhist philosophy, is
the El Dorado of sports known as “the zone.” Positive psychology has
identified the zone as a mental state in which a person is fully immersed in
a feeling of energized focus, full involvement and enjoyment in the process
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
55
of performing an activity. It is the complete absorption in what one is
doing. Out on the court, the zone is what we’re all hoping for. In that state,
the rim grows wider, movement is effortless and it makes perfect sense
then that athletes turn to mindfulness and meditation. Today, numerous
NBA players have meditation practices and turn inward as part of their
pregame rituals. What is surprising, however, is that it took so long to gain
mainstream traction in the league.
The practice of meditation was first pioneered in the world of
basketball by Phil Jackson, basketball’s “Zen Master,” when he was the
coach of the Chicago Bulls in the 1990s. Having learned about Eastern
philosophy from his brother in the 1970s, Phil Jackson is an adamant
practitioner of Zen’s zazen meditation, which involves sitting still on a
cushion with the eyes open but directed downward and focusing on the
breath. He introduced meditation despite Eastern practices potentially
seeming esoteric to the players and tried to find a teacher who could
connect with them. Jon Kabat􀀀Zinn suggested that Phil Jackson, who are
both white, get in touch with George Mumford since Mumford, an African􀀀
American who was teaching meditation to prisoners at the time, had played
basketball and had been roommates with the legendary player Julius “Dr. J”
Erving in college.
Mumford, who is decidedly much more comfortable with the
Buddhist tradition than Kabat􀀀Zinn, became the Chicago Bull’s teacher in
1993, right after the Bulls won their first three􀀀peat and Michael Jordan
went on hiatus when his father was murdered that summer. As Mumford
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
56
remembers it, the team was in shambles. “In the midst of this adversity,”
Mumford writes in The Mindful Athlete, “with team members in various
states of emotional distress, Phil had to rebuild a team and bring harmony
to discord. That’s when he reached out and brought me to his training
camp to teach mindfulness and help heal the team.” One of the new
members of that team was Steve Kerr.
Coining the term “mumfied” to describe how Mumford’s teachings
could affect a player, Kerr took to the practice although he has repeatedly
stated that he doesn’t meditate on a regular basis. Instead, Kerr was much
more influenced by an early mindfulness book that Phil Jackson gave him.
The Inner Game of Tennis by Timothy Gallwey is so important to Kerr that
he has reportedly read Gallwey’s book every offseason for more than
twenty years and even has ten copies on hand for anyone who might need
it.
In his manual for athletes facing the challenges of keeping the body
and mind tuned in, Gallwey begins with a situation that any Sunday touch
football player or badminton enthusiast will immediately feel. Think about
the last time you played a game poorly and cursed at yourself for not
performing well. Probably you told your body to do one thing and it did
another and you were angry or embarrassed or disappointed. Gallwey’s
answer to this problem is to quiet the self 􀀀Self 1􀀀 who is giving the orders
and to learn to trust the self 􀀀Self 2􀀀 who performs. For, “Self 2 – that is,
the physical body, including the brain, memory bank 􀀀conscious and
unconscious􀀀 and the nervous system – is a tremendously sophisticated
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
57
and competent collection of potentialities” and it needs to be respected. If
Self 1, the self􀀀proclaimed dictator sitting at command central, is allowed to
mope or become belligerent, it inhibits the performance of Self 2, the
supposedly lowly employee, and its condemnations become self􀀀fulfilling
prophecies. In a way, Gallwey wants us to abandon the Oracle of Delphi’s
prescriptions and subscribe to the Emersonian variant of “trust thyself􀀀
every heart vibrates to that iron string.”
While this sounds simple and it is, Gallwey admits it isn’t easy. The
mind is powerful and capable of continually undermining the trust invested
in the body. We have been trained from an early age to berate ourselves.
Yet, Gallwey maintains, this is only a habit and “habits are statements
about the past and the past is gone.”
This rang bells for me when I read it. My partner, the philosopher
Melanie Sehgal, works on our habits of thought and tries to disentangle our
implicit trust in systems that have previously given us the best answers.
Whenever we try to interpret new phenomena, we filter them through what
we already know. As physics demonstrated at the beginning of the
twentieth century, much of what we thought we knew needs to be
reformulated. With the help of William James and Donna Haraway, she
proposes that we need a radical empiricism, a philosophy of experience.
Gallwey would agree􀀀 “there is no substitute for learning from experience.”
But what’s that􀀀 More bells􀀀 Or is it Gustave Flaubert snorting from the
beyond􀀀 Let him. He may think that reading about experiences will never
get you anywhere closer to them but in fact you can learn tactics to undo
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
58
your habits and to focus. Gallwey again􀀀 “as one achieves focus, the mind
quiets. As the mind is kept in the present, it becomes calm.” And as it calms
and lets go of the before. It performs in the way it would like to. In other
words, if we would like to be our best selves, we must learn strategies to be
in the present.
The Warriors under Kerr’s leadership have developed one such
strategy, called the “delete button.” This cognitive tool helps you to forget
the past and, in the words of Steph Curry, “lock in.” By forgetting every
play that happened previously we can stay focused on the present and not
give Self 1 the space to keep bickering or congratulating itself. Just how
hard it is to stay in the present is something that Curry demonstrated
during the beginning of the 2016􀀀17 season when he snapped his streak of
196 games with at least a single made three point shot. Sportswriters took
this as a serious cause for concern and wondered whether Curry was
slipping – never mind that making a three point shot in 196 games in a row
is quite the feat. Curry didn’t listen or worry. He showed that even if you
slip out of the present, you can press delete and get right back in. The next
game, three days later, Curry broke the record for made threes in a single
game􀀀 thirteen. How did he go from zero to hero so quickly􀀀 Curry􀀀 “I
don’t overreact to games like that whether I go 0 for 10 or 2 for 12 or
whatever it is. My process is the same, but I had another level of focus the
last two days trying to get my rhythm back and see the ball go in.”
The same level of focus has been shown by the other “Splash
Brother,” Klay Thompson, who started the first seven games of the 2018–19
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
59
season shooting 5 of 36 from deep but who then broke Curry’s record for
the most three pointers in the Warriors’ eighth game of the season, against
the Chicago Bulls. Hitting 14 of 24 of his three pointers in two and a half
quarters, Thompson demonstrated that even if the delete button doesn’t
work right away, it will, if you can maintain your perseverance. With the
record for the most points in a single quarter 􀀀37 points on 13 of 13 from the
field and nine three pointers􀀀 as well as the first player in NBA history to
score 60 points in under 30 minutes 􀀀and also only holding the ball for less
than 90 seconds and taking a mere 11 dribbles􀀀, Thompson’s ability to get
into the zone is something he attributes to the Warriors. The night he
made 14 three pointers, he told reporters􀀀 “I don’t know if I would’ve been
able to breaks these records I’ve got in the past, just like tonight, without
the system I play in or the team I’m with or the guys I play with.” By
emphasizing mindfulness as their second core value, the Warriors place
importance on giving the ball to the player with a hot hand. This then
means that everyone needs to be mindful. For even though it is extremely
rare to get into the zone, all the players need to have awareness of the
current situation and not just try to force an issue and get points for their
own stat line.
The zone is obviously not the invention of the Warriors and they are
not the first team who recognizes its importance beyond the court. Sticking
with basketball, this state was described by the Boston Celtics legend and
Civil Rights activist, Bill Russell, in Second Wind􀀀 The Memoirs of an
Opinionated Man􀀀 “at that special level, all sorts of odd things happened…
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
60
It was almost as if we were playing in slow motion. During those spells I
could almost sense how the next play would develop and where the next
shot would be taken. Even before the other team brought the ball in
bounds, I could feel it so keenly that I’d want to shout to my teammates,
‘It’s coming there􀀀’ – except that I knew everything would change if I did.
My premonitions would be consistently correct, and I always felt then that
I not only knew all the Celtics by heart but also all the opposing players,
and that they all knew me… It seems less odd to me now. It seems more
like, yes, that’s the way it is, that’s the way it should be all the time. We can
be focused. We can be conscious.”
There is a radical political and spiritual proposition in this and one
that Gallwey latently subscribes to when he writes, “awareness of what is,
without judgment, is relaxing and is the best precondition for change.” This
should not be overstated – it’s only a precondition. Awareness of your
situation isn’t enough􀀀 you must also desire to change it. In an essay
entitled “Buddhism and the Coming Revolution,” the poet Gary Snyder has
suggested􀀀 “the mercy of the West has been social revolution􀀀 the mercy of
the East has been individual insight into the basic self􀀀void. We need both.”
Perhaps surprisingly, this “both” was fundamental to basketball’s
inception. Its original purpose was social and spiritual education. Its
inventor, the Canadian James Naismith, was a chaplain and doctor in
theology. When Naismith, an immigrant, combined a number of different
games he had known in his “basket ball” 􀀀note the void􀀀 to keep young men
engaged at the Young Men’s Christian Association in Springfield,
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
61
Massachusetts during the winter of 1891–92, Naismith believed, as he writes
in Basketball􀀀 Its Origins and Development, there is a “great amount of good
we can do through our athletics.” By playing this new game, the young men
would not be getting into trouble or feel alienated in the burgeoning city. In
the YMCA, they would also be exposed to Muscular Christianity, an
ideology that people like Theodor Roosevelt subscribed to, where health
was not opposed to spirituality 􀀀i.e. ditch the hair shirt and show off your
God􀀀given guns􀀀. Muscular Christianity promoted the demonstration of
Christian ideals of honor and the development of character through
physical exertion, a notion which goes back to the Italian Renaissance who
had drawn on classical Greek and Roman sources suggesting the
connection between physical and moral character. Further, the idea was
that you could glorify higher powers through athleticism, something which
the Ancient Greeks did as well – their sports heroes were demigods.
Naismith believed players could learn a number of attributes while
playing the game, including alertness, cooperation, self􀀀sacrifice, self􀀀
control and sportsmanship 􀀀which Naismith defines as “the player’s
insistence on his own rights and his observance of the rights of others” –
something that sounds more like a civil obligation􀀀. There was another
trait Naismith believed players could learn which sounds strikingly similar
to Gallwey’s take on mindfulness in its description. Called “reflexive
judgment,” players could develop “the ability to have the body perform the
correct movement without mental process.” Understood in this way,
mindfulness has always been a part of basketball.
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
62
You might then think basketball was designed to create hyperaware
angels out of players. Naismith wasn’t naïve however. Learning these
attributes on the court does not translate to a virtuous life without effort
and guidance. He writes, “games have been called the laboratory of moral
attributes􀀀 but they will not, of themselves, accomplish this purpose.” They
need dedication off the court as well. Just because there is ostensibly “no
place in basketball for the egoist,” this doesn’t mean that selfish people
can’t play the game – there are many of them playing today who are quite
successful. It is highly unlikely though that you can win a championship as
a committee of one. It hasn’t happened so far and it isn’t likely to happen
tomorrow.
The egoist might nevertheless think that tapping into the zone is
beneficial for having an edge over the competition and will thus train to get
to that level. This is compatible with Silicon Valley’s reasoning for teaching
mindfulness. It can definitely work to a degree but if its lessons are not
embodied and are in conflict with other values and desires, concentration
will falter. There will be a conflict between Self 1 and Self 2. There will be
the thought of reaching for success and as a thought it will be outside the
zone. Remember Russell’s description of the zone and his description of
feeling connected to every other player. In the zone, there is no room for
the ego and if you’re really locked in, these self􀀀involved goals are
arbitrary. What is important is playing the game the right way. Bill Russell
again􀀀 “on the five or ten occasions when the game ended at that special
level, I literally did not care who had won. If we lost, I’d still be as free and
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
63
high as a sky hawk.” Winning, then, could also be understood as a mere
byproduct of the real goal of being locked in. Like Russell said, we can be
focused, we can be conscious. And if we were committed to be, we would
make Joe Naismith proud.
􀀀
It was almost comical to see you after more than a year had passed and
everything was exactly the same. The store was bustling when you entered
and you tipped your hat, smiled as if nothing had happened.
You had left after things got heated when I had my back turned to
you. This happened after I realized I switched the phone on silent and saw
that my boss had tried to call me four times already. As I walked into the
back of the shop and spoke with my boss on the phone, I remember making
guilty jokes, knowing that any lack of communication made him worried.
We continued to talk and I straightened the science fiction shelves. You
hung around the front of the store, at the counter, doing what, I didn’t
know. It is hard to see the counter from that part of the store, there is a
load􀀀bearing pillar in the way, but I do remember feeling slightly
suspicious. By the time I appeased my boss and returned to the desk from
the science fiction section, you had left. Strangely, the till was pulled
forward. All the money was gone. I ran out of the store in a panic. You were
nowhere in sight. What should I do􀀀 Call the police􀀀 I ran back into the
shop and accidentally brushed the counter with my leg as I reached for the
phone. I felt a weight in my pocket and I remembered. I had put all the cash
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
64
in my pants when I went to the bathroom. I was ashamed to think you had
robbed us. Then I drank some more water.
Like that day, I had broken my promise to myself to never smoke
again, again. The night before, in a future􀀀oriented emotional turmoil that
was compounded by my worry for my mother’s health and security in a
church shelter she was now living in near Lake Oroville due to the
encroaching flames from the devastating Camp Fire, I had bought a pack of
cigarettes for the first time in nine months. I smoked a number in rapid
succession, laughing with the awareness that this didn’t make anything
better, then throwing them away.
Now you were here and I wanted to know what you were doing. I had
heard all the rumors. You had been hunted out of the city by the Antifa.
You were working more closely with the gallery owner in London. You were
living with you parents in New York City, who had been bankrolling your
life as a “cultural proletariat” all along. And you had moved somewhere to
Asia for reasons I couldn’t remember. There were other claims being made
and they all seemed conceivable, even the most sinister, especially after I
spent a number of days researching all of your new and old web traces, the
chemtrails where you defended the fascist stances of some of the last
century’s poets and thinkers and retweeted alt􀀀right conspiracies. I had
been very preoccupied with our conversation for weeks afterward because I
hadn’t wanted to believe that you had swung so far to the right and I
needed some kind of proof to confirm it. I was also worried about the
potential, my potential, to follow you down this dark road if my worldview
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
65
somehow worsened. Everyone is capable of everything and we are all
unfinished masterpieces – some just get stuck. They can’t get beyond the
fear of the blank page, of the day, and they fill it with data that confirms
what they secretly or even unconsciously believe – or they have it filled in
for them. And this seems to be the real work, to insist on filling your days’
pages yourself and to not encroach upon anyone else’s rights to fill their
own. I felt like I knew something of your pain and your anger and even of
your fear on a cosmic level. But I refuse to believe your conclusions. In any
case, a part of me still preferred to not believe all the rumors I had heard
about you. I wanted to believe you had bought property in Brandenburg,
where you learned to take care of a cat, a dog and a cow. There was hope
that you were exploring a new life where you found love. In this daydream,
you still had a cellar stockpiled with food but it was to do some good in an
emergency as you believed in morals then food. I wanted to believe all this
in part to not have to look at my failure to fully understand why you had
ended up believing what you believed.
At first I had reason to think my vision had manifested. You came in
smiling, loud and friendly. You asked about my family and wondered
whether they had been impacted by the fire. When I told you about my
friends who had lost everything in Paradise, California, you expressed your
sorrow. You were affable, kind and genuinely interested in what I had been
doing since we last saw each other. But when I asked you about where you
were living the whole tenor of the conversation changed.
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
66
You were living in London and were only here for the weekend.
Some friends, who you refused to name, were holding a conference here on
occultism. I noticed then that something had changed. You mumbled more
and I was somehow less distraught when customers interrupted the
conversation than before – there were no withdrawal symptoms. Hard to
follow, I nevertheless ascertained that you considered yourself to be
hunted and that you weren’t the only one. There was a whole world being
suppressed by the mainstream media and at my bidding for more
explanation you changed the topic of conversation. Who was the person
who had ordered Ted Kaczynski’s Technological Slavery􀀀 Just some
customer I said, looking back at the reserve shelf, and you said you’d like to
speak to this person. Kaczynski was a prophet, you said. I asked if you still
planned to buy a shack and you said you were happy with the financial
possibilities in London. There was nothing more that you would say to this
except London was alive in comparison to Berlin. There was something
about your relationship to power that went unexpressed. You asked me if I
was reading anything I could recommend and it only occurred to me later
that this was a missed opportunity. Perhaps I could have suggested
something that propagated a different worldview from the one you
undoubtedly engendered and I could have tried to get more out of you.
Instead, I suggested a book I was immensely enjoying. You weren’t
impressed by my description. You pulled out a book from your knapsack
that was occupying you. The back matter was long and confusing and the
only words that I could hold onto were traditionalism, UFOs and human
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
67
evil. The word spirituality also caught my eye and when I asked whether
you were warming up to mindfulness, you laughed.
I didn’t join you. It no longer matted to me whether Silicon Valley
had botched the job like Flaubert’s scribes and failed to shrink their
collective amygdalas down to their rightful size, small enough to not be
worried about fleeing to New Zealand. I hadn’t either. The cigarettes last
night were proof enough and perhaps they had inspired others to search for
consciousness. I could see why George Mumford had been asked by Phil
Jackson to teach mindfulness to the Bulls to “help heal the team,” that
consciousness can lead to resolving the bleeding watercolors of personality
for seeing things as they are. The body as a body, feelings as feelings and
thoughts as thoughts. I can divorce myself from them through
consciousness. I can align myself with whatever is happening and my
interaction with it. I can lock in.
Funnily enough, technology can actually help with this training. My
teacher’s meditation CDs have been a great help in times of need and the
Warriors have used more advanced technology to help them lock in. As
Alex Hutchinson wrote in The New Yorker, the Warriors have made use of
advanced analytics, sport VU cameras, strobe goggles, brain􀀀zapping tDCS
headphones and intelligent sleep masks since Joe Lacob became the owner.
This has been done to enhance the play of the team and to restructure
team strategy. In that article, Hutchinson quotes the neurologist Heidi
Schambra, who notes􀀀 “tDCS may not merely trigger the placebo effect, as
all treatments do, but enhance it.” By enhancing the placebo effect, the
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
68
players can overcome their bodies and feelings and thoughts through the
beliefs the technology induces.
There are two ways to interpret this. Either the Warriors are
snuggling up to the cost􀀀benefit analysis of mindfulness or they see it as a
tool to help players achieve consciousness. Doing the latter does not
occlude performing well for specific goals. I believe the team’s use of
technology is not that of slavery, however, and that Kerr’s implementation
of the word mindfulness is more focused on consciousness since, for Kerr,
this term is about the team being aware not just in the games but also when
the players are at home. They should be locked in, conscious at every
opportunity.
As before, there had been another interruption in our conversation.
Someone was looking for Do Androids Dream of Electric Sheep􀀀 and you had
to go to your conference. I felt a tinge of regret when you left. There was so
much more I wanted to ask and understand and change. I did not
sympathize with anything you believed but I sympathized with you as a
human being, a very unpopular opinion. There was also a poem I had
wanted to show you, many times already in the past year and a half. Li
Shangyin’s “Not Poor􀀀 Indications􀀀”
Thoroughbreds sighing
Wax tears on candles
Chestnut shells
Lychee husks
Stacks of money, heaps of rice
Mother􀀀of􀀀pearl hairpins􀀀 abandoned
The jargon of orioles and swallows
Eddies of fallen blossoms
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
69
Songs sung atop a tall building
Books read aloud
Sounds of grinding medicine􀀀 rolling tea
- translated by Chloe Garcia Roberts
As a bad scribe, I had often been tempted to add a line􀀀 “Eyes unclouded
from lasers.” After all, you were right. Glasses totally suck.
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
70
Compassion
The calendar, temperature, setting, intentions, all of it, irrelevant. In this
scrambling of nows and then that begins with stale sweat in the morning, it
is always the same, an eternity of blanks and more blanks and numbness.
With a future that is wretched and spent or hopeless􀀀 out of a past that was
lousy and tough but tender, mutual. These are the parameters of yesterday
and today and tomorrow and it is unbearable. That it begins, the day, and
there is no way to escape it, even as the night gets further away and the
disbelief is fading. Ebbing into sadness. The sadness that was already there,
that never changes. That has stayed, a muddy mood, a cloudy emotional
landscape – heavy yet intangible. In this world and of it but also from
beyond. From going beyond, from leaving, that comes back every day with
the day, the day that cannot be denied or deferred or avoided. Not even
through sleep. Sleep only brings the next one closer, which means the day
that remains the same is still undefeated, unable to be outwitted or beaten.
Not that he can believe it. Lately, he has tried to outwit and beat the
undefeated day by moving very quickly, first thing in the morning, and it
has been ineffective yet invigorating for a while. To wake up and rub the
sleep out of his eyes then leave the house without eating breakfast or
brushing his teeth has made him smile. He is not going to let the day drag
him down, deeper into another trouncing. There is an optimistic precision
to this rushed sequence of leaving without proper care that the clock’s
correlated variance fails to convey. The clock may read 6􀀀14, 10􀀀07 or 11􀀀26
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
71
but it is always the same. He wakes up, rubs his eyes, changes his shirt and
drinks a glass of water before bouncing out of the house and sitting for
some stoic minutes in the driver’s seat, waiting for his carburetor to stop
clicking. When it does, he honks twice as he cautiously backs out of the
driveway, a habit his ex􀀀wife never liked, never understood. There should
be no need to lubricate the truck’s engine in the Bay Area’s Mediterranean
climate􀀀 they are not living in the deep tundra. Then the day before
yesterday she divined why he sits in the driveway, glumly burning excess
petrol. He doesn’t want to go where he is headed. He never used to leave so
slowly.
Day after day, she watches this sad scene through the cracked blinds
and waits for him to honk and evacuate her range of vision before letting
herself into his apartment. There is no need to use the key. In his
excitement, he always forgets to lock up after him. This annoys her more
than she would like to admit but she justifies being upset by staring at the
key to her apartment hanging next to the refrigerator, which is clearly
visible upon entry. So far she has stopped herself from removing her key or
mentioning his carelessness. After all, she is the one breaking into his
apartment and she doesn’t want to sound like she is scolding him. Then she
would have to deal with the consequences. Fragile, he might accuse her of
being intrusive and lash out like he used to, a habit he never grew out of.
Feeling attacked and attacking as retribution. Going on the offensive as the
best defensive strategy while distancing himself from his emotions. Not
present but not going away either. In any case, in his apartment, alone, she
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
72
turns off the lights and radio and television, then goes against her better
judgment and leaves his swelling mess of wrappers and bottles and
unwashed dishes ibidem. She is trying to mother him less from her side of
the duplex despite this difficult period and she knows him well enough to
not intrude. He could never handle what he called his space being invaded
just as much as he could never actuate the thought of leaving, of floating
alone in the space he said he needed. This is why she let him move in all
those years ago, though they broke up long before it. She knows this
arrangement is something the neighbors whisper about amongst
themselves but he almost always pays his rent on time and she likes having
him around. He is funny, good company and, in a way, family. She likes it.
Especially now. When he could use all the warmth that is given. Knowing all
this, she grapples with tolerance and sympathy and poise and almost feels
guilty for turning off the clashing voices from the radio and television for
her own benefit. Then she thinks of the price of it, for the environment,
this wasted electricity, light and vibrations. Besides, he never seems to
notice. He hasn’t mentioned it. She turns everything off and locks the door
on her way out. Then she texts him from her side of the shared wall, asking
if he needs anything from the supermarket. She doesn’t expect him to
answer. She will bring him a rotisserie chicken. It was always his favorite.
When he returns from the crime scene, hours later, he is impatient
and spaced out. He puts another bagged sandwich he couldn’t finish down
on the table then rotates the Venetian blinds’ levers to suspend the day’s
progression. This is when he begins to render the rooms and memories into
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
73
writings and charcoal drawings and to rifle through a shambolic archive of
printouts, clippings and sketches that have been acquired and preserved
and studied in the duplex’s semi􀀀darkness in order to establish the cause of
his misery with the same irrefutability as the laws of thermodynamics –
which he has dedicated himself to with increasing intensity. More than a
physicist or librarian or architect, however, his grief has made him an
author. The scenarios he has penned lack the conclusiveness of an
investigative paper or a blueprint for the future and are more reminiscent
of a Choose Your Own Adventure story, those destinies that can be
carefully elected and reversed by flipping through a preferred combination
of pages, events. The imagined tangibility of constructing an uncharred
future, of reversing the reconstructions of pathways and possible causes in
the warehouse’s labyrinth of alcoves and partitions, awards him the only
warmth he is willing to accept that doesn’t come from the spirits, the
whiskey he administers with each twist of the blinds as he shuts out just
enough of the afternoon light to simulate the morning.
Time is spent like this. Wanting to understand and change what
happened and failing to, being unable to. All he can do is suspend the day to
a time before, a time when everything was still possible. That and numb
himself, recreate. Write the pages where she survives the fire or those that
expose its origins. Regrettably, these latter pages have remained mostly
blank, scratched out or thrown away. The cause remains variable and
unsettled, unknown to him, the authorities or survivors. He is unable to
admit it, not even to himself, but early in the evening when the blinds are
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
74
still drawn and he is already inebriated, this open case gives him faith. If
there is nothing that started the fire, there is no fire. It is the next morning
and she is still alive. This conjecture never happens before his third glass of
bourbon, which is usually around the time he checks his phone and sees
that his ex has asked him to join them for dinner again. His reply an hour
after her text suggests he isn’t hungry but is grateful for the invitation.
Maybe tomorrow. She replies immediately that he’s welcome to come over
for leftovers if he changes his mind and there’s also something for him in
the fridge if he gets hungry later. He is annoyed that she entered his
apartment without asking. He thanks her again. He opens the bag that is
still full on the table and wolfs the cold pastrami sandwich from lunch,
leaving the crumbled bag on the table. There is no time to eat properly,
there is too much to unravel.
As the evening cools into darkness, he opens the blinds and turns on
the lights and radio and television. To experience how the newsrooms filter
the continuous stream of information into a dawning conclusion is what he
wants from them and is mostly disappointed. Two weeks prior, the
newsrooms reported on almost nothing except the event. Now they know
less about the fire than he does. It is repulsive to hear how their nightly
features have moved on to a world he is unable to consider, not now, never.
As time progresses it is as if everyone has forgotten what happened. The
one exception is a local newspaper, which still shows compassion for those
who died, the survivors. The other newspapers and television and radio
stations are all focused on other catastrophes, headlines and places of
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
75
conflict. On the world that is full of harms and needs and misdeeds. He
takes this to mean there is nothing special about this recent tragedy except
that it is his and yet, every other story leads him back to the pain he is
living. A world of trauma cannot be comprehended when you’re dealing
with your own.
Sitting at his desktop computer again, he opens the internet. The
browser’s autofill leads him to the memorial page where the tragedy is
remembered. He reads through some of the most recent entries and
considers writing something encouraging for the sorrowers he doesn’t
know. Something stops him. He doesn’t know what to say that hasn’t been
said already. It is difficult to not speak in platitudes. To not have a language
that is flat, plastic and cold when you feel flat, plastic and cold. When you
are alone. He drinks some more whiskey, which warms his organs, then
gauges the bottle’s progress. Another pour at most. At least he doesn’t
have to leave tonight to buy another bottle and risk getting a DUI. There is
one more in the cupboard and another under the sink, a strategy of
accumulation initiated on a previous day when he picked up his daily
sandwich at the supermarket’s deli. This has been the biggest change in the
past days of the week. As it has become more difficult to enter the tomb of
dreamless sleep, the numbing gift he is all too happy to receive, the amount
of alcohol required has expanded. Lately, after a bottle of whiskey, his face
is bloated in the morning and his calves are tight. It’s like he went on a long
trek through the redwoods and didn’t stretch before or after. In contrast to
much else, this is something old, familiar. He always had the habit of
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
76
kicking in his sleep with too much alcohol, a metronomic gesture of denial
or attempted escape that amounts to nothing. Only fog in the morning.
That has grown worse by staying exactly the same. The day.
The day bathes his face through the open blinds and he rubs the
sleep out of his eyes. He pours some magnesium powder into a glass of
water for his sore muscles and hangover. He is in another day with bad
breath and a sweat􀀀soaked T􀀀shirt and he gargles the orange flavored glass
of water. He changes his shirt to the one he wore the day before. Or is it
fresh, new􀀀 Smelling it, then putting it on, he notices that his shoulders are
sore from sleeping on the couch again. And again, he picks up his keys from
the table, warms up his truck in the perpetual morning and drives the five
miles from Piedmont to stare into the hole.
Today is the same even though it’s Christmas. This is a small miracle.
A miracle he is unable to witness since he is the one who is creating it. A
week ago, the lack of gravity on this festive day would have been cause for
celebration. He would have given anything to not feel totally wretched
during the holidays and this desire had been preceded by the fear the week
before, when he dreaded the possibility of the day ever coming into
existence. But now that he lives by another calendar, Christmas is just Day
23, as senseless as any other, and he is about to honk the horn when he sees
Luciano getting out of his car. He turns off the truck and greets him. He
plays it cool and acts as if he didn’t forget their plans to have lunch
together, says he couldn’t remember if they were supposed to meet at the
restaurant. Luciano doesn’t notice or mind and apologizes for not having a
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
77
present. Josh smiles, doesn’t care. He doesn’t have a present either. Back
when Christmas was special, this was a tradition, their getting together and
not giving gifts. It had always been enough to just spend the holidays
together but then she was still there and Luciano and Troy were still
together. Luciano hops in.
Without Donna there, they are here now, in a Vietnamese restaurant
in East Oakland. The kind of place whose laminated images of numbered
dishes has faded and warped into a single soupy reality, no longer
distinguishable or comprehensible, from time’s unvanquished transition.
They’re talking about her final services again, which they had attended
together in Chico. Josh is playing back the reverend’s impressions of the
flower arrangements, the blossoms in the darkness. He is going into great
detail, transfixed on the purple thistles mixed with the white roses at the
entrance. This is another moment stuck on repeat, a scratch in the CD, that
cannot be skipped without losing the whole tenor of the dirge he is forced
to endure. Luciano listens. He is still troubled by Donna’s death and by
what it has done to his dear, living friend and he tries to dampen the
impact of reality with encouragement that Josh doesn’t hear.
When their soups arrive, Josh reveals out of nowhere why her body
was identified before all the others. It was her recent DUI, her fingerprints
in the criminal justice system. It escapes automatically, as if he were only a
medium for the words that need to be spoken.
“Do you want to go see it􀀀”
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
78
Luciano is shocked. The two of them have synchronized thoughts.
He agrees and they leave, their soups barely eaten.
On their way to Fruitvale, Josh jokes he could do this drive in his
sleep. Luciano laughs even though it isn’t funny. Josh has the ticket to
prove it.
Out in front of what remains of the Ghost Ship, Josh recreates the
situation for the thousandth time, indicating the approximate location of
makeshift rooms as well as pointing at the telephone pole the warehouse’s
power was stolen from. He explains what he has learned about electricity
and fires and how the people were trapped in the smoke on the second
floor. Other sorrowers Josh knows listen then inform him of the latest
developments. They had heard from someone inside the investigation that
the fire almost undoubtedly started in the sound system. This would mean
the music killed them, a possibility Josh had failed to consider in all the
different schemes he had worked through in the evenings, the faulty
sockets, frayed cords and antique lamps that were, he had been sure, the
most likely culprits. As Josh takes this new information in, someone relays
something from another source􀀀 none of this would have happened had the
sound technician not been so negligent. If he had had better control of the
board, everyone would still be living. Luciano blushes. He finds this hard to
believe. The technician, Barrett, was a friend and Luciano had entrusted
him with the soundboard for his own concerts on a number of occasions.
Barrett had always been very attentive to Luciano’s needs as a performer
and to the space they were in. The other sorrowers backpedal and
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
79
apologize. They know Barrett had also lost his life. Maybe he wasn’t fully
aware of the danger. Maybe that asshole, the space’s main tenant, didn’t
inform him of the warehouse’s limitations. One sorrower says they’ll just
have to wait for the official reports before anything is certain. This is what
Josh is afraid of. It makes him restless and angry, impotent. What Josh
needs is a sense of certainty. Not the countless situations his gray space
has painted as to why she couldn’t escape the smoke􀀀filled corridors, the
corridors that became her lungs.
Grief searches for firmness in the haze of whys and what ifs yet every
piece of evidence has melted into more questions, a darkness that cannot
be interpreted. Why couldn’t the fire station, a block away, stop the blaze
in time to save their lives􀀀 And why weren’t there more fire extinguishers
in a space that had been haunted by small fires in the past􀀀 Most
importantly􀀀 why had the party been here at all􀀀 Other sorrowers had said
the Ghost Ship was the third choice for a venue and Josh was certain that
the label, 100􀀀 Silk, would have approached him first if he still had his
space. If only he still had his space. This would have never have happened.
Of that he was certain. His fiancée would still be here. If only. What if.
On December 2, 2016, thirty􀀀six people lost their lives in the Ghost
Ship warehouse fire in Fruitvale, California. Those who died at an
electronic music party were teachers, musicians, poets, students,
publishers, jewelry designers, healers, artists, technicians, baristas and
music lovers. Daughters and neighbors, sons and lovers, these community
members were eulogized by their fellows and family members in the Bay
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
80
Area and beyond as well by the international media, who took greater
interest in this story than in previous conflagrations in clubs like The
Station, Club Colectiv, Wuwang Club, or Kiss where one hundred, twenty􀀀
seven, forty􀀀three and 238 people died in the years 2003, 2015, 2008 and
2013. While there are many potential reasons for this, some more charitable
to the newsrooms than others – like the fact that the tragedy in Oakland
was not caused by pyrotechnics, a flirting with danger that occurred in
West Warwick, Bucharest, Shenzen and Santa Maria – the follow􀀀up
articles streaming in for weeks suggested that the Ghost Ship fire
illuminated a murky aspect of contemporary living, the relationship
between housing and city development. That is, the vulnerability and
eventual death of these community members crystallized an obscured
sediment of the much discussed problem of gentrification􀀀 although it is
clear that people of diverse classes, ethnicities, races, sexualities, languages
and points of view have to go somewhere when they are pushed out and
replaced by a homogenized group in the so􀀀called “cleaned up”
neighborhoods in the center of a city, the dangerous conditions in which
they subsequently congregate and live are not often depicted. Those who
are forced to leave become even more invisible, forcibly so.
For me, there was another shading that accounted for this fire being
spotlighted by the newspapers. It was the incredibly awful and cruel irony
that those who lost their lives were what the newsrooms called “free
spirits,” a nomenclature whose generic use today is primarily designated
for people who are enslaved, economically speaking. The repeated
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
81
application of this term by news anchors, radio talk show hosts and beat
writers was particularly assiduous since most of the media outlets
manacled the fire victims to the biological scripts some were trying to
escape. In most of their reporting, there were hes and shes and nothing in
between, no they or we. With the biological error of birth following them
into the beyond, their friends and survivors were angry that the news
denied these “free spirits” the right to exist outside the normative project,
even in death. Admitting their callousness, the media redacted these
pronouns in their online articles and acknowledged the transitions some of
the victims had been making into bodies and genders they were learning to
be more comfortable with. Quick to change this, the media also swiftly
shifted their emphasis from displays of empathy to finger pointing and
investigation.
Who was to blame for the fire􀀀 In retrospect, anyone looking at
pictures of the Ghost Ship’s interior would say a fire was inevitable. Its
ramshackle assemblage of quick􀀀work wooden structures – rooms and
nooks stuffed with old pianos and wooden dressers, sofas and baskets,
prayer flags, rugs and paper lanterns – was a labyrinthine tinderbox, a
death trap with hidden exits. Many of the rooms and structures within the
warehouse were illegally built and authorities had previously scrutinized
the Ghost Ship for unpermitted interior construction as well as for zoning
issues. Officially, the warehouse hosted a number of artist studios, which,
unofficially, was the primary residence of some of the artists who worked
there and who helped to pay the rent by hosting illegal parties like the night
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
82
of the fire. Again􀀀 who was to blame for the fire􀀀 The warehouse owners􀀀
The main tenant􀀀 Or the residents􀀀
Before the criminal justice system determined that the only two
persons to be charged with manslaughter would be the main tenant Derick
Almena and the tattoo artist 􀀀 creative director 􀀀 occasional Ghost Ship
rent collector Max Harris, and not the owner of the warehouse, Chor Ng, or
her adult children who acted as property managers, culpability was even
flung at the organizers, the artists from 100􀀀 Silk, who booked the event at
the Ghost Ship, a venue that remained secret until the day of the show.
This was in spite of the fact that two of 100􀀀 Silk’s artists, Chelsea Faith
Dolan 􀀀Cherushii􀀀 and Johnny Igaz 􀀀Nackt􀀀, lost their lives in the fire. Why
would they host a party in a bonfire construction􀀀 Didn’t they see that an
accident was highly likely if not fated􀀀 “It’s a complete tragedy,” the
cofounder of the label 100􀀀 Silk, Amanda Brown, told L.A. Weekly when
asked why the artists on her label would play at a space like the Ghost Ship,
“but I absolutely understand what led these people to that particular venue.
We’ve all tried to find interesting and open􀀀minded galleries around the
country for our community to play in 􀀀but􀀀 it’s incredibly hard in cities like
Los Angeles and the Bay 􀀀Area􀀀 and New York to find shows for artists of
this size and this type … there’s no infrastructure for electronic music to
have these safe spaces … 􀀀It􀀀 has nothing to do with these artists being
unsafe or these artists wanting to be dangerous or to be put in dangerous
situations.”
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
83
As the crown of blame was passed from one anxious head to another,
authorities worked to ensure that another tragedy like this would never
occur. In the name of public safety, municipalities, lost in their own maze
of policies and procedures, shut down buildings that did not meet
previously established regulations. Simultaneously, the municipalities
worked to expand and sharpen such codes, to increase their scrutiny and
ability to establish accountability. With the stated aim of protecting
citizens and keeping them from potentially disastrous circumstances,
municipalities veiled and􀀀or fed into predatory market machinations that
cause the displacement of those who had already been living in the
margins. By forcing warehouses that serve as living􀀀working spaces to close
in cities like Oakland, Denver, Baltimore, Los Angeles, Richmond and
Fresno because of the more strictly enforced regulations, communities that
have limited resources cannot meet these fire, building and planning codes.
They have run out of alternatives, such that they have either been forced
into spaces that are even more treacherous and secretive and unknown or
out onto the street – something the S.P.A.Z. Collective literalized by
hosting a commemorative procession for the Ghost Ship victims on
Oakland’s boulevards. As more spaces become impossible in further cities,
some may even envy the dead. At least they will be exempt from the
troubles to come. After all, where are we supposed to go􀀀
This was my question for Luciano when we spoke the day after
Christmas and it was a question that had been haunting me like a pulled
muscle for months. Never totally incapacitating, only inhibiting, there, I
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
84
mumbled these words whenever I stared at the internet or rode my bike
through the neighborhood, looking for signs. I felt the strain every time I
opened the real estate portal immobilienscout24.de or read an email
Melanie forwarded me for an overpriced apartment in a district we have no
connection to, far from work and her family, our friends. We had been
searching for an apartment for seven months in the city that had morphed
from being “arm aber sexy” into “Startup City 􀀀FreiheitBerlin,” and we had
repeatedly found nothing. The open houses were inundated by countless
applicants queuing up in the stairwell as well as swelling the sweaty fourth
floor walkup apartment within􀀀 and ads were taken down minutes after
their posting. Worst of all, rental agencies now preferred to renovate flats
and rent them at the current market value, which was up some 60􀀀 in the
past four years, instead of allowing their current tenants to find Nachmieter
to take the apartment over in its current physical and financial conditions.
In times like these, one turns to one’s circles, both inner and concentric as
well as overlapping or adjacent, but the personal leads we had, had
vanished. Now people hunkered down like hermit crabs whose shells were
too small in a wasteland of algae or they lived alone in minor palaces – the
four room apartment they had shared for more than half a decade with
their recent ex was not insignificantly cheaper than renting a newly
renovated two room place today. With time, this blockage of natural
development, of life being able to change with changing circumstances for
all but the extremely liquid, had begun to press on me. As we stood in line
on another Sunday morning with another dozen well groomed couples who
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
85
were pre􀀀approved applicants for an expensive apartment that was on the
small side for our needs, I would look around and implore in an almost
choral lamentation􀀀 where are we supposed to go􀀀
I don’t know, Luciano said, I don’t know. But I can’t afford to stay in
the City. It was getting so desperate that after his next temporary station in
Crockett he was considering moving away from the Bay Area entirely.
Where would you go, I asked. He had dreams of moving to the desert’s
expanses or to the crisp mornings of the mountains, neither of which was
financially tenable without changing his profession. Sure, he could
compose in these places but gigs would be few and far between and mostly
far. You could come to Berlin, I said, and sublet my rent􀀀controlled studio
if Melanie and I find a place of our own. When, I corrected myself, when we
get the right one. Luciano laughed. I was always trying to convince him to
move to Berlin. He was considering New York. It was expensive but there
were more opportunities. Choices. Roads to be taken.
This is where we also reach a crossroads. A point in my own Choose
Your Own Adventure story where I could speculate on how migration
patterns and habitation will continue to change with an analysis of data or
by reading the tealeaves to see what the influence on movement will be
from future market crashes, environmental disasters or war – or even just a
prolongation of what we already know about the richest of the rich owning
more than half of the world’s wealth and increasingly more 􀀀currently, 42
individuals possess more wealth than 3.7 billion of the world’s poorest􀀀. I
am hesitant to follow this fork as it inevitably leads to distress and despair,
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
86
which I would like to renounce, and so I will. As an alternative, I could
make a diagram for the world I want to live in, where there are no binaries,
no separations, and everyone is regarded as being that which they are,
human. Different and equal, people would show one another respect and
there would be no poverty or homelessness as everyone would receive
housing and a universal income. Work would be encouraged, especially in
the fields of construction, entertainment, education and food production,
not because wages would be needed to make ends meet or there would be
no machines 􀀀although these would be limited to electric vehicles and cars
for individual use would be all but abandoned􀀀, but because it would help
develop respect for life and living and growth. These jobs that would not be
jobs would not be fixed, there would be a continuous and permanent
transformation in a setting that would bring people together for a common
goal􀀀 and there would be nothing that divided them after the whistle blows.
With interaction and play as points of emphasis, this fork would show some
of this population’s advanced systems of leisure. They would be expressed
with a definition of love that is not possessive. Spiritual growth would be
encouraged and the only things that wouldn’t be are all forms of war.
Eliminating fear would be the society’s main preoccupation as this would
also eliminate greed and hate and envy and pride and laziness. All of this
would take place in a setting of collaged landscapes, built from all the places
I love, and we would have figured out a way to undo the ecological harm. If
I decided to really go for it, I would insert extinct species and revert the
climate to pre􀀀industrial revolution levels. I could do and have done this
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
87
but I have felt stymied in my efforts. Every possible world I’ve created and
erased or thrown away has sounded more like a utopian manifesto dressed
up as a novel, a fictional portrayal where social justice is real. While this
hope in a better future has been necessary for survival, now it feels
defeatist to give in to the temptations of fiction. After all, there are more
hazards in the world than the obstacles sculpted on a golf course and there
is no guarantee we wouldn’t pollute this seemingly perfect place with our
unaddressed negativity, the violence and complexes we’ve inherited and
live with, deep below the surface, as if nothing else were true.
Perhaps then these pages should turn away from literature. They
could resemble a lecture, a paper that could be delivered to a small group of
artists and urban planners and pensioners in some metropolitan or
provincial city on an invitation that has nothing to do with the subject
matter and that I would commandeer by my inner need to respond to our
current reality despite not being an expert, something I despise and find
risky, since innovation often comes from unexpected places. In this lecture,
it would be useful to sketch a number of economic developments – such as
the expansion of the gig economy, the increase of monopolization in online
business as well as the subprime mortgage crisis in 2008 – as a better
understanding of our position in a broader context is the first step to
creating strategies to change it. As this would be worthy of a lecture itself, I
might instead shuttle directly to how gentrification plays out in a city. If I
were stick with the Bay Area – I mustn’t – I could begin with a quote by
Rebecca Solnit who writes that San Francisco unfolds “like a big, beautiful
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
88
primer in real estate law.” This could then trace how legislation has
changed and changed again. It could draw on firsthand accounts from long􀀀
term residents, friends of mine who grew up or have lived in San Francisco
for decades and who report that the City is unlivable for all except the
extremely wealthy. Admittedly, this shouldn’t remain anecdotal. A lecture
proposes to be scientific. Thus, the lecture could look at how the number of
evictions steadily rose until the City either became more aware of this
disastrous situation or there were fewer people to throw out on the streets.
It could then look at the changes that will be made after Proposition C was
passed in November 2018, which adds a business tax to fund homeless
services in the City. Cautious of entering speculation, of reading the
tealeaves, especially since this proposition is likely to go to court, we could
occupy ourselves with the past and follow developments in the process of
gentrification in places like the Tenderloin or those that came before it,
such as the Dog Patch and China Town and the Mission. We could spend
countless, invaluable pages charting the evictions of residents and small
businesses of people of color and we could contrast this with the number of
venture capitalist firms that moved into the City with other startups. If we
did this, I would be tempted, off􀀀script, to mention that the City hasn’t
become unlivable in the past fifteen years. There were other generations
that had the same feeling. My great􀀀grandparents from the Georgian side,
for instance, left the Russian Hills in the 1960s out of frustration with a city
that was developing without them. Each generation of my family fled
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
89
further down the 680 until my parents ended up in San Jose, the city I was
born in, which we had to leave, feeling pushed out for a number of reasons.
Perhaps then we should abandon the City and look at how
gentrification has survived in other places in other eras under different
aliases. I would begin with a quote from Karl Marx’s Capital􀀀
“’Improvements’ of towns, accompanying the increase of wealth, by the
demolition of badly built quarters, the erection of palaces for banks,
warehouses, 􀀀c., the widening of streets for business traffic, for the
carriages of luxury, and for the introduction of tramways, 􀀀c., drive away
the poor into even worse and more crowded hiding places.” Or since the
name Karl Marx has an air of indoctrination, I might instead open with a
quote from Felix Guattari’s Three Ecologies􀀀 “just as monstrous and mutant
algae invade the lagoon of Venice, so our television screens are populated,
saturated, by ‘degenerate’ images and statements. In the field of social
ecology, men like Donald Trump are permitted to proliferate freely, like
another species of algae, taking over entire districts of New York and
Atlantic City􀀀 he ‘redevelops’ by raising rents, thereby driving out tens of
thousands of poor families, most of whom are condemned to homelessness,
becoming the equivalent of the dead fish of the environmental ecology.” If
this lecture were delivered in some medium􀀀sized auditorium, this quote
would probably get a good response from the public if I paired it with an
appropriate image, perhaps a meme of Homer Simpson. And as I write this,
I can already hear a few people quietly laughing in the auditorium. What
would those chuckles mean􀀀 Irony􀀀 Or fear being sublimated􀀀
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
90
At any rate, I would click through a series of images in this section of
the lecture. Diagrams of Georges􀀀Eugène Hausmann’s restructuring of
Paris, gifs of algae growth or demolitions of casinos, scans of eviction
notices, poster slogans at demonstrations. Legalese like eminent domain,
adverse possession and implied trust would have to be explained as well as
breach of lease and committing a nuisance. The temptation would be to
look at similar situations in London, Cape Town, São Paolo, Tokyo and Tel
Aviv and chart the animated protests against the feeling of hopelessness.
Given time restrictions, however, this could only be mentioned in passing.
And so, even if I stuck with the city I have lived in for more than a decade,
which is losing the battle with gentrification in spite of 􀀀ineffective􀀀
legislation and numerous orderly protests, I can already hear a detractor
asking whether gentrification is inherently evil. There are cleaner streets,
safer neighborhoods and better education that would speak in its favor.
This would be where we would argue. Or could argue. Since few are
ever convinced by the other’s argument in such sessions, given that dignity
and pride are on the line much more than finding a communal truth, I
would not mention that I agree with Sarah Schulman’s assessment of
gentrification, that it has negative consequences for those who are pushed
out of a house and a neighborhood and a city as well as for those who
annex the territory. Whenever everything is pasteurized, an internal
replacement alienates people from the concrete process of social and
artistic change. I would reminisce on the years I spent in Neukölln with
artists and filmmakers and DJs and dancers and poets from Athens,
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
91
Bologna, Valencia, Reykjavik, Porto and Cork where the same conversation
was taking place in a number of languages in all the bars with half􀀀torn
wallpaper – “how much do you pay for rent􀀀” Our quest for freedom had
become tattling about prices, a constant reminder of our shackles.
The argument wouldn’t be worth it. I would prefer instead to roll up
my sleeves and get down to business, the real point of the lecture. I would
then read a quote by Guattari􀀀 “at every level, individual or collective, in
every day life as well as the reinvention of democracy 􀀀concerning town
planning, artistic creation, sport, etc.􀀀, it is a question in each instance of
looking into what would be the dispositives of the production of
subjectivity, which tends towards an individual and􀀀or collective
resingularization, rather than that of mass􀀀media manufacture, which is
synonymous with distress and despair.” This quotation is a sentence worth
re􀀀reading and I would re􀀀read it. “At every level, individual or collective,
in every day life as well as the reinvention of democracy 􀀀concerning town
planning, artistic creation, sport, etc.􀀀, it is a question in each instance of
looking into what would be the dispositives of the production of
subjectivity, which tends towards an individual and􀀀or collective
resingularization, rather than that of mass􀀀media manufacture, which is
synonymous with distress and despair.” I would let this quote stand and
then mention that this distress and despair is something many of us have
failed to escape, either because of missing dispositives, bureaucratic
hindrances or shitty conditions, like those the victims of the Ghost Ship
fire suffered in when they attended a “safe space” that obviously wasn’t
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
92
safe. Here would be a way out of the labyrinth of the Choose Your Own
Adventure story. Not towards an exit, a happy end, but towards the
entrance. The page with the Guattari quote, the end of the lecture, would
only have one alternative at the bottom of the page, “Turn to page 87.” On
this page would be the real source of the fire, the words that aren’t words,
that are almost commandments􀀀 “2002􀀀 AB 1941 􀀀 S 2633.”
The top of this page would be the end of the story. Or what
legislators at the state and federal levels thought would be. Both the “Anti􀀀
Rave” Bill, AB 1941 in California, and S 2633 of the US Senate, the Reducing
Americans’ Vulnerability to Ecstasy Act, the “R.A.V.E. Act,” aimed to ban
warehouse parties, “raves,” as a continuation of America’s war on drugs
and the crack house law of the 1980s. Had AB 1941 or S 2633 passed, they
would have required electronic dance promoters to undergo a vague and
burdensome permit acquisition process, whereby a promoter would have to
present evidence before a permit’s issuance that the promoter was
sufficiently knowledgeable about illegal drugs and drug paraphernalia.
Included in S 2633’s understanding of drug paraphernalia was bottled
water, which was sold or given away at the bars of the sweaty and poorly
ventilated warehouses. Through the twisted logic of bottled water –
premise 1􀀀 drugs cause dehydration􀀀 premise 2􀀀 rave promoters know this􀀀
premise 3􀀀 rave promoters sell bottled water􀀀 premise 4􀀀 rave promoters
want to combat dehydration􀀀 conclusion􀀀 rave promoters know that drugs
are being consumed at their parties, otherwise they wouldn’t sell bottled
water – the Senate wanted to give law enforcement the power to shut down
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
93
raves by expanding the notion of probable cause to save “American youth”
from being “exploited” by the rave promoters. That is, if an officer, armed
with the above logic of probable cause, saw bottles of water being given
away or sold at a warehouse, he could shut the party down and the
promoter would be held accountable for endangering the public.
The rave community considered itself lucky when these bills were
shut down through grass roots effort and with the help of organizations like
the ACLU, yet these proposed pieces of legislation established the
foundation for 2003’s Illicit Drug Anti􀀀Proliferation Act, which was
enacted when it was tacked on to the PROTECT ACT that included the
AMBER Alert System for child abduction. Although not as egregious, the
Illicit Drug Anti􀀀Proliferation Act nevertheless made rave promoters liable
for the actions of their patrons and this was, paradoxically, detrimental to
their safety. Previously, larger warehouse parties featured on􀀀site medics
and drug testing stations that could determine whether there were any
lethal substances mixed in with the illicit drugs. After this bill passed
however, such medics and drug stations would suggest that the promoters
were aware of drugs being consumed at their parties and they could thus be
shut down and penalized for these infractions. Seeing as rave promoters
were not naïve and didn’t want to be held accountable for the drug
consumption they surely knew was taking place, they were forced to turn a
blind eye to reality. Instead of making medical aid for those who had been
unfortunate enough to overdose on drugs that could no longer be tested for
their safety, promoters began throwing these people out on the streets,
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
94
afraid of the legal consequences for themselves and all those who were still
inside and maybe on drugs, who would be in no condition to drive
themselves home. The authorities were thus successful in disbanding large
raves. No one was willing to risk playing the game but small parties
continued to exist up until the night of the Ghost Ship. The only difference
being that all the safety nets had been removed.
These pigheaded legislative acts were not born in a vacuum. They
were the authorities’ slow response to the steady growth of unauthorized
spaces over more than a decade. With its humble origins at the Full Moon
parties on the beaches of San Francisco, the Bay Area rave scene ballooned
by the mid 1990s into countless crews and “massives” that hosted
thousands upon thousands. For years, crews like Feel Good, Funky Tekno
Tribe and Silver Pearl Records welcomed “ravers” to locations like 659
Hegenberger, the Oakland International Rave Center or “Home Base.”
These wild, unregulated parties bypassed the city’s planning or zoning
divisions, which ensured that buildings met required fire and building code
and that the plumbing and electrical works were properly functioning. At
some point, city hall became aware of the danger such venues posed and
insisted that the building owners bring the buildings up to code. When
these owners were unwilling or unable to pay for the retrofitting and
improved ventilation, the first death knell on nightlife in the Bay Area was
a moratorium placed on New Year’s Day in 2000.
And so, our exit through the entrance enters another labyrinth. It
circles into the nights after the moratorium, when raves incorporated a
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
95
number of safety mechanisms, physical forms of encryption. If you were
given a flyer at a party for another party a week or two later, you would
find a telephone number at the bottom, the beeper of one of the organizers.
You would be informed on the answering machine what record stores
carried presale tickets. While the recordings early in the week were
interjected with a mix of beats, the message on the day of the event would
be simple􀀀 go to this location across from that gas station or fast food chain
between 10 PM and midnight. There, some member of the crew would size
you up and ask if you already had a ticket. It didn’t really matter whether
you did or not, the important thing was that they didn’t think you were an
undercover cop. If you were in a car full of ravers, you never got turned
away. But should the promoters be particularly careful, you would get sent
to another location, another parking lot or gas station, and go through the
same level of scrutiny. Sometimes this would have up to four iterations and
you might be led to a location in Oakland, across the Bay Bridge, the same
bridge you entered thinking the party was in the City. Eventually, you
would slither through this labyrinth of checkpoints and arrive at the final
location. The warehouse was often a shared space, with artist studios on
the ground floor and living spaces above it. When you entered the
decorated room through the warehouse door, you would be happy and a
little edgy. Perhaps an undercover agent had slipped through the cracks
and would disband everything, right after you took a pill of ecstasy. Or even
worse􀀀 right before. Would you go to jail if you still had it in your pocket􀀀
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
96
And what would you do if you didn’t􀀀 If you had already taken it􀀀 No one
would be in the condition to guide you to safety…
None of this was necessary, of course. If you weren’t interested in
this sometimes frustrating game of cover up, there were still the other
parties, the ones that obeyed the law at the 21􀀀 clubs. But these all ended
just as the collective experience was beginning to take hold. And at two in
the morning, that was the last thing we wanted.
What we wanted was to wear bands of aqua, pink and antique
fuchsia, to be armed with mail sleeves of plastic that clattered like
rattlesnakes as we snaked around Jack London Square to warehouses
where peaceful warriors, dressed in wigs and wings, wore pants whose cuffs
were twice the size of their waist. Blowing on whistles in rhythm with the
beat, we wanted to wear orange and green security vests as well as bike
lights, visors and white T􀀀shirts that lit up in the black lights. Dancing in
jeans and bras or bright shirts that matched our Elmo or Teletubby
backpacks, we descended from a number of races and places and we were
drag queens and gender benders and straight and gay and old and young.
Admittedly, we were mostly young and when we were there, we seemed
even younger when we sucked on lollipops and pacifiers like children. We
also seemed to be from another planet or an apocalypse scenario when we
wore gasmasks coated in Vicks VapoRub. Some of us also rubbed this
medicinal concoction on our genitals as we danced without inhibition,
playing with the music’s hypnotic rhythms with our bodies, our bodies that
emitted light while we explored the outer limits of our consciousness. Like
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
97
the poet John Wieners writes, we wanted to be “infinite particles of the
divine sun, now 􀀀 worshipped in the pitch of night” and we wanted to meet
friends and potential friends in a space where the day’s negativity was left
with the bouncer at the door. We wanted to sublimate any potential
negativity through a handshake, a neon potlatch where we would exchange
our beads, the “candy bracelets” on our arms, in an act of PLUR, our
mantra and battle cry, which stood for Peace, Love, Unity and Respect.
These were the words we lived by while the bass rearranged our cells at
night and it was the foundation of our attempt to build a compassionate
community that stood in contradistinction to the competitive worldview
we were forced to endure during the week. It was a disruption from the
normal social relations, of the billions of mes. We were among others and
we celebrated this but we were also, somehow, one.
This experience was presided over by the DJs, demigods or shamans,
who channeled the flow of energy, sculpting seamless structures of beats
faster than the human’s embryonic heartbeat. The intense bass, staccato
breaks and occasional uplifting melodies were joined by green lasers
temporarily etching tribal patterns into the warehouse walls as well as fog
machines, strobe lights and video screens with primitive computer
animations of aliens and anime figures, dolphins and digital worlds,
fractals. Intoxicated by the music and the lights, in a deep state of trance
and Sufi􀀀like spinning, we threw our arms to the heavens or moved them in
complex patterns with glow sticks. We were covered in sweat, eyes rolling
back, inward. The space was sexually charged but it wasn’t intended for
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
98
cruising. There was sex and yet it remained inconsequential, only
interesting to those engaged in it. Just as age, gender, race and orientation
were given and unable to divide us. There was no division, no time. We
were time. In it. Of it. The flow.
Naturally, the drugs made this easy. They helped us circumnavigate
the blockades life set in front of us by altering our chemical settings. At
raves, the most common drugs of choice were LSD, mushrooms, ketamine,
weed, GHB, cocaine, methamphetamines and poppers. Most common of all
was MDMA, also known as ecstasy or X or E or Molly, which increases the
release of the neurotransmitters serotonin, dopamine and norepinephrine
– all things that occur naturally during activities like playing sports. The
effects of ecstasy include an increase in empathy, euphoria and heightened
sensations, and the drug does this so emphatically and potently that even
nonbelievers of this collective experience find themselves reeling and
reaching out to others whom they would normally hesitate to interact with.
Taking ecstasy, there were times when I had difficulties discerning the
difference between others and myself as we soldered ourselves together in
an e􀀀pool on some mattress. There were times when I could feel all of my
hair follicles vibrate from the bass, times when I would forget my own
name, and times when I could empathize with, well, everything. I could
demonstrate compassion for the prejudices and mistakes of others and
explain them away as something they just had to experience and work
through. This might be true but the lessons learned on drugs don’t always
translate into a normal waking state and the payback for synthetically
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
99
eliciting this wisdom as well as these kinds of experiences can be a bitch.
Take the drug too often and the connection you feel to others is weakened
then ripped out from under you when the effects wear off, only to be
replaced by sluggishness and despair. While this might sound like a fair
trade off, the natural conclusion of an Icarus􀀀like climbing to new heights,
the initial deliciousness of an increase of neurotransmitters after taking
ecstasy is followed by a short􀀀term decrease in them that only becomes
longer. The comedown and “cracked out” “day after” became, for me at
least, a week of depression. During these days of barely being able to drag
myself out of bed, empathy would turn into antipathy, euphoria into
misery, heightened sensations into concrete. This would last until the next
party. And then􀀀 da capo􀀀 Fortissimo􀀀 Con fuoco􀀀
Raves weren’t just about the drugs though. For the year and a half I
went to raves before experimenting with ecstasy, I was drawn to the power
of sound and vision, the carnivalesque humor and chaos that implicated
even wallflowers. Its power and intensity propelled me further into an
alternative universe of families, tribes and communities. It was a large
group of people seeking something counter to the “normal” order of things,
an intensity invoking other intensities, to form new existential
configurations.
An intimation of this experimentation with social relations
presented itself to me at my first party, a Halloween massive at 85 􀀀
Baldwin in 1997 – just a few minutes away from the Oracle Arena where the
Golden State Warriors play. I was fifteen years old and had gotten a ride
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
100
from the only raver in my school, my friend Sarah. For the three and half
hour drive from South Lake Tahoe, her main occupation aside from telling
me which mixtape she wanted to hear on the windy portion of the road into
the foothills was making me nervous. I might not get in, she said, even
though my ghoulish appearance was convincing. There was no age limit for
the party yet my baby face made me look much younger than my mature
age of fifteen. I was taking a big risk, she said, and she wondered out loud
what I would do alone, wandering around the streets of Oakland until
dawn, which she gladly assured me were dangerous. Terrified, with these
words ringing in my ear at the door, I entered the warehouse without even
a question from the doorman. I was convinced it was my costume that was
convincing but it was probably the fact that I had a presale ticket.
Nevertheless, as the night wore on, I was convinced my conviction was
correct since a number of strangers complimented me on my outfit,
especially on my realistic looking makeup. Dressed in a black Misfits T􀀀
shirt and black pants, I was too embarrassed to tell them that the dark rings
under my eyes weren’t mascara or face paint, that they were factual black
eyes, planted on me by the fist of a “friend” the day before. It was hard to
admit that this brown belt in taekwondo had punched me three times in the
face to prove his manliness and straightness to a group of boys who
accused us of being lovers but I would learn over time that I should have
told the story. My tale would have been met with interest and compassion
from strangers. They would have empathized with the fact that I had been
suspended from school for “instigating” his homophobic rage by repeating
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
101
the words he taunted me with while I had my hands in my pockets. I know
this because when I would later begin to experiment with chemicals – in
part to discover whether or not I really was the “faggot” everyone including
my parents believed me to be – I would tell this story and the unflinching
answer would be a hug or a shoulder rub, a candy bracelet and a sip of
water. If my interlocutor was older and homosexual, they might even offer
some advice for how to deal with a closed, intolerant culture. No matter
who they were, they would radiate understanding.
It wasn’t long after this initiation that I found myself in a crew of
philosophers and Wicca witches, all of whom were older and lived in the
Sacramento Valley. The momentousness of this extended family, with its
inner and concentric and overlapping circles, cannot be understated, not
only because of the laughter and joy we shared over the years as well as all
the hardships we endured, but because we tried to break away from what
we felt was destroying us, the outside world that seemed alien, together. It
was our mostly unformulated desire to organize new political and social
practices, new solidarities and gentleness, together with new aesthetic and
analytic practices regarding the formation of the minds and souls and
hearts and bodies. The first order of business was creating a matriarchal
society, with Terri and Dina as our regents, and then work through the
differences of pagan and analytic philosophies, seeking intersections.
Against strict classifications, we loved industrial, goth, rave, Britpop and
punk and as we learned more about one another over the years, about our
backgrounds and aspirations and fears, our initial dedication and softness
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
102
developed into true love. Whenever we tried to transfer these lessons to
our daily lives, however, their incompatibility only created a binary
between ravers and non􀀀ravers. At some point we began to experience
what Guattari had already warned against in the 1980s􀀀 “as experiments in
the suspension of meaning they are risky, as there is the possibility of a
violent deterritorialization which would destroy the assemblage of
subjectification.” To combat this, we tried to establish a collective and
individual subjectivity that went beyond the limits of individualization with
its inherent stagnation and closure but we were unable to contain the
entropic rise of a dominant subjectivity, also known as the real world.
Thus, just as the parties were becoming less expansive, no longer
featuring different rooms for trance, techno, house, ambient and drum and
bass that, accordingly, brought together different groups of people with
different tastes to congregate in the same warehouse, we began to crack
under the weight of normalcy. Around the time the scene began to feel like
the Flying Dutchman – that famed ghost ship condemned to the open seas,
disallowed from ever setting anchor – as it moved further from the city
centers, deeper into forests and wastelands and undesignated or
unregulated spaces where there was nothing, no infrastructure, that could
be recognized as a true venue, we admitted defeat and chalked these years
of partying up to youthful excesses. With crews like Sweet, Feel Good and
Epiphany all unwilling or unable to pay for the fines for a busted party or
the costs of generators, we all focused on our lives outside the warehouses
we knew and loved. Over time we would become lawyers, real estate agents,
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
103
drug counselors, city workers or California State legislators, which at first
glance is ironic. We had spent a lot of time trying to figure out how to undo
exactly these institutions. But in some way, these professions could be seen
as an extension of our concerns, a reminder of the times when we had tried
to live outside of the norm. It could even be argued that if we had gone into
retail the whole period would have been forgotten and that we couldn’t try
to make an impact with what we had learned in the warehouses. In any
case, those of us who remained true to the scene died early. The most
tragic of which was one of our beloved matriarchs Dina, known to the rave
scene as Dj Drag’n’fly, who committed suicide in 2017 and had been
estranged from the rest of us for years.
As for myself, I stopped buying drum and bass records and started to
agree with Aldous Huxley. Like mescaline, it felt like ecstasy at raves could
“never solve the problem􀀀 it can only pose it, apocalyptically, for those to
whom it had never before presented itself. The full and final solution can be
found only by those who are prepared to implement the right kind of
Weltanschauung by means of the right kind of behavior and the right kind
of constant unstrained alertness.” Although I was unable to implement the
right kind of Weltanschauung by means of the right kind of behavior and
the right kind of constant unstrained alertness, especially after all the years
of damaging my brain with chemical substances, it made sense. All of those
years had only been a question. A question I had learned to live and love in
but which I had outgrown in its formulation. Or it had shrunk in the wash,
become a Potemkin village, a movie set, with houses that were no longer
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
104
inhabitable. This intimation remained what it was, an intimation, until the
fire of a group of homeless people got out of control and burned the Home
Base down in 2004 􀀀after it had been no longer in use since the 2000
moratorium􀀀. This was, for me at least, the funeral pyre of an era.
So I left. To Berlin, in 2005, where I still hoped to find a variation of
the same theme in the city’s legendary nightlife, only with a slower tempo.
By which I mean that I didn’t want to totally give up on the dream of
finding a society dedicated to P.L.U.R., which I still considered to be the
right kind of Weltanschauung even if I knew that the drugs that helped to be
aware of it only created fatas morganas, and I hoped that Berlin still offered
some of the freedoms I had seen diminished over time in the Bay Area rave
scene. I was relieved to discover in Berlin’s old mints and swimming pools
and power stations that had been converted into improvised spaces – into
clubs that had more gravitational pull than any of the crews throwing
parties within them – that the temperature, setting and language were
different from what I had just left in the post􀀀moratorium San Francisco
scene but so too were the intentions. I mourned a particular cultural
difference in the translation from raves and their nomadic crews into clubs
with permanent locations and fixed schedules􀀀 the element of playfulness.
Like in any institutionalization, coolness ruled over compassion and even
with exceptions like Rio on Chausseestraße, which was wild and vital and
silly, time could not be suspended. In this city that was no longer divided,
the night was divided in the early morning between those who were leaving
and those who were just arriving. The communal experience of traveling
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
105
together on the same timeline was lost, as was the atmosphere of laughter
and frivolity. Old Berliners complained of this streamlined and yet neatly
parceled experience and wanted to make comparisons between Berlin’s
past and the past I had experienced in San Francisco. I agreed with
whatever they said and said I would go to the parties they recommended.
Nothing changed the fact that I decided inside it was best to go elsewhere,
away from the clubs, except whenever 100􀀀 Silk was in town because I love
some of the artists on the label. And it was on the phone with Luciano that
I wagered that I would have been at the Ghost Ship if I were still living in
California.
Shane, No􀀀 Luciano is crying. He pleads with me in Italian, a
language I don’t speak, and I feel awful. There are enough tragedies in the
world to not aggrandize the ones that might never have happened. There is
silence. This is the first time Luciano doesn’t try to convince me to move
back to California to be closer to him whenever I mention my homeland in
passing. After he gathers himself, he says he is thankful I live in Berlin. I
would be lying if I acted like this wasn’t a hornet sting. My loved ones’
desire for me to be closer to them has become part of my reality. And now
it felt like it was gone. Before I could dwell on this, Luciano changes the
subject. He says Josh is helping him move to Crockett next week and that
he is looking forward to it. He thinks it will do the both of them some good.
I agree although I can’t remember where Crockett is. It’s that small 49er
town just before the bridge to Vallejo, where the sugar factory is. I can see
the sugar factory in front of me and it all feels much closer for a second. Is
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
106
anyone doing anything with the factory􀀀 He thinks it’s still in operation.
How long will it take you to get to work at the Conservatory􀀀 It’s not all
that bad. Half an hour without traffic. When is there ever no traffic􀀀 My
German syntax and slight accent make him laugh. It’s the only thing I can
afford, he says. I understand. It isn’t easy to find something. The last
apartment Melanie and I visited, number six where we passed the initial
screening, had changed the terms of the contract the day we had planned
to sign the lease. The owner of the apartment unexpectedly raised the rent
ten percent in gradation within four years. The bastards. Now it’s my turn
to be silent. I want to know what can be done besides endlessly retreating
further and further when I suddenly feel another scratch in the CD. In this
new silence I am reminded of another Vallejo, the Peruvian poet, Cesar
Vallejo, who wrote􀀀 “There are such blows in life, so powerful … I don’t
know􀀀”
􀀀
Compassion, the third core value of the Golden State Warriors, comes from
the Latin and had attained three different shades of meaning by the time it
was first documented in English. According to the OED, compassion can be
􀀀i􀀀 suffering together with another, participation in suffering, sympathy
􀀀1340 Ayenb. 148 Huanne on leme is zik oþer y􀀀wonded. hou moche zorȝe
heþ þe herte and grat compassion y􀀀uelþ); 􀀀ii􀀀 the feeling or emotion when
a person is moved by the suffering or distress of another, and by the desire
to relieve it 􀀀c. 1340 Hampole Prose Tr. 36 Þou may thynke of synnes and of
wrechidnes of thyne euencristene‥with pete and of compassione of
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
107
thaym􀀀􀀀 or 􀀀iii􀀀 sorrow or grief 􀀀c. 1340 Cursor M. 23945 heading 􀀀Fairf.􀀀,
Compassioun of our lauedi for þe passioun of hir sone􀀀.
While I would like to believe it was the final definition of compassion
that motivated some of the more private moments I shared with Luciano
on the phone later, this meaning, according to the OED, is now obsolete.
Today, compassion is associated with the first two entries􀀀 and this co􀀀
suffering, this feeling for another, has moved away from the word
sympathy, which now carries a connotation of condolence or
commiseration at a distance. The way compassion is expressed is closer to
an involved form of empathy, “the power of projecting one’s personality
into 􀀀and so fully comprehending􀀀 the object of contemplation.” And,
should we follow the dictionary, it is not the case that all states and
occurrences are worth empathizing with􀀀 for there to be compassion, there
must be a broken leg, mental breakdown or complicated divorce
settlement, etc., and the other’s suffering must become to some degree
one’s own. Via entry number two, it is not enough to simply feel it, you also
have to want to relieve it – compassion is active.
This one becoming other within limit is a constituent element of
personal relationships as I have experienced them and yet compassion feels
like an occupational hazard for every vocation except, perhaps, grave
wailers. Even surgeons who are trained to be kind when they remove
stones of misery need to remain impartial – otherwise there would be no
conflict of interest and they could freely operate on their own parents and
husbands and children. It stands to question, then, what business
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
108
compassion has on the basketball court, a place where precision and split􀀀
second decisions are of primary importance. It would seem like a bad
strategy if I spent my time coddling my teammate after a missed a shot.
This active form of emoting might even become doubly painful – the other
team could take advantage of our pity party and score another basket on
our diminished numbers. And yet􀀀 a missed buzzer beater by one player is a
missed buzzer beater by another. A team loses no matter who came up
short or got dunked on. A team suffers together.
That would seem to fulfill the necessary and sufficient conditions for
compassion according to the first entry of the dictionary. Basketball also
resembles the second entry whenever I try to make up for the missed shot
with tough defense on the next possession, thereby alleviating the pain of
what had previously gone wrong. Kerr’s inclusion of compassion as his
third core value, then, would almost be trivial. It would be no different than
what your average war or sports movie has to say on the subject of
brotherhood and togetherness in battle. I am not satisfied with this
definition of compassion however since it requires a form of identification
that is both too strong and too weak. It is too strong because it means I
need to personally identify with the person who is suffering to be
compassionate and it is too weak because it means I am only
compassionate to those who are in my inner and concentric and maybe
overlapping circles and not to those that are adjacent or seemingly remote.
Together, they suggest we unconsciously lead our lives according to
divisions. They suggest we still hold onto the nineteenth century’s bricks
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
109
and mortar and are not open to becoming twenty􀀀first century nodes.
What if we saw ourselves as sites of interaction, places where emotions and
thoughts pass through and not as the possessors of them􀀀 Would we still
hold onto our anger and fear if we did not identify with them􀀀 If we weren’t
paying a mortgage to keep them alive􀀀 Before this turns into a utopian
manifesto dressed up as a novel again, let’s open another page with some
lecture material.
In their paper “Identity and Emergency Intervention􀀀 How Social
Group Membership and Inclusiveness of Group Boundaries Shape Helping
Behavior,” Mark Levine and his research team explored the limitations of
compassion and subtly hinted at ways in which the scope of compassion
could be expanded. Inviting a group of Manchester United fans into the
laboratory, the researchers asked the team’s devotees to answer a survey
regarding their identification as fans of the Red Devils. Once this was
finished, the fans were sent out onto the street, where the researchers had
prepared a situation with someone in need. If the person on the street were
wearing a Liverpool jersey, a rival team, these fans would only help the
person thirty􀀀two percent of the time. In contrast, if the person was
wearing a Manchester United jersey, the fans, fresh out of the laboratory,
helped ninety􀀀two percent of the time. This gap of exactly sixty percent in
readiness suggests that the identification with a particular social group
influences the ways in which people act compassionately. This feels almost
obvious to anyone who has ever spent time on reddit’s r􀀀nba where
different fan groups of players or teams attack one another or defend their
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
110
favorites against any form of criticism, no matter how right it may be.
What might need more explication would be the discovery of Levine and
his team when they asked Manchester United fans a series of questions
about fandom and the game itself. That is, when the researchers swapped
out the questions about Manchester United with questions about soccer
and soccer fandom in general, these fans became less inclined to help those
whom they perceived to be Man Utd fans 􀀀down to eighty percent􀀀 but
were dramatically more willing to help those whom they perceived to be
Liverpool fans 􀀀up to seventy percent􀀀. While we might speculate as to why
there was a cumulative increase of twenty􀀀six percent, the more burning
question is􀀀 why were the people who weren’t wearing jerseys only helped
twenty􀀀two percent of the time􀀀 What kinds of questions does a survey
need to ask for the fans to show compassion to them􀀀 Do we need to
broaden our notion of identification􀀀 And can we􀀀
To do such, the dictionary needs to be rewritten. Beliefs are like a
verb – the more common the belief, the more irregular are the conjugated
results. In the most dominant forms of Western thinking, we are taught
that the world is predicated on individuality and competition. When an
explanation is given for the capacity for selfishness and depression and
violence of humans, we are told that our origins are in killer apes and that
we have inherited this, if not through genetics, then through patriarchy.
According to some feminist scholars of science and technology like Donna
Haraway, the first step to changing this 􀀀note that this verb, unlike the
other common verbs italicized above, is not irregular􀀀􀀀 would be to stop
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
111
believing these are our destiny􀀀 to perceive the first as a narrative, a
theory, from a particular context, the late nineteenth century, and a
particular set of data, the world, which is constantly changing. Elsewhere,
other scholars like Anne Harrington have suggested that there are other
approaches to social structures like that of Tibetan Buddhists where
compassion is understood as a guiding principle of social frameworks and
that such societies allow for coexistence or are even predicated on it. So,
let’s take over those common irregular verbs􀀀 Choose􀀀 Begin􀀀 Come􀀀
This is not utopia. It’s a National Park. This reframing and moving
towards a network is something that happens in natural ecologies. After
wolves were reintroduced into Yellowstone, for instance, to reduce the
swollen deer population, badgers, geese, woodpeckers, beavers, muskrats,
reptiles, mice, rabbits, weasels, red foxes, hawks, bald eagles, bugs, aspen,
willow, and even the rivers have benefited from a better balance between
predator and prey. In a very real way, the wolf is the friend of the river.
There are objections coded as lamentations to be made regarding the
loss of the fawns and I believe we can honor this in one breath and
celebrate the gains of the red foxes in another. Not by denying difference
and erasing suffering but through an ethical dictum from the Sanskrit, the
proverb tat tvam asi, whose translation today could be, “you’re it.”
In the Upanishads, तत्त्वमिस means you’re the infinite, the eternal, the
absolute, the Brahman. You are the supreme reality, the real thing,
everything. Yes, that is you and it is also me. And if it is you and it is me
then we are equal and identical in the infinite, eternal, absolute. And if we
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
112
are always in it, no matter the circumstances, you are not another, you are
me. And you are the one who says no man is an island and the one who
lives in a huge apartment in the city alone. You don’t have a lot of friends,
only a few colleagues from the lab who you sometimes play video games
with, and you often drink too much coffee and eat three pieces of cake at
your shifts at the café and then drink smoothie after detoxifying smoothie
as your dinner and expiation. You can’t believe it is over and you still need
to ease into a life without violence but you have promised yourself to stop
replaying the final voicemail and to finish what you have started. You don’t
want vengeance but you also somehow secretly do and that is confusing.
You are much, much more than this but you are the one who secretly
believes catastrophes are inevitable as well as the one who has
contemplated your own death down to the finest details. You are definitely
afraid to die and you spend most of your nights talking at anyone in bars
who will listen. You don’t have much time for yourself and you don’t know
how to say no to your boss who asks you to work more shifts. You never get
paid overtime on those nights you paint banks on holiday weekends and
you are afraid to ask for it in case you get fired. It is hard to find work at
your age and it is even harder to save for your retirement in another
country, a country you feel compelled to emigrate to since you can’t afford
to stay in the one you whose social security system you have paid into. You
are tired. And sick. And sick and tired. You are no longer all that young and
you forget to take care of your body as you work with your younger
comrades to bring the revolution out of your minds and into the streets.
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
113
You work at the university and hate it because it is an instrument of
patriarchy but you are always happy when it pays your travel expenses to
conferences where you congregate with others who feel the same way.
When you aren’t thinking about revenge, you are too stressed out with
work to ever come into contact with the working class you say you are
defending except in taxis from the airport. This embarrasses you
immensely because it sounds so simplistic but you believe we must change
our lives and life in general. You have a verse by a German poet saying the
same thing tattooed on your forearm, sadly with a misspelling. Everything
needs to change, you say, especially what we consume and how and why we
do it. For years now, you only eat in restaurants from countries your
nation is currently bombing and this has often been awkward and
expensive when you were abroad. “Love your enemies and bless them that
persecute you” is something you often say although you are the one who
persecutes anyone who doesn’t look like you and you had the police called
on you for barbequing in the park with your friends. You were arrested at
home when your children were in bed because you share your name with a
felon. After losing everything, you are more afraid of the police than the
meth heads in the homeless encampment and you’ve learned that you love
your estranged children more than anything. You often feel like there was
some kind of mistake at your birth and you were born into a lower class
than the rest of your peers and it is awkward when your friends talk about
the poor and the angry and the disenfranchised in vague terms. You were
not meant to have these parents or experiences but then you know you
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
114
were. And you fucked up. Again. And the justice system punished you a
thousand times over. You are the one who wants to leave this world and its
worldview behind and you can’t let go of the regret of being an asshole to
everyone a week after you got back from that yoga retreat on the island.
You feel like nothing ever changes, no matter how badly you want it. You
believe change can only come from a new reconfiguration of the culture
you live in and not from adopting some parts of others and you are the one
who left your vacation early because it made no sense to be on the other
side of the world. You never returned. You found yourself at home, in
another country, and you became a citizen of the world. You worked for
years then suddenly stopped and dedicated yourself to your family. To your
career, your fans, your writing, to me, who you are reading. You don’t
believe reading makes us better people but in another context you said
your life was changed after reading a book by an author whose name you
can’t remember. You can’t remember if it was in The Fire Next Time but
you are the one who loves this quote by James Baldwin􀀀 “you think your
pain and your heartbreak are unprecedented in the history of the world,
but then you read. It was Dostoevsky and Dickens who taught me that the
things that tormented me most were the very things that connected me
with all the people who were alive, who had ever been alive. Only if we face
these open wounds in ourselves can we understand them in other people.”
See􀀀 I told you. You are me.
And if you are me, we want this dictum to emit from our pores when
we are on the court or sizing up our opponents in the unfurnished bedroom
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
115
that only one of us will be panting in and sleeping in and calling home. We
want to be drenched in this welcoming sweat and to be bloated with
happiness as we trap past injustices behind a fresh coat of paint and vow to
make a life without evil and hate making goodness perceivable, through
antithesis, in these new walls. What I mean is, we want no ugly – and failing
this, we want to love actualities and their negative capability, for we won’t
always be what we are, full of rashes and dandruff and warts, or what we
want to be, as empty as the room we are standing in, with no against. At the
very least we would like a strategy to know that you are in me, even if you
are the asshole who signed the lease because you make more money, a wolf
that has been reintroduced to reduce my legions. Polluting others, I do not
want to forgive you – I want some orientation, away from the blindness of
the mirror and the blindness of the person looking into it, who is full of
anger and frustration and despair. I want to have compassion for you that
is stronger than the weak and weaker than the strong and I do not want
this to sound naïve or stupid. I want to remember a question from the
Situationists – “to what extent can we freely build the framework for a
social life in which we might be guided by our aspirations and not our
instincts􀀀” – and I want to answer “100􀀀.” This is not another utopian
fantasy, I swear. There are models we can follow where people work
towards their aspirations and are not ruled by their instincts. The Warriors
are one such model and it is their understanding of compassion that makes
this possible.
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
116
Not that Coach Kerr is opposed to the dictionary. Otherwise he
wouldn’t voice his support of the Warriors’ players and their community
service engagements when they visit the sick in hospitals, build courts in
underprivileged districts or host Thanksgiving dinners at homeless
shelters. He supports their efforts to alleviate the suffering of others and
offers his condolences to victims of gun violence while also trying to make
the general public aware of social issues. Kerr’s alignment with the OED’s
first definition of compassion was on full display when he paid his
condolences to the victims of the Ghost Ship fire in a pregame presser the
day after the fire. He expressed his sympathy and the sympathy of the
whole organization before moving on “to basketball matters, the stuff that
doesn’t matter.” Kerr’s small speech and expression of compassion was not
some platitude – together with the other two major sports teams in
Oakland at the time, the Raiders and the Athletics, the Warriors
organization raised more than 􀀀250,000 for the victims of the fire. This
donation was followed by that of the Warriors players and coaching staff
who pooled together another 􀀀75,000. And, moving down another scale in
dimension, to the individual, Stephen Curry auctioned off two pairs of his
signature shoes to raise funds for the victims as well. These custom
versions of Curry’s signature Under Armour sneakers were designed by an
Oakland artist and came in two iterations􀀀 the black low􀀀top pregame
shoes that had “Ghost Ship” written in yellow, orange, red and blue graffiti
on each shoe, and the white high􀀀top game shoes that read “Oakland” and
“Strong” in yellow and blue on the shoes’ uppers. Together, these two pairs
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
117
of shoes that Curry wore on December 15, 2016 in the Warriors’ home game
against the New York Knicks, raised more than 􀀀45,000 for the victims of
the fire. As such, those who lost their lives made their presence felt on the
court as well. All of their initials were on the heels of both pairs of shoes
and in both cases Donna’s were near the cuboid bone – which, Wikipedia
tells me, is called the Würfelbein, the dice􀀀leg, in German. It’s an upsetting
translation. It’s like we’re always standing on luck.
But luck has nothing to do with it. Compassion is part of the system,
the philosophy and the culture that Steve Kerr instilled in the team from
the day he took over the duties of being the Warriors’ head coach. And, as
Steve Kerr told the Positive Coaching Alliance, it is “encompassed by a lot
of different things” both on and off the court. In the game, compassion is
expressed by the players belonging to a “five􀀀man connection,” as the
Warriors’ assistant coach Ron Adams described to The Athletic. This
connection is established on offense by the players sharing the ball with
one another, by passing, and on defense by sacrificing themselves for their
teammates, by helping. By passing the ball to one another on offense and
switching in almost every defensive matchup, the Warriors players are like
a nodes in a network, sites of interaction. Although this does not mean
each and every player is indistinguishable – we are decidedly not the same
if you are Klay Thompson and I am some player on the third string who
can’t shoot threes – it still creates an environment in which everyone is
involved and the players feel connected. As fans and blog boys will attest,
this is often on display whenever the Warriors are engaged and not just
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
118
going through the motions 􀀀which happened often during the injury􀀀
riddled 2017–18 regular season􀀀. This connection defines what the
broadcaster Jim Barnett calls “Warriors Basketball” even in games when
the star players are not shooting the lights out. It can even be seen in the
game against the Knicks, the night Curry honored the Ghost Ship victims.
In comparison to other stellar performances against the New York
Knicks, such as Stephen Curry’s “coming out” game at Madison Square
Garden in 2013 when he scored a career high 54 points and made 11 of 13
threes, his numbers at Oracle Arena in December 2016 are rather
pedestrian at first glance. Curry had more rebounds 􀀀10􀀀 than points 􀀀8􀀀,
an anomaly, and he went 3 for 14 from the field and 2 of 8 from three􀀀point
range. He also didn’t attempt a single free throw. Whereas the 2013 pre􀀀
Kerr iteration of the Warriors still lost by four points in spite of Curry’s
remarkable and memorable performance, the 2016 team under Kerr’s
direction beat the Knicks 103–90 in a complete team effort. The Warriors
dominated the entire game despite starting 0 of 5 from the field and ending
with middling to terrible shooting percentages 􀀀46􀀀 FG􀀀, 26􀀀 3P􀀀 and 50􀀀
FT􀀀􀀀. Despite these subpar stats for one of the greatest shooting teams in
the history of the game, the Warriors’ players connected with one another,
sharing the ball and ending with 41 assists on 45 made baskets. Although
the highlight of the night was a behind the back pass from Draymond Green
to Kevin Durant who swung the ball to Ian Clark for a three on the wing,
there were other plays I would like to highlight, like when Draymond Green
quickly dribbled the ball after a defensive rebound and telegraphed a pass
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
119
to a sprinting Kevin Durant just past the half􀀀court mark on the right hand
side who threw a high pass to the streaking JaVale McGee, who was
running in the direction of the basket. Catching the ball at the lower block
on the left side with a defender suddenly under him, McGee passed to Klay
Thompson, behind him, in the corner. When a defender slid over to
Thompson, he passed to Stephen Curry, who was wide open on the same
side of the wing. This was not one of the two three􀀀pointers Curry made in
the game – he missed the shot – but it illustrates how the Warriors play.
Normally, they are not trying to force the issue and make a play for
themselves – they are looking to make a play for their teammates, to get a
“great” basket. In this sequence, each of the players could have tried to take
the play over and it would have been anywhere between mediocre and
decent. Green could have brought the ball up, Durant could have charged
towards the basket, McGee could have fought through the contact to get a
foul and Thompson could have taken the contested shot. None of it would
have been terrible basketball. The Warriors are more concerned with
getting great shots than good shots and they are constantly hunting for
them.
Never stagnant, they are constantly screening for one another and
passing to one another as their bodies are in motion, creating a network of
possibilities. This forces the defense to communicate properly on
possessions that involve three or four or five of the Warriors players more
often than one on one or two on two. This is decidedly different from some
other teams who base their strategy on statistical analysis and where the
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
120
point guard dribbles the ball and the wings stand in position and the center
makes a screen for the point guard and the point guard decides whether or
not to shoot or drive or kick the ball to his sedentary teammates. Such
teams are not unsuccessful, they’re actually rather good, if maybe a little
boring to watch, but something usually breaks in their schemes, like all
schemes of all teams. I believe it is that old human connection that
provides the buffering for the Warriors that allows for complete meltdowns
to be abated more often than not, something which statistics is unable to
predict or achieve in the realm of potential outcomes.
There is another play that has burned itself into my brain although I
can no longer remember who the opponent was, perhaps because it was a
variation that was often seen in the 2017–18 season. Draymond Green has
the ball at the top of the key then passes it to Kevin Durant who is posting
up on the left hand side. With no shot there, he passes it back to Draymond
who has drifted back behind the three􀀀point line. He finds Klay Thompson
coming off a screen at the left wing and when he catches it he passes to
Zaza Pachulia at the elbow. Zaza drops the ball between his legs into the
hands of Steph Curry, who has been zigging and zagging through a series of
cuts and screens, close to the corner of the same side. Steph fakes a shot,
his defender flies by and he reloads. When the ball goes through the net,
they run back to the other side of the court and get ready for their
defensive assignments, where their switches, slips through screens, help
and individual defense is so fluid and in synch that it seems totally
unspectacular.
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
121
But it is spectacular to watch variations of the same offensive play
when Stephen Curry crosses over his defender and throws the ball back to
Draymond Green at the top of the circle who passes back to Curry in the
corner who has shook himself free from his defender after he slipped
between Klay Thompson and his defender. Curry fakes a three pointer,
making his defender fly by in his attempt to block Curry’s shot, then Curry
takes two steps forward, passes the ball to Green who swings the ball to
Kevin Durant who has been patiently watching the play develop and who is
now standing at the wing. With no shot there, he passes the ball to Curry
who has ran up to Green for a screen and Green rolls to the basket. Green is
open and this makes Damian Jones’ defender forget all about Jones, who
had been standing at the elbow and who now charges to the basket,
receiving a lob from Green. It was an emphatic dunk in the first quarter
against the Minnesota Timberwolves on November 11, 2018 and it is just
another variation in the carpet’s pattern, in the fabric of the team.
With plays like this woven into hundreds of highlight clips and game
analyses, the Warriors’ style of play is often described as “selfless.” When
they are all passing and in motion on offense or focused on the collective
defensive effort, it is clear that the players have absorbed the team motto
“Strength in Numbers.” It is also clear that they are more interested in
playing as a team than as individuals. Playing loose in an unscripted yet
controlled chaos on offense, they move at a quick pace like few teams
before them. Their style of play has led some commentators to call them
revolutionary anarchists, upending logic, although there are obvious
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
122
precedents. Claims like these are hyperbolic but the Warriors players do
take shots advanced analytics warn against like pull􀀀up threes or mid􀀀
range jumpers and Kerr puts more players from their roster on the floor for
solid minutes than other championship􀀀level teams who predominantly
rely on the production of their star players. In the way that the Warriors
have played in the last five years of their tenure in Oracle Arena and the
way they have carried themselves in the games and in front of the media
􀀀which they have all learned how to respond to􀀀, the Warriors have
resembled a big weird family that gets along, well, like a family.
More Wonder Years than Arrested Development, this idea of family is
what drew Kevin Durant to the organization during his 2016 free agency.
Durant explained to the San Jose Mercury News that “you hear family a lot”
in the NBA and “that’s just a word sometimes, but this is really a lifestyle
here. You can feel it when you walk in the door, in the practice facility,
everybody is just together. That’s something I can appreciate as a
basketball player and someone who values relationships. You can tell that
that’s what they stand on, that’s what we stand on. I feel really grateful to
play for a team like that and play with a bunch of players who are selfless
and enjoy the game in its purest form.”
Emphasizing family and selflessness gets closer to what Kerr means
by compassion. It has to do with providing an atmosphere where others feel
comfortable. Speaking with the Positive Coaching Alliance, Coach Kerr
expressed it like this􀀀 “it’s really important for the team to have
compassion for each other. Every player is different. Michael Jordan is so
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
123
much better than the rest of the team that he may not see the game the
way I did for example as the eighth man on the Bulls … Compassion
between team members is critical. Understanding that everybody has
different pressures on them but acknowledging that in a daily manner
really establishes a good tone, a good routine, a good environment to work
in.”
If I were to wager a new definition in the dictionary that would sum
all of this up, I would say that compassion has to do with nurturing your
ecology. By nurturing an ecology, I mean creating and maintaining an
environment that is habitable for everyone as well as respecting the needs
and abilities of others in an environment that allows for difference while
also realizing that we’re all interconnected.
Whether Kerr inherited this understanding of compassion from his
time with Michael Jordan, a hypercompetitive player with whom he once
got into a fistfight at a Bulls practice, Kerr has nevertheless passed it on to
the Warriors. The team’s leader, Stephen Curry, has embraced this sense of
responsibility to his teammates and team since the beginning – and
especially since Curry has become the player we know him to be after his
injury in the 2011–12 season. Now in a leadership role and the longest
tenured Warriors player, Curry’s nurturing his ecology has become an
example for the rest of the team. As the Warriors’ assistant coach Bruce
Fraser told GQ, “Steph’s selflessness makes his teammates not only better
but more self􀀀sacrificing. Perfect example􀀀 Draymond Green. His defensive
play and basketball IQ have gone off the charts this 􀀀2016–17􀀀 season
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
124
because of the example Steph set in welcoming Kevin Durant onto the
team. The way Steph didn’t set out to prove ‘This is my team’ trickled
down to all the other players. Steph knew he’d be sacrificing stats and
points. But it was all about the team.”
And it has mostly been all about the team for the whole team. We
could go up and down the roster, looking at the ways in which the current
and past players have nurtured their ecology. If we did this, we would have
to concentrate on Andre Iguodala – who relinquished his starting position
in the 2014–15 season and moved to the second string at Kerr’s urging to
anchor the team – since, as Mike Brown said during the 2017 championship
celebrations, this was the beginning of everything􀀀 “when Steve Kerr
became the coach in 2014 and asked Andre Iguodala, who could start for 29
other teams, to come of the bench and Andre said, ‘yes, no problem,’ …
there’s not a single person on this coaching staff and management or roster
who could say anything about any move Steve makes and that’s the
foundation of this organization.” As with all foundations, Iguodala’s
willingness to sacrifice “to make sure everybody else is eating” is often
overlooked or missed when fans concentrate on the baroque plays and
statistics of his teammates, yet Iguodala’s understanding of nurturing the
Warriors’ ecology has not been lost on the other Warriors’ players. Kevin
Durant, for instance, praised all of his teammates for their effort and
deflected questions about himself after being named the 2017 Finals MVP.
He made a point of praising Iguodala and the other players directly. Call us
a super team, Durant challenged after the Warriors won that first
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
125
championship with Durant on the team, but there have been a number of
super teams in the past that didn’t work. We came together, he said, we did
it by committee. Put more generally, as the center David West preached
after winning the 2017 championship, “we got world class talent with no
egos. Learn from it􀀀”
To learn􀀀 another common irregular verb. Irregular because
circuitous, if not arduous, in that learning often involves unlearning, a
process of overcoming􀀀 and common because there is no other way than
through. Nurturing your ecology in face of adversity is difficult, especially
when, to contradict David West’s rapturous proclamation, big personalities
like those on the Warriors need to be sublimated. For although the above
sections might read like a hagiography where the saintly Warriors
immediately recognized the value of abandoning their egos for the glory of
something greater, the apocryphal section, the appendix, could show that
this did not happen by coincidence or divine intervention. Unlike the
Apostle Paul’s immediate conversion, Andre Iguodala needed convincing
to go to the second string 􀀀he had been an All􀀀Star, Gold Medalist and
would become the 2015 Finals MVP, i.e. Iguodala is an incredible player􀀀
and Draymond Green found the concept of “Strength in Numbers” “corny”
at first.
Complicated and tortuous, Draymond Green’s acceptance of Kerr’s
four core values has been tenuous and under scrutiny again and again. Not
only by the members of the media, who vie for any kind of interesting lead
on a winning team to create clicks and resonance and job security, but also
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
126
by the team. As Ethan Strauss reported in ESPN’s “Golden State’s
Draymond Green Problem,” Kerr is said to have been directly addressing
Green with the importance of compassion in his speech about the Warriors’
four core values in the early days of the 2015–16 season.
From the outside, Green is the wolf who collects technical fouls like
others do stamps or matchbooks or pogs and is often seen, like Saul before
becoming Paul, as “breathing out threatening and slaughter.” He is the
player who for many years screamed “and 1” at the refs after every failed
layup as if he was met with some heinous injustice for his failing to convert
a simple basket. He is also the player who has kicked multiple other players
in the face or groin after gathering rebounds or driving to the rim. He is
best known to his detractors for swinging at LeBron James’ nether regions
in Game 4 of the 2016 NBA Finals. Green’s rancor has not been limited to
the others, the competition. According to sources, Green has often gone
too far in challenging his teammates to be better, berating them and
sometimes even needing to be physically separated from them by others.
He also attempted to enter fisticuffs with Kerr at halftime in a game against
Oklahoma City in February 2016 and was suspended by the Warriors
organization for an altercation with Kevin Durant in a game against the Los
Angeles Clippers in November 2018. With a chip on his shoulder, Green can
name every single one of the 34 players drafted before him in 2012 and has
aired his grievances with Kerr at the Warriors’ first victory parade in 2015
in one of the most awkward performances I can remember.
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
127
Full of passion, he can also seem rather callous and reckless. And his
outlandish behavior is not limited to matters revolving around the
hardwood court. In a single summer, in 2016, he was arrested for assault
charges 􀀀later dropped at a plea agreement􀀀 then sent a picture of his penis
to the world on accident via Snapchat and who also filmed his speedometer
topping out at 118 mph in Oakland’s Calcedot Tunnel previously, in the
spring. Later in that year, things seemed to calm when Green became a
father of Draymond Jr. and his PR stance was more in line with reason,
speaking out against the divisiveness of the incoming president. Right as
this was, he is still the same person who visited the training facility of the
Israeli border police in 2018 and who shot assault rifles for cameras that
were all to happy to film it.
All of this can make Draymond Green seem like a liability to the team
and even society. This takes things a bit too far in my opinion. I believe he
has become a scapegoat – no one seems to remember that he was a finalist
for the NBA Cares Community Assist award for the 2015–16 season and that
management even invited him into the process of drafting Jacob Evans
during the 2018–19 season. As Steve Kerr has told reporters multiple times,
he’s a valuable part of the team. Most of the media who criticize him seems
to forget that owner Joe Lacob wore his jersey for the game Green was
suspended in the 2015 NBA Finals and that the general manager Bob Myers
watched the game with Green, next door at the Oakland Coliseum. They
stand by him. The detractors will probably still be asking why.
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
128
Besides the trust that is implied in inviting him to the draft room,
there are a number of on court reasons as well. “It’s hard to describe what
he does,” Kerr has said, “but he’s a perfect modern day NBA player.” He
embodies the organized chaos the Warriors are celebrated for on offense
and is the organizer of the defense. As Strauss highlighted in his article for
ESPN, “his approach represents a hybrid, if not a revolution. It’s an
aggressive, American brashness mixed with an egalitarian, European
insistence on moving the ball.” Green fits the on􀀀court interpretation of
nurturing your ecology and as the plays detailed above show, he is always
in the center of everything.
While Draymond immediately fits the on􀀀court understanding of
compassion of passing and switching on defense, there is a deeper
understanding of this concept that Green has had to learn. This has been a
circuitous and necessary journey and nothing shows his understanding of
nurturing your ecology as much as his relationship to the triple􀀀double.
A triple􀀀double is achieved when a player exceeds a double digit
number in three of the five statistical categories – points, rebounds, assists,
blocks or steals. On paper it signifies a complete game, the ability to be a
driving force on offense and defense and to recognize other teammates
through passing. A triple􀀀double is thus a perfect balance between
selflessness and selfishness. It signifies that a player is willing to do
whatever it takes to win the game.
Shortly after Kerr visited the Warriors, the team was playing against
the Phoenix Suns in the seventeenth game in the 2015–16 season. They had
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
129
won every game before and with a little more than four minutes left,
Draymond Green fouled one of the Suns’ players. Interim head coach Luke
Walton, pulled Draymond out of the game despite his pleading to stay. An
animated discussion ensued between the coach and the player, with Green
pleading to be let back into the game. Walton concedes and after Ian Clark
missed a layup, Green rebounds it and lays it in. In the next possession,
Green intentionally fouls a Suns’ player then walks back, at ease, to the
bench. He has just achieved his goal, a triple􀀀double.
Two months later, Kerr is back on the bench and Green has ten
points, ten boards and six assists at the end of the second quarter. Kerr is
reported to have informed Green that if he’s hoping for a triple􀀀double,
against the worst team in the league, the Philadelphia 76ers, it will have to
come in the third quarter. He no longer wants Green to keep wasting his
time playing the garbage minutes for stats. Green agrees in principle,
though not with Kerr’s intent. On the first play of the second half, Green
gets the ball and has an open lane to the rim but he chooses instead to set a
screen for Klay Thompson and pass him the ball. This results in a turnover
and it is followed by many others. With Green committing seven turnovers
and a 19􀀀point fourth quarter lead completely gone, Green finds Harrison
Barnes in the last two tenths of a second and Barnes scores the winning
basket. It is Green’s ninth assist and with it another victory towards the
team’s historical season of seventy􀀀three wins. After the game, Green
admitted he was playing a “selfishly unselfish game” and that the Warriors
deserved to lose “because that’s what happens when you mess around with
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
130
the game and the ball.” That season, Green would tally 13 triple􀀀doubles,
some more forced than others, but they were always be undefeated when
he achieved this goal.
A year later, after Green was suspended for Game 5, after the team
lost in the Finals, after Curry welcomed Kevin Durant to the team as Bruce
Fraser suggested, something changed in the way Green approached the
game. Not only would his defensive play be elevated to the point where he
was named Defensive Player of the Year, but he also no longer hunted for
triple􀀀doubles. Not that he didn’t get them – indeed his fourth of five
triple􀀀doubles was one of the most remarkable stat lines in NBA history􀀀
he had 12 rebounds, 10 assists and 10 steals and only four points􀀀 the first
time that a triple􀀀double had ever been recorded with less than ten points.
On another night, on April 2, 2017, Green was one basket away from
totaling a triple􀀀double and there was one minute left in the game.
Draymond had the ball and was given the go􀀀ahead to shoot but was
suddenly double􀀀teamed. He saw that JaVale McGee was open and threw
him an alley􀀀oop. It looked like his opportunity was gone, there was little
time in the game, the window seemed to close. But then, two Warriors’
possessions later, he brought the ball up the court and passed it to Matt
Barnes on the wing. When Green’s man hedged off him, Barnes passed the
ball back to Green and he scored a three, tallying his fifth and final triple􀀀
double of the season. What is interesting here is that this play was not
forced. The ball came to him and he made the basket. According to the
Warriors’ previous courtside reporter, Ros Gold􀀀Onwunde, Green knew
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
131
that he was close to a triple􀀀double but he said, “I just want to play the
right way. There’ll be other chances and if not I’ve had a triple􀀀double
before. I’ll be ok. It’s more important for the team to see that.” As such,
Green seemed to have learned the lesson of the Warriors’ assistant coach
Jarron Collins􀀀 “play the right way and the show will happen.”
For the entirety of the 2016–17 season, Green played the right way.
He demonstrated his increased basketball IQ and continually nurtured the
ecology. He was also the main contributor to keeping all of the players
involved 􀀀even if this sometimes meant yelling􀀀. Draymond Green has
embraced his role in the team and is just as happy setting screens, closing
out on defense, deflecting the ball, changing shots and encouraging his
teammates to stay focused as he is in racking up the traditional stats. He
may have scored less, made less assists and grabbed less rebounds than a
year before, which would thus make him a less valuable player, but in fact
he became even more valuable in that his nurturing of the ecology
encourages all of the others. Green aligned himself with Guattari’s proposal
that revolutionary practices “must not be exclusively concerned with
visible relations of force on a grand scale, but will also take into account
molecular domains of sensibility, intelligence and desire.” He has mastered
these “molecular domains,” which, in the world of sports, are known as
“intangibles,” attributes or behavior an athlete displays that have nothing
to do with physical prowess. Including effort, leadership, team attitude,
basketball IQ and “grit” 􀀀sports lingo for absolute dedication􀀀, intangibles
are not necessarily visible to the casual observer but they are vital to
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
132
success. In becoming one of the best “glue guys” in the league and then
exceeding this terminology, Draymond Green has mastered all the
imperceptible aspects of the game that nurture the Warriors’ ecology.
Interestingly, a year after the NBA initiated the Draymond Green clause,
which punishes players for taking 􀀀inadvertent􀀀 shots to the groin, the
league announced that it was tracking “hustle” stats. Trying to quantify the
unquantifiable, to make intangibles visible, these stats “evaluate player
performances that affect outcomes but cannot be found in traditional box
scores.” A number of sports outlets, including The Ringer, hypothesized
that the NBA started tracking these state because of Green. In effect, he
has changed the game and the way it’s perceived. Or, as the Warriors’
guard Shaun Livingston put it, “it’s all the little things 􀀀Draymond􀀀 does
that win championships.”
And it’s all the little things the Warriors do that nurture their
ecology. At the beginning of the 2016–17 season, the Warriors took on
JaVale McGee as the final player on their roster. Known in the league for
his frequent appearance on TNT’s “Shaqtin’ a Fool,” which highlights
boneheaded plays and inexplicable mistakes, McGee displayed very little
confidence when he first started playing for the Warriors. He had come in
with a bad rap for forgetting the ball while trying to dunk from the free
throw line or running back on defense when the rest of the team was still
on offense. There are many hilarious mistakes like when McGee tried to
dribble the ball up the court at full speed and threw the ball at the rim while
falling at the half court line out of nowhere but there are also normal ones
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
133
like blocking a ball a second too late and being called for goaltending.
McGee had become a meme and was on his way out of the league, unfairly.
He is an amazing burst of energy, giving all of his effort, hustling in every
play. In his two seasons for the Warriors, McGee demonstrated that he is a
solid player 􀀀so good in fact that in 2018–19 he is the starting center for
LeBron James’ Los Angeles Lakers, and at the time of this writing McGee is
averaging a career high in points, blocks, assists, steals and offensive
rebounds􀀀. His growth is so momentous that he was an absolute highlight
reel during the first round of the 2017 Playoffs against the Portland
Trailblazers, stealing the show from all the other star players. In Game 2, he
scored 15 points in 13 minutes and didn’t miss a shot. It was clear that series
to any of his detractors that he was much more in control. As the San Jose
Mercury News Blog “Fast Break” wrote􀀀 “when a former poster􀀀boy for
shambolic play like JaVale McGee becomes a paragon of efficiency,
intensity and play􀀀within􀀀yourself control, it’s not just a feel􀀀good story,
it’s a coach􀀀and􀀀player story” –and it’s the story of a team coming
together.
All of this could be summed up by the sports cliché “great players
make other players better” but there are many cases where this has not
taken place. What is needed on top of that is a system wherein all of the
players can feel empowered to be great themselves. Kerr’s understanding of
compassion is such that the players should not only nurture their
immediate ecology but also that of the game itself. Embracing this, they
have changed the way the game is played and as Draymond Green tweeted
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
134
on May 2, 2017􀀀 “I appreciate everybody who came before me, but your job
as a player is to make the game better than it was when you got it. That’s
my goal􀀀” This, to me, is not related to a Western notion of progress. Much
more, the Warriors are in line with what Naismith hoped players would
learn from the game. In placing the good of the team above one’s personal
ambitions, one learns how dependent we all are on one another. None of us
are acting in a void and all of our actions influence countless others. We
need to be able to really care about other people and to sacrifice for them,
which requires discipline and awareness and effort. Today this feels
important to stress, for, as Cornell West writes, “either we learn a new
language of empathy and compassion or the fire this time will consume us
all.”
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
135
Competition
Today is the twenty􀀀fifth of September and I am standing in the living
room with my pants around my ankles, holding a plastic container of mint
green jelly, whose demulcent contents I am reluctant to rub into my right
thigh and knee because the menthol and camphor will lower my skin
temperature even more on this first, real day of autumn in our new
apartment, where the boiler lurches and clatters whenever I mash the
thermostat’s unfamiliar buttons, a reaction that makes me afraid of losing
what I wanted for so long. The plumber’s receptionist understands me. On
the phone this morning, she recommended not succumbing to the nicht
ungefährliches kettling even though the boiler’s violence could escalate
before one of their employees could come sometime towards the end of
next week – after all, the entire, long summer was erased in one evening
and it was so cold this morning she cursed not having gloves on her bike
ride to work. I agreed. The raw morning air that had inspired intensified
prayers from the starlings in our courtyard before dawn certainly appealed
to satisfying basic needs but instead of relying on the disgruntled boiler
processing the city’s hard water, which causes mineral deposits and
stoppage and irregular pressure, I have chosen this tub of horse balm as my
blanket, to embrace its contradiction in my body. So, sitting now at the
dining table, rubbing this semi􀀀soft substance that smells of menthol and
maybe eucalyptus into my leg, I am waiting in this room of fifteen degrees
for the arnica and camphor and rosemary to stimulate my circulation, for it
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
136
to heat up the slathered muscles from within. Cold to the touch and colder
the more it is rubbed in, my skin pricks up with the new information and
the crowns of the trees quiver on the other side of the window, swing, as I
suck wind through my teeth. On the German first floor of the north and
west􀀀facing wing of the building, we live just under the courtyard’s canopy,
the enchanted density that has recently been a battleground between the
French costume designer living in the opposite wing and the Turkish
facility manager, Herr Cat, who asked me to call him Osman. Osman keeps
clearing away the piles of freshly fallen oak leaves that will rot and stink
once winter thaws into spring because it is his job to keep the building tidy.
He would have liked for me to approve of his rigor when he removed three
windows with cracked panes in our apartment yesterday but I couldn’t help
nudging him in the other direction􀀀 I think she wants to grow roses, I said.
Osman, full of wisdom, nodded. Sand is what a pearl needs to sparkle and in
time the humus will be the rose’s allurement and protection, its future
contradiction. Which, I guess, is also why I have this nearly luminescent
goop matting my leg hairs, sticking them together. This form of topical
penance is fertilizer, a translation. Of my quads that screamed like a child
greeting the world after I played two hours of full court basketball last night
with an intensity I have not reached since developing tendonitis in both of
my knees at the age of eleven. This is a fact I hid from all the coaches I
solicited in my emails yesterday morning, where I asked whether their
team was searching for new players with experience going back decades. Of
the four clubs that replied almost immediately, I was most excited by DBC
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
137
Berlin, a team that was holding practice the same day around the corner. I
liked that they were close and I liked that their 1. Vorsitzender, Tom,
decorously replied to my follow up question about getting into the gym
with the words, through the door. It told me this team could be playing
with the kind of attitude I wanted. Not testosterone􀀀driven competition
with loads of yelling but fun and humor. By choosing the team closest to
me, however, I realized how much further I needed to go to achieve my
vaguely defined goals. The nervousness and confusion that plagued me as I
pushed against a number of locked doors on the outside of the building did
not dissipate when I had the ball in my hands and my defender put pressure
on me. Holding my breath, I tried to get the ball anywhere else as quickly as
possible, which, in the first two games to 11, was by launching a forced shot
with my body out of position, out of rhythm, a rhythm I had been working
to establish for almost two years. Having tweaked my foot placement with
snow imprints on the court near our old house in winter or watching my
arms’ shadows in the summer after I launched the ball into the air, my
continual desire had been to create a single fluid motion with a
considerable extension of my arms and I had spent countless hours getting
a sunburn or cold chasing the ball, brick after brick, then swish after swish,
learning the importance of proper mechanics. The first lesson I took from
all those hours outdoors was to establish a position, balance, even in a
shaky situation. This was what I found difficult to put into practice in the
well􀀀lit gym with a laminated floor. I kicked my feet forward and moved my
upper body away from the basket every time I launched the ball from my
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
138
chest. I jumped so quickly that I forgot all about bending my knees, my
rhythm. I was already anticipating a problem, a blocked shot or unwanted
contact from my opponent, which meant I had allowed the defense to
determine what I was doing from the beginning. Part of this had to do with
my back. I hadn’t informed any of the team members who came from all
over the world about my surgery or my inhibited bending ability from the
rods’ inflexibility since I almost never think about my limitations. That and
I was too proud to say it. My lack of execution would then be asterisked as
the best, failing effort of someone who was physically incapable – which I
refuse to believe. Frustrated and drenched in sweat between the third and
fourth game, I caught the attention of one team member, Sammy, who gave
me some tips. He had watched the way I played and he told me to stand up
straight to knock down the shots he had seen me make during warm ups.
All I needed, he said, was to remain calm and trust in my abilities. I thanked
him and tried to not get too emotional. For he had given me a gift by
finding the words I was not yet been able to express􀀀 I had come here to
find my confidence in difficult situations. To do the right thing, for myself,
my team, my ecology, without ever letting myself get too comfortable or
lazy or self􀀀loathing. Months later, after Ferhat commented upon my
continual improvement in the locker room with all the others, I was
shocked to discover that this was what it actually took to be good. Trust.
Although this wouldn’t begin to congeal until later, right now it is,
admittedly, becoming unbearable. My left leg is freezing in comparison to
my right one that is covered in the horse balm. Taking out another handful
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
139
of the ooze to create a balance between my legs, this further application
creates a time delay, an echo in my skin, a reverberation between my lower
limbs. I somewhat grumpily pull up my jogging pants and stand up. I can
feel all of my butt muscles, which is not entirely disagreeable. I consider
walking down our very long corridor to wash my hands in the bathroom
then decide against it. I’ll probably put some more on my sore shoulder
later. I wipe my hands on my jogging pants then hit the spacebar and
return to what I was doing before. There’s a close􀀀up of Klay Thompson on
the screen and he is shrugging off his second foul in the first minute of
Game 7 of the 2018 Western Conference Finals against the Houston
Rockets. I know it won’t be long before he is called for a third foul and will
be forced to sit out for the rest of the first half, which the Rockets will
dominate. When I first saw this game at 5 AM in May, it had taken all of my
willpower to not go out and buy a pack of cigarettes at the kiosk that’s open
24 hours around the corner from our old house. The season was about to be
over because of fouls and the atmosphere was very hostile in the Rockets’
arena. I could literally feel the tension that the pressure was squeezing out
of all the players. With a bit of distance, I am now studying this game the
Warriors won on their way to their third championship in four years to see,
play by play, how the Warriors eased into themselves and took over the
game. I want to see whether there are any perceivable moments when the
Warriors overcame their difficulties and I want to see what happened
before them. More than this, I want to watch every play to learn any
fundamental knowledge that I can apply next week at practice, which is
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
140
actually just a bunch of guys playing pick􀀀up, hence the need to find
coaching elsewhere. With the two free throws already over, the Warriors
bring the ball up and Kevin Durant is establishing position around the
elbow of the right side of the court. When Draymond Green passes him the
ball, Durant’s defender tips the entry pass away and creates a turnover. As
I rewind the play and press pause, I search “establishing post position” in
another tab full of basketball wisdom and read what it has to say. I then hit
the spacebar again and think as I watch the play again that maybe Durant
didn’t whip his leg quickly or strongly enough and I wonder whether this
was why Green was yelling at him after the play transpired. I hit the
spacebar again and write “get low and wide in the seal then keep the ball at
my chin with my arms extended” with a mechanical pencil that is sticking
to my fingers. These words come after “run wide in transition and keep
looking over my shoulder,” which I had written while watching Kevon
Looney continually look at Stephen Curry on the Warriors’ previous play
that also, frustratingly, had resulted in a turnover. With these two notes
only a minute and thirty seconds into the most nerve􀀀wracking game of
that season, I have already answered two of my biggest questions about last
night. I had often been lost in transition and got overpowered in the post.
After a rebound, I had run full speed into the corner and missed three
passes from Marco who had seen that I had a clear path to the basket. I had
also moved my feet in the post, travelled, since I didn’t have a strong
stance that could take the bump from Ivo’s smaller body that I feared
might accidentally hit the rods or on one of the screws that goes deep into
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
141
my body. Last night, this fear was not cognizable for more than an instant.
The only thing that was, was that I was a failure. Melanie laughed when I
said this when I came home and she tried to console me that it was a
difficult situation. It was like a blind date with nine other men in very little
clothes. They are all familiar with one another and you’re new to all of
them. Let it go. She was right. I was playing to be liked and that was ugly. I
was so worried about doing the right thing that I often couldn’t do the right
thing. Luckily, I made my second basket, a game winning three, in the final
match. This, I was sure, was what secured my invitation for next week and
what opened up some garrulity in the locker room afterwards. I had readied
myself for the guarded interactions I am familiar with in new German
contexts but Viktor even asked me about my occupation, which I answered,
atypically, with the truth. When this senior member of the team, a curly
haired hippie in his early fifties, asked me what I wrote about, my answer
was you with my eyes before I shifted to a combination of fact and fiction. I
wasn’t there to speak about being a writer or writing, which often sounds
more exciting to outsiders. It is met with all kinds of preconceptions and
the inner life of an artist is as exceptional as everyone else’s – it’s only that
the artist cultivates it like flowers to be sold on the market. To give yourself
is the greatest gift and that’s why I admire athletics and everyone else who
is willing to do this whole􀀀heartedly, which can often be terrifying. I didn’t
say this, I just thanked them for having me and left. I was tired from
running up and down the court for so long. And I am tired now, pleasantly
so. My legs are both agreeable, warm and I hit the spacebar again, the
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
142
game’s intensity increases with each possession. Fouls are committed, the
ball is turned over, shots are being missed. Without hitting pause, I write
down “mistakes happen – get over it recover from them.” Become the pearl
the oyster makes from the grain of sand and let go of the play before. There
is no smooth mountain to climb and if you slip, stand up, it happens. I
climb back into the game, not taking notes now, just watching the drama
unfold. I keep watching the frantic play until Klay Thompson commits his
third foul on a closeout with eight minutes left to play in the first quarter.
Even now, it is an emotional game and I can barely stand it despite
knowing the outcome. One of the broadcast’s commentators, Chris
Webber, who just happens to be my favorite basketball player ever, talks
about the aggressiveness of the Rockets. Both teams needed to come out
ready to compete and the Rockets are doing it. It feels stupid to ask but I
don’t know what he means exactly. Aren’t all of these professional athletes
coming out to compete􀀀 Surely no one wants this game to be the end of the
season􀀀 Although this might have just been broadcaster speak to fill the
time with voices, it does occur to me that competition is taken for granted.
In that podcast with the Positive Coaching Alliance, all Kerr had said about
his fourth core value was that competition was obvious, that “it almost
goes without saying.” This may be true in sports where it is seen as
something positive but competition is always shaded as fighting against
something, an opponent, and it is usually perceived in the circles I am in as
being negative. It suggests that someone is self􀀀interested and not
nurturing of their ecology. Moreover, competition has a note of violence
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
143
and this is in our language. In the world of competitive sports, for instance,
we say the Warriors beat the Rockets. The Rockets were smacked,
hammered, destroyed in the second half of the third quarter, etc. The world
is framed as competing interests, fears molded into conventions, hatred
that is taken for granted. If this is what Kerr means, it seems difficult to
align this with his other core values, especially when they are applied off
the court, as was his initial intention. There is a way, I think, to see what
Kerr means that is not predicated on violence. If you shift your focus away
from the victors and listen to the postgame press conferences of the losing
team, competition becomes more intricate. The team will say, “we got beat”
just as often as “we didn’t compete” or “we didn’t execute according to our
game plan” or “we weren’t playing our game.” More often than not, the
emphasis is on what they were competing for and not whom they were
competing against. In fact, the same goes for the victors. Players will
commend their coaches for coming up with a good game plan, as well as
one another for executing. When Kevin Durant gave his press conference
after winning his first championship, he kept deferring to the other players
when the reporters tried to make everything about him. “What about
Patrick McCaw,” he challenged, and “what about Zaza Pachulia to start the
game􀀀” What about Steph Curry, coming in like a “big dog,” and what about
Andre Iguodala with twenty points off the bench􀀀 It was a collective effort
that they worked towards together. Competition, then, doesn’t need to be
seen as negative. It could be seen as striving towards your own goals and
overcoming the obstacles the opponent presents. To approach the game
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
144
like this activates the other core values. This is not causal, it is in a system
of entanglement. Each feeds into the other and is interdependent on them,
linked to them, a celebration. But sticking with competition􀀀 if you play
with joy and focus and compassion for others, the things you are
competing for will be more important than any language related to
destruction. There is in fact very little you can do if you act out of fear or
negligence or self􀀀serving interests that will not eventually end in fear or
negligence or self􀀀serving interests. The only counter is to not engage with
it, to go beyond it. You don’t plough through your opponent – you step
around them. In basketball, it’s called a Euro􀀀step. And right now, I’d like
to step around this difficult sequence. I want to see how the Warriors stop
beating themselves with turnovers and bad fouls. I want to shift my focus. I
click on the third quarter in the NBA League Pass window. When I do, the
video freezes. I am watching this game from the internet connection we are
temporarily borrowing from our upstairs neighbors and it is not always
reliable. Unlike them, our friends, who helped us find this apartment. They
had kept us on the job for eight months after our initial attempt to become
Nachmieter of the former tenants was rejected by the owner. The
apartment was going to be renovated, which meant that our dream flat, the
one where we’d have part of our community closer to home, would be too
expensive. We gave up on the idea of moving and focused on being grateful
for what we had. It wasn’t nice to have to slide out of bed in the bedroom
that was literally that, a room for a bed, to go to the toilet at night but we
could be thankful that we had a bed and a toilet. Then, a day came in June
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
145
when I had to renew my work visa at the eternally terrifying foreigners
office, a place where all immigrants without oodles of cash are treated like
parasites and whose staff once explained to me that the toilets in the men’s
room didn’t have seats because most immigrants didn’t know how to use
them, they only know how to shit in a hole in the ground. That morning, I
was diligently putting my paperwork together in those plastic
transparencies German bureaucrats love because it shows that you are
serious and ordentlich when the phone rang. Would we be interested in
seeing the place now that they were finished with the renovations􀀀 I was
curious just to see what they had done, even if it was too expensive. We
could be there at 4 PM after my visa appointment. Abgemacht. Melanie was
surprised. We had agreed to be happy with what we had, each other. And
we had grown tired of all the small comments about their surprise of me
being the one who was the foreigner and that we spoke English together.
They had assumed it was Melanie who was the foreigner and not me until
they saw a copy of her passport. Never sure if this was racist, we just
figured the other rental agencies were looking for some kind of security we
were unable to offer – perhaps because my visa was running out. We may
have been lucky that I had just received a new visa when we arrived at the
beautifully refurbished apartment but we were even luckier that the old
lady acting as the “extended arm” of the owner didn’t know what an
apartment like this could go for today. Or maybe it has nothing to do with
luck. Maybe we fit into their scheme of tenants. Like our friends and the
other neighbors I have met, we are from here and not and we artists and
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
146
thinkers. Or maybe, and this is what I actually believe, we had the wrong
idea of competition. We had been fighting for a little more than two years
against having separate apartments or not enough space in one of them,
and not for what we really wanted, which was to be together, always. I’ll
never know for certain why we got the apartment but the video is still
buffering and I’m impatient. I click on another tab I have opened. It is an
exciting time of the year, training camp has started and the basketball
season is about to begin. Yesterday was the last media day the Warriors will
ever hold in Oakland and I am feeling a little nostalgic. This will be the last
season the Warriors play in Oracle Arena, the place where I attended my
first professional basketball game. Back then, RUN TMC was in full effect
and the high scorer of that night was Šarūnas Marčiulionis, the Lithuanian
Hall of Fame player who was responsible for bringing the Euro􀀀step to
America. He is also someone I had the honor to interview and who told me
he wore the number 13 because he had often been the thirteenth man on
the Soviet teams in the early 1980s and was thus cut from the international
competitions. When he came to America to play for the Warriors and Don
Nelson, he wanted to remember the importance of perseverance.
Something that is also important for the current Warriors team, who last
year seemed to be fatigued. Next season, the Warriors will be moving to the
Chase Center in San Francisco and there is a bittersweet note to Kerr’s
press conference. There will be a lot of difficult financial decisions the team
will have to make next season and he reminds us that all good things come
to an end. We should enjoy them while we can. When this short video is
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
147
over, I open another page I have tabulated since the video of the game still
refuses to load. It is a conversation with David West, who just played with
the Warriors for his final two seasons of his career, winning back􀀀to􀀀back
championships. West is convinced this will be the Warriors toughest year
yet. Every team has had years to adjust to the ways the Warriors play and
they’ll have to make adjustments themselves. He emphasizes that contrary
to what everyone thinks, the Warriors faced a number of problems that
they had to overcome together. They had to continually compete for their
goals. I read a little further into the interview and David West is now
talking about social issues. He says, “we’ve got to sort of change our
orientation as a society. I’m always focused on peace and justice.
Everybody’s on the Colin Kaepernick train, but nobody understands what
the message is. Kap’s message is a message of peace, is a message of justice.
We want a system that’s just for all people, and we want people to be
governed in their realities, their social orientation to be governed by peace.
And that’s what the world wants.” West is referring to the aftermath of
Colin Kaepernick’s famous act of civil disobedience when he kneeled during
“The Star􀀀Spangled Banner” in the fall of 2016. He was immediately
criticized as being anti􀀀American, for being against the military. Every
God􀀀fearing American knows that you stand during the National Anthem
to honor those who lost their lives in service for the nation. Kaepenick,
however, insisted that he took the knee at the beginning of NFL games to
address social injustice and protest the white washing of police brutality,
the white on black violence. Kaepernick’s kneeling, which resulted in him
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
148
getting “blackballed” from professional football, sparked his commitment
to activism. An activism that has never been an against, it is a for. It is for
awareness about injustice that young black men face every day when they
want to do things as simple as walk to the corner store. It is for peace and
for life and for liberty, for all. Suddenly, the children outdoors are making a
lot of noise. They are let out on recess and they are singing and shouting,
kicking balls, dribbling them, playing. It’s the first month of school and the
pupils at the Catholic school still sound happy to be there, especially to be
out on recess. Their courtyard is separated from ours by a half wall a little
taller than the ground floor apartment. This allows for their voices to
stream their warmth into the courtyard and to wash over the Buddha
statue in a niche on our side of the wall. The Buddha doesn’t seem to mind.
He is quietly meditating and showing the vitarka mudra, a gesture
signifying that there is no beginning or end, only perfection. Two of my
neighbors, an older German and Japanese couple, also artists, are grateful
that the Tibetan Buddhist Center in the front of our house erected this
statue for our benefit. It is protecting us from the Church, the German
artist joked. I had laughed with him but I have no reason to distance myself
from this particular congregation. In World War II, Clemens August Graf
von Galen preached that the right “to life, to inviolability and to freedom is
an indispensible part of any moral social order” and openly resisted the
Nazis and their racist ideologies. Although best known as the Lion of
Münster, he began his ordinance at this church just over the wall. And as
such, I would like to tear down this wall and leave the Buddha statue in the
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
149
middle. To my surprise, the video starts playing in the background. I can
hear a whistle blown. Another Rockets’ three􀀀pointer has just been missed
and a foul was committed on the rebound. When I switch to the page, the
video begins to buffer again. I click back ten seconds and nothing happens.
Not even this quick fix is solving my impatience. I open the last page I have
saved in the browser to wait some more for the video. It is the Guardian
and I scan the headlines. Another woman has accused the 45th president’s
choice for Supreme Court Justice of sexual assault and a man was put in jail
in Paris for three months for slapping a woman’s behind. Bill Cosby, the
father America grew up with in the 1980s, faces prison time for sexual
assault. Further evidence has come to light regarding the clergy’s sexual
abuse of children in Germany and I reconsider my alliances. So too does
the current president. He announces to the UN that he will only give
money to friends and the UN’s environmental program has stopped
receiving money from two nations􀀀 the head of this department has had
questionable spending habits and was a frequent flyer – a contradiction.
These are not immediately related. And neither is the end of cleavage being
announced. And yet, they are. The only headline where the women are
subjects is that of activist nuns who are pressuring Smith 􀀀 Wesson over
gun safety. And in defiance to the concept of nations, Santiago Sierra has
planted the black flag to destroy all borders in Antarctica. Scrolling further,
it has been announced that the “leftwing” roughing the passer rule is
ruining American football. I can’t help but laugh. Safety is not ideological.
The further I scroll into the sports section that concentrates only on
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
150
soccer, I grow tired of looking at the news. It is hard to not give in to
fatigue and despair and indifference when the day seems so far away in its
endless permutations and a simple critique of legality feels like inspecting
the functionality of a smoke detector while the fire is still burning. These
injustices are my injustices. But how to touch them and let them permeate
my skin􀀀 There is the problem of over􀀀identification. I have been no
stranger to this. As a child, I didn’t know I wasn’t Mexican. Or rather, I
didn’t think it mattered. Sure, I was white but so was Carlos – and he had
red hair and freckles. And though I couldn’t speak Spanish, I wanted to
learn, Raphy was teaching me a few phrases, mostly things I shouldn’t say
in front of my mother. For all the years I spent playing with my friends
from my neighborhood, Bijoux, which used to be the Mexican and Filipino
“ghetto” of South Lake Tahoe, it never occurred to me that my skin color
represented anything that might be reprehensible to Raphy, Joey and
Freddy until the day they were jumped into Sur 13 at the beginning of
seventh grade. The day after, they had black eyes and cuts and avoided me
on the bus. Joey approached me once we went around the meadow in the
bus and informed me that he was sorry, their older cousins wouldn’t let me
join the gang. Sadly, that also meant we could no longer be friends. I was a
pinche gringo. Just like Carlos had said. I was devastated. That night, my
mom found me in my room crying. I had piled up all of my CDs on my desk
and wanted to sell them. Tupac and Snoop Dogg and Dr. Dre hated me. It
was time to stop living the lie. I was white. The same race that beat Rodney
King for no reason. I thought I was a good guy, not evil. I had always
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
151
identified with my guys who lived in the apartment complex down the road
because we all loved the same thing, basketball. We were hoopers. It was
also because, although I was definitely incapable of expressing it in these
terms, because their reality seemed closer to mine than those of the other
white children I had gone to elementary school with. My parents had
misled the school district with a false address before my first day of school
so that I could attend Sierra House Elementary and not Bijoux Elementary,
which was just down the road. My father didn’t want me to learn
“Mexican” before English and so we drove twenty􀀀five minutes in
snowstorms to get to school in the morning. There, my best friend was the
heir apparent to the casino empire on the other side of the state lines,
something my father, who had worked at the casino’s painting department
before opening his own business, was infinitely proud of. For Kris’ eleventh
birthday, I was invited to join his family at the most expensive restaurant
in town, a restaurant on the top floor of his family’s hotel􀀀casino with a
magnificent view of the lake. I was nervous. Would Kris’ parents be upset
that I showed up in a polo shirt and not the suit they had requested in the
invitation􀀀 There was nothing we could do about that. I didn’t own a suit.
What we could do is figure out what I should order. My dad told me to go
for the lobster. If they’re paying, of course. He gave me thirty dollars just in
case they were cheapskates and when Kris’ father gave me the go􀀀ahead, it
was on him, I requested lobster. It was impossible. They were out. Now I
had to choose something from the menu whose words were all foreign. The
waiter recommended the scampi with linguine. Both were new to me but I
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
152
agreed without hesitation. When the food arrived, I was relieved to find
shrimp and pasta on my plate, even though it was in some unidentifiable
sauce. I was a little disappointed. They didn’t have cocktail sauce like they
did at Sizzlers. I asked for this and everyone laughed and I was too
embarrassed to use the bottle the waiter brought for me. I refresh the video
completely. It still won’t load. That’s okay. I have learned enough
fundamentals for the day. Be stable, aware of the action at all times and
establish a position. Take what comes to you, don’t force the issue and
don’t defer out of convenience. If the play is there, take it. Follow through.
Be vulnerable, uncomfortable, never defend yourself. Build relationships.
Test your limits, extend them. Make reparations. By being better on the
next play and breaking your habits. Keep working towards your goal of
living in joy, mindfulness and compassion􀀀 and compete for it. Stay with it.
You cannot do this for anyone but yourself. But you can build alliances,
kinships, whose interests won’t ever be identical. Accept that they are not
you and you are not better than them. Extend a helping hand if it is needed.
If someone doesn’t want it, like my mother doesn’t, respect their decisions.
Wait. Melanie just texted and now it is late November. She’s on her way
home from work and we have a date. Today is a good day reads her next
message. A euphemism for her fertility. I respond with some emoticons and
stand up to clean up and make dinner. I’m still a little sore from last night’s
practice but much less so than before. I take a deep breath. I am scared of
becoming a father, of not being good enough. I laugh. Haven’t I learned
anything􀀀 I turn on the heater. What could go wrong􀀀
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
153
Beginning, Again
We should have lost. Not because we were battered and diminished after
scraping through an injury􀀀riddled season, but because it would have been
better. We would have had better chances to land the man we were after in
the draft, DeMarcus Cousins, which, luck willing, would have ameliorated
the pain of what had been grueling. In winning, we pushed ourselves closer
towards the league’s vortex, the vacuum that exists in the middle.
If there is one regrettable axiom of professional basketball, it’s that
losing is winning if a championship is unreachable. The reality of losing,
intentionally, of “tanking,” is said to be healthier, better for the
development of young players, for draft picks, the future. But for the last
game of the regular season, we, perhaps naively, were not interested in
dictums or speculation. We wanted to play and to play to win. On April 14,
2010, my team, the Golden State Warriors, came back from a ten􀀀point
deficit to defeat the Portland Trailblazers on the road. And this wasn’t just
any W. We played a game for the books. Solidifying Don Nelson as the head
coach with the most wins in NBA history – an accolade, admittedly, that
would cost him further triumphs in the future 􀀀Nelson was fired by the
Warriors’ new ownership in part for chasing history, those three win, and
failing to tank􀀀 – this game was an early indication of the altitudes rookie
guard Stephen Curry would climb to, both individually and as a teammate.
In what would be his final post􀀀game interview, Don Nelson praised Curry
and the other players without end􀀀 “bottom line is that we played a
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
154
spectacular game, a great performance … Like all the guys said, they want
the video. They thought it was the greatest game they ever played in. You
know what􀀀 They might be right.”
What made this game so spectacular was the tenacity the players
demonstrated despite the unfavorable circumstances. That night in
Portland, the Golden State Warriors’ five starters planned to play in every
second of the game and it wasn’t pride that kept Stephen Curry, Monta
Ellis, Chris Hunter, Anthony Tolliver and Reggie Williams on the floor.
Aside from forfeiting, there was no choice. Every other player except
Devean George was inactive and injured. George, a small forward, was
supposed to remain on the bench as the only redundancy, the one safety
valve in case of emergency. Five minutes into the game, the Warriors
experienced the agony of Murphy’s Law when center Chris Hunter was
injured. The smaller George was forced to replace Hunter much earlier
than the Warriors’ head coach could have conjectured. The team would
have to be perfect for the next forty􀀀three minutes of game play. No
injuries, no fouling out, no ejections. For much of the remainder of
regulation, they played a spirited game – until Murphy’s Law struck again.
George picked up his final personal foul with five minutes left and was
forced to exit. With no healthy players on the bench, it was difficult to
know what would come next. Would we hobble through the final minutes
with an injured Hunter on the floor􀀀 Or would we do the “smart” thing,
admit defeat and put our faith in a better lottery number, a future that
would be radiant􀀀
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
155
As fate would have it, the legalese of the NBA has a built􀀀in loophole
that stipulates􀀀 “if a player in a game receives his sixth personal foul and all
substitutes have already been disqualified, said player shall remain in the
game.” Knowing this from previous contests that season, Nelson flexed the
league’s rulebook in an argument with the refs. The officials insisted the
other two players on the bench, Anthony Morrow and Ronny Turiaf, were
both suited up and would have to play. Nelson asterisked their attendance
with another NBA regulation – a team needs to have at least eight players
in uniform to compete. He solicited the referees to make an exception􀀀
both were nursing significant injuries. Never budging from the stringency
of the law, the refs forced Nelson to work the game’s logic. Nelson subbed
in Hunter, who reinjured himself and definitely left, then had the other two
injured players make an appearance. Both feigned hurting themselves in
the contest and left within seconds. It was obvious to everyone what was
happening. It was also necessary. The rules dictated it. While Nelson
consumed a minute and a half of game time and much more real time with
this cleverness, the opposing crowd transposed from impatient to
apoplectic. To them, this squabbling was inconsequential. Nelson already
had his record. And the home team had already clinched the sixth seed and
we would have the rest of the summer off – the Warriors had been
eliminated from the playoffs long ago. Watching the game, however, I could
sense there were other reasons to keep going, ineffable perhaps, yet no less
real.
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
156
With everyone else conclusively disqualified, Devean George was
finally allowed to reenter. We were now down 110–108 and we looked
exhausted. We should have lost. That is until, Stephen Curry “turned on
the faucet,” scoring eleven of his then career high forty􀀀two points in the
final minutes. As Don Nelson said, “the story tonight is Steph.” And his
story was a jump shot from the baseline, a pull􀀀up three from the wing, a
guarded step back jumper at the elbow, two free throws, and two more.
Final score􀀀 122–116. Not giving in to adversity, Curry performed magic.
Nelson􀀀 “it was special.” And it couldn’t have happened without his
teammates.
Like this game, this book is about not giving in to projections and
statistics. It’s about learning to stick with it and fight for what you believe
in – which may take effort itself to discover – especially when it’s difficult.
Without using too many synonyms or complex constructions that dress up
simple yet elusive truths, it’s an old fashioned Bildungsroman about making
life worth living and learning from history, teachers and contemporaries
that attempts – or essays – to develop strategies for being in the present.
It’s also about the game I love, basketball. The game I have spent
decades playing and watching, the game that has been just as luminous for
me as my other love, poetry – if not more so. Before discovering the world
of words, basketball provided a way to survive the daily domestic
calamities, the violence at home and the boredom of the public school
system. Out on the court, I could just play and play for hours. I was lucky
my father encouraged or even pushed my interest in sports. When I was
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
157
ten, we moved into a larger house in South Lake Tahoe, California and he
installed a backboard above our garage door. Once the snow began to melt
in the Sierra Nevadas’ late spring, I would spend every afternoon after
school and all day during the summer shooting hoops. I knew every crack
in the asphalt, the gaps that approximated the three􀀀point and free throw
lines as well as where the ball would bounce out of alignment from the
Ponderosa pine’s carnage, the roots upheaving and destroying my court􀀀
which was not irksome, just a given. With the length of happy days, I
devised complicated games for myself, practiced the signature moves of
star players and invited neighbors over to play. Out there, nothing else
mattered. I felt like a king.
Sports enthusiasts will testify this is not uncommon. Whether it be
gymnastics, hurling or cricket, athletes often reminisce about how sports
had saved them. Kevin Durant, for instance, has spelled out his ability to
forget all his worries on the court on a number of occasions. As a youth, it
was like an invisible wall surrounded the playground or gym, making him
impervious to the crippling poverty in Seat Pleasant, Maryland, to the gang
warfare in his neighborhood or to the long hours traveling across town to
the mostly white blue􀀀chip high schools whose programs were being
watched by college scouts. The court was all that mattered. This sense of
sanctity carried over into his adult life as well. After losing to the Warriors
in the 2016 Western Conference Finals, Durant, who then played for the
Oklahoma City Thunder, told reporters there are “so many emotions we try
to bottle in, and also let out when we’re on the floor. And I think the guys
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
158
􀀀on the Thunder􀀀 did a good job of using basketball as a refuge, just letting
it out and letting that be a shield for everything and just being yourself
when you’re out here on the floor.” Playing basketball, then, can eclipse
societal and private concerns. It can provide a lens to look at yourself,
establishing a link with the person you really are. Or, more emphatically, as
the ex􀀀player cum philosopher cum theologian cum shaman, Onaje X.O.
Woodbine, writes, the game can offer those society normally persecutes or
ignores a place to gain recognition􀀀 “in the flow of the game we could
discover a feeling of worth the larger society would not afford us.”
One of the great dramas in life is this doesn’t last forever. Though
my upbringing was not as caustic, every time I dented the garage door
while practicing fade􀀀aways or tore pieces of sheetrock out of my bedroom
wall when I dunked on my Nerf backboard, I had to face the fact that life
doesn’t like to be shut out for too long. Even if you play an excellent game
without mistakes, you might anger an uncle who outweighs you. Fighting
for his pride, he might “accidentally” elbow your fourteen􀀀year􀀀old face as
you imitate Michael Jordan on a reverse layup in the driveway. If he does
and your tongue is stuck out, you might almost bite right through it.
Coming from humble beginnings means a trip to the hospital is out of the
question unless a bone has become visible, or worse. This is something you
would like to avoid anyway after the last time you went to the down􀀀
market medical center from a basketball injury and were made to feel the
incredible guilt of shouldering your family with medical debt. You may
have only landed awkwardly while trying to save the ball from grazing your
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
159
father’s newly reseeded lawn but the cost of all the braces and lengthy
treatments for tendonitis in both knees was not easily forgotten. So, in
moments like these, you hope your tongue will stop bleeding. When it does,
you swallow your grace with meal after meal of cinnamon applesauce and
pray for the day you can eat solids again. Meanwhile, you keep playing.
Seeing sports as a sanctuary has been critical not only for aspiring
athletes trying to make their way in and through the world but also for
theorists who wish to delineate the function of athletics. The first, most
fundamental premise of both jocks and nerds is that sports “always appear
to be at a distance from the interests and strategies that make up our
everyday world,” as the literary scholar Hans Ulrich Gumbrecht has
written. With the ball in our hands, the day’s dentist appointment,
spreadsheets, traffic and unanswered introspections seem to vanish. We
focus solely on our movements, our teammates, opponents, the present, as
we catch the ball then square our shoulders and hips before launching up
for a jump shot within an eternity of seconds. Often we feel as if we are part
of something greater than the concerns of our wrinkled organs and we love
it. We love it for providing solace from the pressures of our social
obligations, for suspending the weight of that which equips our existence
with meaning􀀀 our relationships, beliefs and desires, out of which our lives
are assembled. This does not mean the presence dimension is without
meaning. In it, we experience events and phenomena that have an impact
on our bodies and senses. Through training, repetition and playing, our
bodies and sensory apparatus learn ways of moving, of perceiving, of being,
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
160
and this gives us meaning both on and off the court. As Gumbrecht
suggests, “knowledge is not exclusively conceptual.”
Interestingly, this is not limited to those who have sweat pooling on
the smalls of their backs. Gumbrecht pushes further in his In Praise of
Athletic Beauty and argues we are also in the presence dimension when we
spectate. Until the final horn blows, players, coaches, announcers and
viewers are all snuggled up in the present. Totally immersed in the
moment, we are inseparable from what we are doing. We are aware only of
the present as we hold our breath when the balls leaves Stephen Curry’s
hands, and we are ecstatic – or devastated – when it touches nothing but
net. “This kind of experience,” the legendary coach Phil Jackson writes,
“happens all the time on the basketball floor􀀀 that’s why the game is so
intoxicating.” It is this intoxication that explains the anger of the Portland
Trailblazers’ fans during the aforementioned game against the Warriors.
The fans were incensed that this precious realm could be litigated and
suspended, that Don Nelson barricaded them from their hard􀀀earned entry
to presence through exegesis. Thoughts like these lead Gumbrecht to
hypothesize further that the real function of sports, the reason the billion
dollar industries of athletic spectacles are so damned important today, is
that they provide us with a key to the door of presence in a society that has
lost most other points of entry – “a scarcity of presence components in
everyday life may produce an overwhelmingly strong desire to see the
world from an angle of presence. For what we most desire is almost always
the hardest to obtain.”
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
161
In my own life, this sounds about right. It is difficult to get to this
realm of presence when there are bills to pay, calls to make and lines at the
grocery store. There is the continual frustration in dealing with rude or
overbearing customers and my embarrassment for not letting it go when I
drag on about it over dinner with my partner. Whenever I am able to put
aside life’s concerns though, I am always very grateful. I feel my shoulders
slacken, my jaw unclench and a sense of calm and focus. Nowadays, after
shooting hoops or meditating, I perceive a distance between myself and my
daily preoccupations. This distance does not erase them. It only disallows
them from affecting me as violently as before. This may seem to
corroborate the fundamental premise of jocks and nerds but it subtly yet
irrevocably modifies the refuge into a thoroughfare. The world is not
irrelevant􀀀 it is something I am in and I can change my behavior in relation
to. With practice, the power on the court can bleed into all other activities.
I can find the same level of presence in the subway or grocery store. In
other words, sports offer a path to presence in a world that seems to lack it.
I doubt furthermore that life can be totally shut out or that we should let it.
No matter how enraptured I may be watching a game on Sunday, there’s
still the laundry – and I know it. Commercials or timeouts remind me of
every unanswered email, and I don’t instantly forget them when the game
starts up again. It seems to me there is a way to see the realms of presence
and meaning as islands in an archipelago. I would like to think that when
the tide of hyperrationalization is out we can take them for what they are,
connected by a sandbar, which is only invisible because of a lack of focus
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
162
that succumbs to the onslaught of so􀀀called diversions, self􀀀absorbed
anxieties and chores.
Nevertheless, the notion of sports being a refuge is pervasive and
very convincing. When I was in college, my father would often lecture me
before family functions about what I was allowed to discuss with my
extended relatives. Philosophy, religion, literature and politics were out,
and since I hadn’t seen the latest blockbusters, that left only sports. “Just
stick to sports,” he’d say, “and none of that other bullshit.” Sports
represented a space where we could all come together. Sports were the
great equalizer where glaziers, painting contractors, 911 operators, students
and the disabled were all in the same league. Sports were an analogue for
living democratically, horizontal coexistence. We could do away with that
which disbanded us and unite in the presence of the seventh inning. The
problem with this wishful thinking is the women in our families were never
welcome to watch the games. They were laughed at for not understanding
the rules or for mixing up the names of players, their teams. The problem,
in essence, has to do with exclusion and, by extension, with the
misconception that presence should exclude meaning.
Still, I subscribed to this reasoning. Not wanting to make these
obligatory visits feel longer than they already did by sitting in the corner,
glumly sipping on some beverage, I would study the box scores, standings,
trades, playoff pictures and draft prospects for football and baseball before
Thanksgiving, Christmas or family reunions in the summer. It wouldn’t be
long until I would give up this game and spend holidays with my beloved
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
163
Uncle Chris, my mother’s sister’s husband, and he would teach me about
quantum physics, the entanglement of an event and its interpretation 􀀀the
entanglement, that is, of presence and meaning􀀀 and his conception of God
– a being whose faculties are activated in every mathematically proven
dimension. Condemned to this dimension, however, I would bifurcate the
conversation whenever my God􀀀fearing relatives slung mud at their wives,
doctors, employees or bosses. I would praise the Oakland Raiders or
Oakland Athletics and the day’s pigment would change. 􀀀Raised in Santa
Cruz, California, my father’s family had been Oakland sports fans since the
1960s􀀀 and just as the Catholic priest believes, I am testament to what
happens when you insert a being into a context before it can think􀀀 I’ve
never questioned my lifelong adoration of the Warriors – while I was
growing up, they were in Oakland.􀀀 My family would temporarily forget I
was a “pinko” and would agree with my assessment of the team or educate
me about the intricacies I was missing. Just as hungry for harmony and
frightened by discord as my father, I was always happy when we talked
about the pigskin and got lost in numbers. My Republic, Mormon􀀀
converted, extended family would forget I was the only cousin of more than
a dozen getting a “liberal” education when we discussed field goal
percentage rates and the best left􀀀handed closers. These facts and statistics
suspended time and judgment as good as any Hail Mary – or perhaps even
better. For, watching the games had an air of unpredictability that could
unlace tightly wrapped beliefs. Certain plays could facilitate foul smelling
bigotry to be aired in heated moments without thinking. On more than one
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
164
occasion, an opponent outran or outwitted a Raider and someone yelled,
“get that nigger,” and I lost it. Could they really be so ignorant􀀀 Is this how
they really felt􀀀 Were they really such fucking pigs􀀀 If it was one of my
uncles who said this and not my father, he would do his best to calm me as
the announcers washed over the awkwardness and I got ready to leave.
They didn’t mean it like that, they’d say. Didn’t I know how to take a joke􀀀
I didn’t.
Sadly, this is not a rarity. Athletes and sports fans all over the world
show where they stand, then and there, in this realm of presence and our
access to it is shaped by past experiences, future aspirations and beliefs –
that is, meaning. During the pickup game with my uncle, for instance, both
of us were venting old grievances. It was a classical matchup between a
bully and a nerd, and we were fighting within and against these categories
as much as with one another. Possessed by an ancient yet adolescent
animosity towards a tyrant who always exhibited his greatness by brutishly
throwing his weight around, I wanted to prove that my interest in
intellectual pursuits would not limit my physical performance. I wanted to
prove these interests would enhance my ability, even if only by
psychologically discombobulating my opponent when I called a crossover,
left􀀀side flip bank shot then sank it – a tactic I had learned from reading
stories about Larry “Legend” Bird. When my uncle’s elbow connected with
my face and I christened him an asshole and he pushed me into the
Ponderosa pine tree, it was a momentary consummation of his rage
towards a life of never feeling like he was good enough, a frustration that
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
165
explained why he always enjoyed squashing my cousins and me in
horseshoes, ping􀀀pong or Monopoly. Later that day, he would begrudgingly
apologize for getting carried away in the game and I would accept this in
my heart only after my father revealed his brother was having a hard time
coping with the physical and mental consequences of his recently
diagnosed multiple sclerosis. I was still angry hours later when everyone
was feasting on ribs and corn and I gummed apple puree but I realized my
uncle’s condition must not be easy for him. It was then that I had an
embryonic hunch of the impossibility of banishing the world from the four
corners of the court.
Without yet being fully aware of it, that day taught me that even if
we believe the interests and strategies making up our everyday world are
provisionally suspended while watching or playing sports, we are just what
we are at that moment, and that can be ugly. This is one reason why many
intellectuals are allergic to sports and condemn its adrenaline􀀀fueled
violence. Characterizing them as a mere distraction, some intellectuals
have even suggested sports have replaced religion as the opiate for the
masses. I find this hard to believe since eighty􀀀four percent of the world
population still belongs to some creed and also because I can’t compute
stomping through the face of a rival fan high on heroin. If anything, sports
would have to be more like PCP􀀀 a dissociative drug that induces a sense of
detachment from the world as well as exaggerated strength and aggression.
Case number 24,369,047􀀀 in the summer of 2016, videos surfaced of
clashes between English and Russian soccer hooligans before the European
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
166
Cup commenced. As they ripped through Marseille’s city center, these
vandals did their best to destroy one another with bottles, fists, iron bars
and café chairs. Many people were injured in the battles as well as in others
in Lille, Paris, Nice, Saint􀀀Étienne and Lyon. Countless arrests were made
and bans were placed on alleged hooligan bosses from entering the
stadiums or country yet this reaction by the authorities was only a band􀀀
aid on a seismic rip. According to The Economist, the tournament’s
organizers even expected violence, except, as always, “not like this.”
The racist violence marring the European Cup was in abundance
even outside of France. Here in Germany, it happened, in part, with words.
The far􀀀right politician Alexander Gauland from the populist AfD
􀀀Alternative für Deutschland􀀀 intimated that the West􀀀Berlin native Jérôme
Boateng, whose father is from Ghana and mother from Germany, may be a
great soccer player but he wasn’t the kind of person you would want as a
neighbor. When the news agency Der Spiegel gave Gauland space to clarify
his remarks about the heavily tattooed yet deeply religious and good􀀀
natured Boateng, he doubled down instead of folding. Boateng wasn’t the
only problem according to Gauland. There was also Mesut Özil, who is a
third􀀀generation Turkish􀀀German. This wasn’t necessarily a problem – the
website Politically Incorrect has indicated that more than a third of AfD
voters have a Migrationshintergrund 􀀀migration background􀀀 and thus
Gauland had to be careful not to insult a considerable portion of his
constituency. What was truly despicable for Gauland was that Özil is a
practicing Muslim. How dare he visit Mecca when he’s supposed to be a
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
167
role model for children􀀀 And he said all of this before Özil visited with
Erdoğan􀀀 In this conversation, Gauland let it all hang out􀀀 the German
team wasn’t even German anymore. They were all just a bunch of rich
foreigners looking to grab some cash. It was time, he believed, for Germany
and its football team to become German again.
I know, it’s distressing. It’s distressing that these forms of
nationalism and racism are even put on parade during major sporting
competitions and that it is perfectly acceptable to indulge in. Having
moved to Berlin in 2005, I witnessed this here in the Land der Dichter und
Denker 􀀀Country of Poets and Thinkers􀀀 when Germany hosted the World
Cup in 2006. Though open displays of patriotism had been problematized
for generations after the Second World War, in 2006 the German flag was
like pollen. It drifted from balcony to T􀀀shirt to decal to face paint –
everything was covered. There was an intense debate in the media about
the legitimacy of such outright forms of patriotism given the country’s
condemnable nationalistic history of genocide yet the consensus seemed to
be it was good for young Germans, three or four generations removed from
the atrocities of the previous century, to get over the guilt􀀀trip they had
inherited and support their soccer team. That year, national pride was
cautious and awkward but it was still insidious. Racial and national
stereotypes were flaunted, laughed at and agreed upon. Italians were all
lazy spaghettis, the French, dandies more concerned with their
appearances – and this wasn’t the worst of what I experienced. When
Zinedine Zidane head􀀀butted Marco Materazzi in overtime in the World
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
168
Cup Final, someone at the viewing party I stumbled onto blurted out that
only a ruffian immigrant would end his career in such a base fashion.
Zidane’s final act as a footballer was certainly shocking and it has
never stopped dividing opinions. While news agencies like Slate have called
the head butt a “scene from a French gangster flick” and have detailed
Zidane’s history of dirty plays, others have justified Zidane’s reaction after
having lip􀀀readers decipher the racist insults of Materazzi. Some artists
have gone further and been inspired by it. Immortalized, for instance, as a
bronze sculpture by the artist Adel Abdessemed 􀀀who described the head
butt as “an act of freedom”), it was also the focal point of the essay
“Zidane’s Melancholy” by the writer Jean􀀀Philippe Toussaint. In this essay,
Toussaint eulogizes Zidane’s sense of presence – Zidane “experienced with
heartrending intensity the feeling of simply being there, in the Olympic
Stadium in Berlin, at that precise moment, the evening of the World Cup
Final” – and confirms Gumbrecht’s hypothesis that spectators are in the
same dimension of presence as the athletes. Toussaint details his own
relation to the present as a spectator and identifies some version of
himself, the narrator, with the football hero, going even so far as to suggest,
“Zidane’s melancholy is my melancholy, I know, I’ve fed it and I feel it.”
Aside from confirming a number of points addressed here, Toussaint also
authenticates the potential violence of fandom when he sketches his own
participation in the bad behavior of soccer fanatics in his book Football,
which includes “Zidane’s Melancholy” as an appendix. Toussaint writes in
another text that “football allows you to be, not nationalistic, which would
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
169
have a detestable political connotation that leaves me entirely cold, and
not even patriotic, but chauvinistic, by which I mean a non􀀀duped, second􀀀
level nationalism, an ironic nationalism” that grants “a simple􀀀minded
comfort, the more flavorsome for being accompanied by a temporarily
acceptable intellectual regression. I become biased, aggressive, vehement,
combative, I insult the referee, I curse and castigate him. I vilify the other
team. I give free rein to the impulses of violence and aggression that
normally have no place in my personality. I agree to stupidity and
ordinariness. I award myself a treat – let’s call it catharsis.”
This alarming self􀀀portrayal by a “mild􀀀mannered” intellectual
brings us to the heart of the matter. It shows no one should pretend only
the poor, uneducated, drunk and bloodthirsty act repugnantly in the
stadium or in front of their screens. The potential for violence will always
be present so long as we don’t reconfigure fundamental positions that go
deeper than noetic convictions. It also shows that Toussaint affirms the gap
between presence and meaning, as well as between sports and intellectual
pursuits, even as he tries to bridge them. His epigraph to Football makes
this painfully clear􀀀 “this is a book no one will like, not intellectuals, who
aren’t interested in football, or football􀀀lovers, who will find it too
intellectual. But I had to write it, I didn’t want to break the fine thread that
still connects me to the world.”
This epigraph also illuminates one of the great paradoxes of sports.
While sports appear to be far from the concerns of the world, they remain
worldly and of “the people” – that is, unfit or undesirable for those whose
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
170
lives are more absorbed in thinking and constructing meaning. It wasn’t
always like this though. Toussaint and his quintessentially modern
European melancholia may be consoled to know that the chasm between
sports and “high” culture was not always as wide as it is today. The Ancient
Greeks even situated their academies in the vicinity of the gymnasium.
Plato staged a number of dialogues within its Athenian complex and poets
like Pindar wrote odes for victors, comparing them to gods, mythological
figures. Nevertheless, it is true that the world has changed, is changing􀀀
which also means it can keep changing, even for the better.
For now, however, Toussaint’s confession of game􀀀time aggression
and my family’s bigoted interjections sketch the problem of spectatorship,
whose bloated, warped shadow envelops everything when we perceive
action to be at a distance. By relishing in temporary regressions while
passively viewing, we make ourselves vulnerable to what philosopher
Hannah Arendt called the banality of evil. In certain circumstances, we
may even act reprehensibly when the responsibility for our actions can be
placed on others or when there are no obvious consequences. Although
Arendt was addressing the particularities of fascism in Germany during the
Second World War, the banality of evil can be felt in other countries and
arenas.
One of the more remote contours of this shadow that keeps me up at
night is the development of artificial intelligence and automation. At some
grocery stores, a single clerk has become a spectator to an interaction
between customers and machines. They watch as dozens of customers scan
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
171
their groceries and only intervenes when necessary. This is cheaper for the
companies, even despite the occasional stealing, since employees need
continual remuneration, sick days and benefits, unlike the self􀀀service
machines. With these jobs eliminated and no universal income, though, the
other clerks, ex􀀀employees, still need to make a living and might not have
the skill sets for new forms of labor. As such, it always confuses me when
corporate executives eulogize the great good automation can do for society
and never consider the fact that millions of lives are in danger of becoming
more precarious. Even worse, we become spectators to things as boring as
buying groceries. We lose all responsibility for what is happening.
Sixty years ago, Arendt already issued a warning􀀀 “if it should turn
out to be true that knowledge 􀀀in the modern sense of know􀀀how􀀀 and
thought have parted company for good, then indeed we would become
helpless slaves, not so much of our machines as of our know􀀀how,
thoughtless creatures at the mercy of every gadget which is technically
possible, no matter how murderous it is.” Reaching for my phone, this feels
shamefully familiar. Even if we can suppress the awareness of the dreadful
conditions these technological devices are created in, it disturbs me that I
subject myself, willingly, to the projected worldview Facebook’s algorithm
surmises I subscribe to. I can only escape this self􀀀imposed insularity with
great effort – an effort which becomes Sisyphean in that each attempt to
escape it is surpassed by their algorithm. After clicking a sad face on a
video about the bleaching of the Great Barrier Reef, I will be shown more
stories about climate change the next time I open the page. The same is
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
172
true if I click on basketball news, leftist takes on the G20, poetry readings
or childhood friends’ pictures of their children. Today, the Evil Queen’s
magic mirror in Snow White does not tell the truth, the whole truth and
nothing but the truth, but the truth I would like to hear. That said, there
have been efforts in recent years to change these templates of behavior.
The ex􀀀CEO of Twitter, Evan Williams, for instance, has repented for the
monster he helped create by reimagining how the internet could work. His
last substantial project, Medium, is a platform for thought pieces and in􀀀
depth writing. His answer to the contemporary crisis of insularity and the
banality of evil is thought, thinking, and it echoes Arendt perfectly.
Thinking for Arendt is “an ever􀀀present faculty in everybody” that
drives us beyond what we already know. It compels us to pose questions
that are, in a way, unknowable. Murky as these issues may be, they demand
that we create meaning. But, Arendt intones, thinking does not yield
foolproof results – once you’ve thought of something, you cannot check it
off the to􀀀do list forever. Meaning has to be made, again and again, and this
quest should nudge us to action. Johann Wolfgang von Goethe 􀀀offstage􀀀􀀀
“Moreover, I hate everything which merely instructs me without increasing
or directly quickening my activity.” Characterized by plurality 􀀀“the
condition of human action because we are all the same, that is, human, in
such a way that nobody is ever the same as anyone else who ever lived,
lives, or will live”) and freedom 􀀀the capacity to make new beginnings􀀀,
action for Arendt requires us to actively make ourselves present to each
other through what we say and do. As such, meaning is not antithetical to
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
173
presence. We just need to come together and begin anew. And I would like
to. Take two. Action.
Cue􀀀 “I award myself a treat – let’s call it catharsis.”
Greek for cleansing, purgation or purification, catharsis is a critical
notion for understanding spectatorship and one that has been debated
since the Ancient Greeks philosophized in the steamy gymnasium. It was
Aristotle who first used catharsis to describe what happens to the public,
the spectators, when they witness a Tragedy. Roughly, Aristotle’s idea is
this􀀀 after some hours watching a Tragedy whose portrayed events arouse
feelings of “pity and fear,” we’re supposed to expel negative emotions 􀀀in
tears􀀀 and leave the theater feeling refreshed and renewed. In this view, the
poet’s words are like charcoal filters􀀀 when you pass through them, you
emerge as pure as crystals. It is a strategy that has been implemented for
centuries and can be felt whenever you say “don’t go in there􀀀” to a
character in a horror film. By exhibiting pity for a hero or heroine who has
less awareness of the situation than you do in the safety of your movie seat,
you are said to flush out any excess of emotion in your system and so
restore your natural balance. This idea, however, has not been without
critics. Even before Aristotle, Plato criticized our relationship to poetry
and theatrical spectatorship. Plato believed mimesis 􀀀the imitation of
events􀀀 only brings the writer and recipient further from the Truth. As
such, Plato concluded, those who dabble in it – poets – should be
expatriated from his famed Republic. If poets were allowed to stay, they
would only fan the flames of passion, a bad habit that causes suffering.
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
174
Plato’s verdict might be troublesome if we put all our faith in the
rationality of knowledge. If we follow Gumbrecht, and believe knowledge is
not purely conceptual, then we have to concede the emotions we feel while
reading a poem or watching a TV series are not irrelevant. And besides,
who says poets don’t tell the truth􀀀 In my experience, a good poem asks me
to think and feel with its string of syllables, images, propositional content
and music􀀀 and a great poem demonstrates that its totality is not arbitrary.
It leads me to make meaning from all of its elements. In a way, Plato is
right. A poem is not the truth, it is an indication. Or, borrowing a metaphor
from the Zen tradition, a poem is not the moon, it is a finger pointing at the
moon.
Take, for example, Rainer Maria Rilke’s “Archaic Torso of Apollo.”
This poem, which contemplates the muscularity and physical presence of
an Ancient Greek statue, has a startling conclusion that always leaves me
bowled over. In this poem about spectating a figure whose head is missing, I
am implicated into an experience. I am put in relation to the torso as well
as the person looking at it. While I look over Rilke’s shoulder, both of us are
drawn to an invigorating conclusion. We need to snap out of the past and
into the present􀀀
We never knew his head and all the light
that ripened in his fabled eyes. But
his torso still burns like a streetlight dimmed
in which his gaze, lit long ago,
holds fast and shines. Otherwise the surge
of the breast could not blind you, nor a smile
run through the slight twist of the loins
toward that center where procreation flared.
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
175
Otherwise this stone would stand cut off
and cold under the shoulder’s transparent drop
and not glisten like a wild beast’s fur􀀀
and not break forth from all its contours
like a star􀀀 for there is no place
that does not see you. You must change your life.
– translation Edward Snow
This poem refreshes me. It challenges me. It reminds me that even if the
world is broken, it still possesses beauty and power – and that everything is
interconnected. Rilke expresses this in the semantics and diction as well as
through the poem’s movement. Grappling with an experience, Rilke
couches it in negation before the final revelation, a revelation that extends
beyond the particulars. A poem like this does not offer cathartic purgation.
It is not cleansing. It throws me the mop and tells me to get busy. Or􀀀 as a
finger pointing at the moon, it asks me to bear witness to reality and act
responsibly. In its tenderness, there is some relief but it is the relief of a hot
towel doled out after some turbulence just as the captain announces the
onset of more turbulence.
While the world of contemporary art has cut back on the towels
during its intercontinental hauls and has purposefully steered into the
turbulence, writers and thinkers like Toussaint and Gumbrecht still need a
fix of catharsis and turn to sports. Toussaint seems to believe we can
expunge our inner agitation and realign our inner constitutions after
screaming at the screen. The problem of associating sports with cathartic
purgation, however, is that it doesn’t explain the dramatic spike of
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
176
domestic violence directly after major sporting events. It also ignores the
fact that, for Aristotle, catharsis is directly linked to anagnosis, the
moment when characters come to terms with their own responsibility. The
release in a Greek Tragedy only happens after a reconciliation with reality
and as such catharsis might be better associated with reestablishing a
connection with the world.
Should we interpret catharsis like this, we can see why sports are
empowering and not purifying. They equip us with tools to deal with the
world. Youth coaches, young athletes and non􀀀helicopter parents will
agree􀀀 sports provide an opportunity to be better in tune with who you are
and want to be. If you can incorporate your game􀀀time impressions of
plurality and freedom into your everyday life, then a new sense of power
can be experienced. You can figure out how to react to stress calmly and in
control. This is an indirect way of saying power comes from unifying
presence and meaning. Arendt again􀀀 “power is actualized only where word
and deed have not parted company, where words are not empty and deeds
not brutal, where words are not used to veil intentions but to disclose
realities, and deeds are not used to violate and destroy but to establish
relations and create new realities.” Power for Arendt is the capacity to act
“in concert” for public and political purposes. But in order for everyone,
even those on the sidelines, to act in concert, we’ll need to rethink the role
of spectators.
Take three. Action.
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
177
Normally understood as being passive, spectatorship has been
reappraised by philosophers, who categorically challenge the coupling of
“passive” and “spectator.” Kendall Walton, for instance, suggests
spectatorship is an active undertaking by definition. When we read a poem,
watch a play or look at a painting, we actively observe, select, compare and
interpret their specifics. Art objects for him are props that prescribe
specific imaginings. To demonstrate this, Walton makes an analogy
between art objects and children’s toys in Mimesis as Make􀀀Believe. For
him, the integration of our previous experiences into our current act of
perceiving is no different than the ways a child regards a stick – for one
child, the stick is a gun, for another, a fishing pole, for another, a magic
wand, etc. Or rather, we play with paintings the same way children play
with Lego. We construct things. Breughel’s apocalyptic The Triumph of
Death may elicit a more sophisticated and prescriptive game than my
childhood Stars Wars toys but they both lead to fictional truths that dictate
what I’m supposed to imagine. Walton suspects further that “make􀀀believe
may be crucially involved as well in certain religious practices, in the role
of sports in our culture, in the institution of morality, in the postulation of
‘theoretical’ entities in science” and other realms of experience. In effect,
his make􀀀believe theory encompasses much of reality.
The philosopher Jacques Rancière goes even further than this and
sets out to “emancipate” the spectator by abolishing the distinctions
between spectator and actor. He insists􀀀 “every spectator is already an
actor in her story􀀀 every actor, every man of action, is the spectator of the
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
178
same story.” Thus, we are always the one and the other. How radical􀀀 And
also banal􀀀 After all, William Shakespeare already condensed this in As You
Like It􀀀 “All the world’s a stage 􀀀 And all the men and women merely
players.” And you know what􀀀 That’s just how I like it. And it’s how Bertolt
Brecht liked it as well.
Cut.
Bertolt Brecht􀀀
What’s my motivation􀀀
Unhappy with the famous fourth wall separating the stage from the
spectators, the action from the living, Brecht wanted theatergoers to stop
merely consuming theatrical experiences. A fan of boxing, Brecht first tried
to solve this riddle by suggesting spectators should talk loudly and smoke
cigars during performances like they did at matches. This would change the
theatergoers’ viewing habits as well as help them stay awake after a solid
pre􀀀performance meal. You might then think glazed over food coma eyes
were what led Brecht to reexamine theater’s potential. In fact, it was his
political convictions and the world he was in, the avant􀀀garde theaters of
the 1920s in Berlin. Utilizing the previously developed techniques of
interruption – which is like freezing the frame in a film – as well as an
expansion on Noh theater’s estrangement effect – which would hinder the
viewers from identifying with the characters on stage since the actors did
not identify with the characters themselves – Brecht developed an “epic
theater” as an attack on mimesis and catharsis as well as on the kinds of
theater they produce􀀀 “what liberation is this, given that at the end of all
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
179
these plays, which worked happily only because of the spirit of their time
􀀀providence – the moral order􀀀, we live a dream􀀀like execution that
punishes exaltations as much as debaucheries􀀀” Brecht’s early to mid
career plays all toy with our expectations and are purposefully
anticlimactic. They evade the seemingly logical nature of a play’s
culmination. By leaving the conclusions of his plays open, Brecht believed
the spectators would not succumb to the entrenched expectation of
cathartic purgation and would, instead, feel called to political action.
Unable to find a resolution in the comfort of a theater seat, they would
bring it into being in the world.
Brecht made a number of attempts to rebuke catharsis and mimesis,
yet eventually abandoned his full􀀀frontal attack in his late plays. “We who
are concerned to change human as well as ordinary nature,” Brecht writes
in 1951, “must find means of ‘shedding light on’ the human being.” At this
stage of his career, he ditched his earlier proclivity for irritants. He now felt
that such an examination had to be “both beautiful and entertaining.”
During his most radical phase however, he explored “learning􀀀plays” and
sketched notes for a learning􀀀play theory in the early 1930s. These plays
were abrasive and caused a hive􀀀like breakout on the theatrical landscape.
Like his other earlier work, these plays were supposed to dialectically teach
people the correct way to live – even if only by accurately formulating the
problem and showing the failures of wrong answers. These highly didactic
and polemic pieces differ from his other work since the learning􀀀plays were
developed for the participants and not the audience. When Brecht wrote
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
180
these plays, he intended them to be performed by amateur actors and not
by professionals. They were made, in a way, for active spectators. Like
Montessori schools, Brecht believed here in “learning by doing􀀀” “the
learning􀀀play teaches by being played and not by being seen. No spectator
is necessary for the learning􀀀play, nevertheless he can be utilized.” Brecht
tested ways to get the public involved long before the art world would
embrace movements like Fluxus, which implicated the spectator. Without
access to the infrastructure of contemporary museums, however, he had to
sell tickets. Setting aside his revolutionary aims and political convictions
for a second, we might remember Brecht was running a theater and had a
family to feed – as well as collaborators 􀀀whom he “worked with” and
“borrowed from”) and mistresses. Brecht was a cigar􀀀smoking businessman
who loved women and a good fight, and when he realized the audience was
not willing to jump into the ring in Berlin’s theater scene in the early 1930s,
he tried to get the public more involved by handing out surveys after the
play and inviting audience members to come back and discuss what they
had seen at a later date. As you might imagine, this effort was essentially
imperfect. But it was a start. And it was my start as well.
When I moved to Berlin in August 2005 with the official reason to
study Brecht’s learning􀀀play theory and its influence on his successor
Heiner Müller, I concentrated on the more radical formulations of the
theory, the role the learning􀀀plays played in Brecht’s court appearance at
the House of Un􀀀American Activities Committee and how Müller navigated
staging Brecht and his own learning􀀀play Mauser outside of East Germany.
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
181
While this theory and its iterations were invigorating, I began to panic as I
immersed myself in the material. I couldn’t reconcile becoming a scholar of
a theory and praxis that demanded no outsiders with the disinterested
distance academic work requires. I too broke out in hives. I tried to explain
to myself that a scholar was Brecht’s “utilized spectator” although my time
in the archives felt like the opposite. I was not the referee or the Greek
Chorus interacting with the players, I was the blog boy blathering in the
nosebleeds about what he thinks should happen while his friend pukes in
the hood of the sweatshirted gentleman in front of him. I was disgusted.
With myself and with the struggle to make this idea breathe again. I was
also deeply embarrassed to be receiving a monthly stipend for sitting
around feeling bad about myself, getting no further with the research I was
supposed to be doing. I was too inhibited to tell the DAAD bureaucrats that
nothing was happening and even more mortified to say anything to my
friends about my luxurious existence. I went to the theater every night, as
this could be called research, but mostly the eight􀀀hour long plays at the
Volksbühne filled with filth and nakedness as well as colonialist thinking
were a way for me to avoid going home where there were much bigger
problems awaiting me.
Anyway, if I agreed with Heiner Müller that “utopian moments” are
only achieved by breaking through boundaries, what good was I doing
standing on the sidelines, judging everything that was already history􀀀
After an unhealthy amount of brooding, I figured it out. And although I no
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
182
longer discredit the work of academics, this period of estrangement showed
me what I was really after􀀀 I also wanted in on the action.
So, just as I had done in my driveway, I practiced and copied my
idols. Writing on reams of staff paper 􀀀since I considered these first efforts
to be etudes, or studies􀀀, I worked on a learning􀀀play, distilling its lessons,
translating them to today. With what I hoped would be the literary
equivalent of dream shakes, sky hooks and double clutch layups as well as
something totally unprecedented, my first play, Dogs, Wolves, Coyotes, was
staged for a single night at the English Theater Berlin in 2007. It was an
overambitious piece but I am thankful for the opportunity that came out of
it. It set the stage for an even bigger failure when I was asked to take part in
a performance party at the theater later in the summer.
My plan for the evening was very simple. I would bring photocopies
of Müller’s learning􀀀play Mauser in German and English and read it in the
theater’s foyer. If someone stopped to spectate, I would hand them a copy,
show them where I was and ask them to read with me. The play only has
one character, a bit part and a chorus, so I figured I only needed to find one
other person and I could cover the rest. Together, we would already be an
ensemble. I secured my main actor in a drunken Scotsman after only a
couple of minutes and was pleased to see the ball rolling. It wasn’t long
before a number of people from a number of nations gathered. A chorus
assembled in two languages and multiple accents. All sticky and glistening
from the summer evening, we were flying high and playing with our voices􀀀
we were loud and in concert. Then, I stopped everything. Using the
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
183
Brechtian interruption, I asked everyone what they thought was happening
and why. What did the play mean to them􀀀 Could they identify with the
situation􀀀 Was there a story anyone would like to share􀀀 Before the
discussion could really get going, the organizers shut down my
performance. It was too loud, too rambunctious. It was … I refuse to
believe or repeat it. For it would imply what I am most afraid of – that this
kind of interaction is not desired, not even among creative people.
I am ashamed to admit at the first sign of adversity I quit. I wasn’t
strong enough to follow in the footsteps of my idols. I retreated. For years.
Into hermeticism. Alcohol. Tumultuous relationships. Panic attacks.
Suicide attempts. Depression. I had become a spectator to life, which at the
time seemed to be happening out there, away from me, distant. Impossible
as it is to account for every droplet leading to this flood, there are three
watermarks indicating my complete submersion into a passive notion of
spectatorship.
In fact, my struggles with spectatorship, with viewing life from a
distance, had begun much earlier. Four months before I moved to
Germany, I had corrective surgery for a severe case of scoliosis. My torso
had been warped for years and when I bent over, it looked like the right
side of my ribcage was about to jump out of my body. There were other
peculiarities – a fat deposit above my right hip, stretched muscles on the
left side of my abdomen, and uneven, sloped shoulders – as well as
excruciating, chronic pain. I only decided to address this once I started
waking up from the hot, sharp stabs in places like the dean of the
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
184
university’s lawn. When I came to on the lawn, it was hard to explain to the
gardener and the police officer standing over me that I wasn’t just some
frat boy drunk on a Tuesday morning. The police officer didn’t believe I
had simply fainted. There was color in my cheeks. I wasn’t clammy or
sweaty. I knew the day of the week. My explanation seemed fishy. They let
me off only after I stood up, bent over and lifted up my shirt. They saw my
monstrosity and told me to see a doctor. When I did, months later, the
doctor informed me the curvature would worsen by three degrees a year
until I would be completely immobile in twenty. I was frightened by the
operation, which itself might make me permanently immobile if it didn’t go
well, and even more frightened by a life of increasing pain. So I signed all
the hospital’s forms notifying me about the diseases I could receive from
blood transfusions and how the hospital was liable for none of them, even
though they would be the ones injecting the potentially poisonous blood
into me if needed.
After eight hours of being under, I was wheeled into the recovery
room with two metal rods along my spine and a handful of two􀀀inch screws
drilled into my body. This new “hardware” served as permanent scaffolding
for my newly fused vertebrae, the thirteen individual bones that were now
united, melded into one. To everyone’s surprise, the surgery was an
overwhelming success. I didn’t need a blood transfusion and I was out of
the hospital after three days. It was a miracle to be out so soon 􀀀normally
in America, you’re in the hospital for ten days and in Europe for a number
of weeks􀀀 and I felt, all things considered, pretty great. There was one odd
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
185
complication though. When I woke up in the recovery room, I was very
lucid, then slipped back under the narcosis. They had already removed the
breathing tube and going back under without it was dangerous. The nurses
reinserted the plastic into my now swollen throat, scratching my vocal
chords. Awake again, without the tube, I noticed my voice was not my own.
It was higher than before, more rattled, unable to hold a note. I had lost the
voice that was my own.
On my final obligatory checkup before leaving California, I asked my
doctor about this warble and he brushed my concerns aside. It was
“collateral damage” I would have to accept. He briskly asked me to lift up
my shirt then admired his work as if he were a sculptor. The scar was thin
and straight and I was more mobile than I had been in years. Which didn’t
mean I wouldn’t have to change my life, he said. Unaware of its prophetic
nature, I said it would be a big adjustment moving to another country, a
new language, a new city and no car to schlep groceries. That wasn’t what
he meant, he said. I could never play contact sports again. I tried to dismiss
the devastating prognostication of never being able to make a backdoor cut
and go up for a layup but I knew he was right. Three and a half inches taller,
I was 6’3” and so finally a decent height for a short point guard but I
couldn’t even tie my shoes. I had to use a shoehorn to slip slip􀀀ons on. I
would never play basketball again. This would also have to be accepted. He
then listed a number of activities I would have to avoid, none of which I
heard since I was more focused on losing basketball. No more posting up,
no more battling for rebounds, no more love. And lovemaking would also
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
186
have to be suspended, that I didn’t miss. Not only because of the lack of
lower back and hip flexibility but because my urethra had been damaged
from the catheter as the band around my thigh slipped below my knee and I
yanked on it while straightening my legs in sleep. Pissing was difficult and
an orgasm felt like a small landmine set off inside of me. My doctor gave
cold words of encouragement he had certainly learned in some afternoon
course designed for medical professionals. He crowned me “partially
disabled” and my coronation parade into a life destined for passive
spectatorship took place in the hospital’s halls during the 2005 NBA
Playoffs, which I was too shattered to watch, although I had little more to
do than lay around in my plastic corset, drink ginger ale and vegetate.
I resisted this diagnosis. I insisted that I was still active, still living.
Like a drowning swimmer who comes up before finally disappearing, I
fought to keep my head above the water. After the pain medication wore
off, I refused to be taken out of the game. Knowing that it would be foolish
to tax my tender body by banging for boards, I invested all my energy in
Brecht’s theories against spectatorship, throwing myself in heady debates
that made me feel like I was still on a court of some sort. Through a glitch
in the system, my inquiries seeped into the world. I became one of Brecht’s
amateur actors, a spectator fumbling through his lines and role. I cast
myself as the fool.
It was love that showed this to me. A great, gravitational lensing
technique that exposes intangible shadow areas and entrenched beliefs,
love demands action, care, awareness and respect. For yourself and your
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
187
partner. If one of these elements is missing, the machinery malfunctions
and the end data is corrupted. It becomes useless, erroneous, unreliable.
Love is then a mere chimera and you are given a choice􀀀 power down, fix it,
begin again – or pretend like all is well. If you choose the latter, like I did,
you are very likely to borrow a character from romantic comedies’ fictions,
which seems much easier to perform than to face up to the real dark matter
love has the potential to reveal. Unaware that these invisible shadow areas
are what make us human, I considered them to be interference, something
to be suppressed and denied and remain hidden. I created a shell for myself
to hide all these dirty things in and its shape was not much different than
the one I wore around my core after the surgery, the one that protected my
oversensitive nerve endings, organs, hardware and scar tissue from any of
the world’s potential thumps. It was a full body mask, a panzer no mirror
could get past.
And it has proven to be one stubborn motherfucker􀀀
Thick and obtrusive, this carapace, a straightjacket I happily slipped
into, kept me from spooning my eyeballs out of my skull or from chucking
telephones, mugs, ointment, candles, glasses, books or any other item that
is not currently in front of me at the wall – and that is a very good thing. It
is wonderful to not tear up the sheets or smash the bed to pieces but it also
kept me from really wrapping my arms around my loved ones and from
getting that deep, intoxicating hit of oxygen as you summon up the courage
to speak the words that make your lips quiver, the words you suppress
because it is easier or more convenient or kinder or maybe not even true,
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
188
just a fleeting moment of anger or fear. These are the words that destroy
you if they go unspoken. Words that become silent spells, where you hex
yourself and the magic begins to do what it does, eating your intestines,
clogging your lungs and turning you hair grey from the anxiety of no longer
being able to say the words you contain, the words that contain you. This
damnable shell was surely a good thing. It was the sap the raw bark
produced to protect it from the barbed wire digging into it. Over time, it
swallowed the wire and the thorns lost none of their spike, they just kept
working inward.
So, let’s remove this corset􀀀 Let’s unstrap the Velcro and let the
plastic clatter to the floor􀀀
I started seeing M three months before my surgery. It was my fifth
and decidedly last year at university – which, like the year before, ended up
not being true since I needed to stay an undergraduate to get the DAAD
stipend I had been awarded. I was living above the garage of two composers
in Woodland, California, a farm town fifteen minutes from Davis where I
studied, and she was their daughter’s babysitter. We had always had casual
interactions, brief, conversations in the composers’ kitchen about the
daughter’s protracted, frustrated attempts to propel herself forward as well
as about M’s other job as a bartender, a babysitter of adults. The composers
had made continual effort to get us together. Probably, I thought, because
they thought it would be cute. I also suspected that having their main
caregiver on site would be very convenient. At the neighborhood Christmas
party, they threw us together on the dance floor. It didn’t work.
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
189
Weeks later, on New Year’s Eve, I was stuck in Tahoe and had no way
of getting to the Bay Area, to the rave I was supposed to go to with my
friends, since I had hitched a ride home for Christmas with other friends
and the roads were now closed from the massive amount of snow Tahoe
had been battered with. No one wanted to battle this snowstorm but there
was no way I was going to miss that party. I had my father drive me to the
casinos, where a bus of Taiwanese tourists were willing to brave the
unfavorable conditions of the Sierras and I would get dropped off in
Sacramento, half an hour away, for the cool price of 􀀀30. It was a good deal
and worth the eight hours of torture I received from the audacious child
sitting behind me who kept sticking his hand through the crack in the seats
and tickling me whenever I started drifting off to sleep. I had no way to get
from Sacramento to my car in Woodland so the composers composed
another one of their ploys and suggested that I ask M. She agreed to pick
me up and drop me off and I made it to the party. A week later, after I had
recovered from pummeling my brain, I repaid the favor with drinks and
dinner. The wording here is not arbitrary. What with the colorful cocktail
being elevated to a sense of euphoria as it blended in my empty gut with my
prescribed pain medication, I was blind to the fact that the composers had
only set us up because this was in fact something M wanted.
The next morning I said this couldn’t be something. I was going to be
returning to physical infancy in eleven weeks and after that I would be
moving to Germany. This didn’t faze her. She said she would be happy to
nurse me and would love to move to Europe. She didn’t seem to
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
190
understand what I was suggesting. That I was trying to say􀀀 thank you but
no thank you. If it were a card game, my next move had been taken from
me and I only had jacks and jokers I didn’t want to discard, cards I wanted
to save for later. It must have been then that I said I love you. I don’t
remember these words leaving my mouth since it had taken considerable
effort to make my lips form them but I do remember her eyes flaring up
and returning the favor. I love you too. I couldn’t believe it􀀀 Such cruel
words of youth􀀀 Such irresponsibility􀀀 It was an outburst of gratitude
poisoned by reckless guarantee􀀀 From the same person – me – who had
often sworn off love as a capitalist conspiracy􀀀
Now I was really screwed. I was also bubbling inside, excited,
appreciative, saved. My whole life was about to change􀀀 Someone loved
me􀀀 And I had said I loved the same person. First􀀀 How monumental􀀀 I
began to dress myself in the suit I had tailored, the one with arms that were
too long but which I rolled up, ready to get down to work, I thought. For
the next few weeks we made plans. We could hardly contain ourselves.
Then, after I spent a few weeks in convalescence after my surgery at the
house I grew up in, where I awoke every morning at seven to my father
screaming obscenities at the employees or pleading with the police
department to let these same employees out on bail before he lost his
house painting business, I was transported back to Woodland and lived
with her and her parents, who are dreadfully decent and considerate
people. M’s parents fed me and she clipped my toenails, took care of the
laundry, the shopping and even wiped my behind when a sudden jolt of
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
191
pain crippled both of my arms on the toilet. She literally showered me with
love and shampooed my hair, scrubbed me. I was doubly embarrassed. She
barely knew me and already knew the worst of me. My physical
incapacitation had structured our lives in exactly the way I had always
wanted to avoid. I made her a caretaker, a homemaker, which she liked, and
I repaid all these efforts in the only way I could, by walking with the dog on
my medically prescribed constitutional and saying those sacred three
words, unaware of the harm I was doing.
When I look at pictures of us from the time, like I’m doing right now,
scrolling through our old shared Flickr account that she never deleted, I
can see the warmth that she beamed me. I also see how I am never looking
directly into the camera when she was the photographer. I’m either eating
from a bag of caramelized pecans, a Christmas gift from her grandparents,
purposefully looking to the side 􀀀perhaps out of vanity to look “more
natural” or “pensive”), or looking just above and beyond the camera when
we did a primitive selfie with M’s large SSLR that was later stolen, along
with our passports, in Barcelona. In the few pictures I have of us together
where I am looking into the camera, it is like the one in front of the Roman
Coliseum, where I am standing like a scared sentinel and she is
broadcasting love and happiness. You see, M was a lovely, kind, strong,
positive woman who loved me and whom I thought I loved. The longer we
were together though, the more it became apparent that I was repeating
structures I had learned growing up.
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
192
My love for M was actually an indebtedness to her seemingly endless
dedication and I felt compelled to repay her affection in a like manner.
From years of empirical evidence, two things seemed to be apparent to me
􀀀without actually being apparent to me􀀀􀀀 first, love is either a tab that
accrues interest or a gift given out of remorse, and, second, it is better to
pay the incurred debt right away in full. After all, debt collectors are
frightening, insistent and irate. They are the ones who, like Monty
Python’s Spanish Inquisition, strike when you’re just trying to enjoy an
afternoon in the park. Now, it seems to me, I believed this without
believing it from years of deception when I told my mother I forgave her
after one of her psychotic alcoholic outrages or whenever I covered up for
my parents when the police knocked on our door, having received a tip􀀀off
from a neighbor that there was a domestic abuse situation that needed to
be investigated. As a child, I was scared of the unknown more than the
dreaded known, of the possibility of having to live in an orphanage or, god
forbid, with my grandmother, and so I would lie and be rewarded. With the
presents my mother promised to buy me 􀀀as long as I didn’t tell my father􀀀
and the warmth every child desires. I had learned like a damned dog in a
laboratory to associate tenderness with explosions.
There was a part of me that knew it was wrong but didn’t know how
to say it. Confused, I knew it was smarter to repay warmth with warmth,
even if feigned, for risk of being accused of ingratitude. If I had the audacity
to not cough up what was owed to my parents in affection, they would
remind me of the debt the family was still in because of the treatment for
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
193
the tendonitis in my knees, a bill they were paying because they loved me. I
had learned that money is an energy without learning how to deal with
corruption.
Then, almost two years after moving to Berlin, M proposed to me in
a club on ecstasy. It was something we had often discussed when we were in
a playful mood and much less rationally inhibited. It made sense legally,
what with the difficulty of visas. Plus her job would provide us both with
health insurance once mine ended with the scholarship and I needed that
in case something happened with my back. We had also often joked that we
had already barreled past a number of intermediate stages of relationships.
She had already cared for my crippled body as if I were aging and senile and
so there would be no surprises, right up till the end. This was comforting
and worrisome. Our relationship was locked into that dynamic and when I
no longer needed hospice we had little in common. Still, feeling the love of
the drug, I accepted her proposal.
This, then, was the first peak in the range of my second phase of
spectatorship, the years when I no longer felt like a protagonist acting in
my own story, just an extra for hire playing a part in another’s. We left the
youthful foothills of stupidity and lack of awareness and entered something
much more perilous. I can only speak for myself but when we moved back
in with her parents to prepare for the wedding, I had decidedly ignored my
own truth. I was far from anagnosis. I repeated the same scene over and
over. I felt the strictures of the straight jacket and every attempt to get out
of it ended as if nothing had happened. When I discovered that M had
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
194
presented me with a truncated version of the guest list for the wedding and
that she had actually invited my racist uncles whom I didn’t want to
celebrate with, I did not froth at the mouth, scream or get angry. I became
catatonic. I was resigned to everything, forgot my motivation and couldn’t
see why we were going to such trouble, our agreed upon reasons to get
married had always been bureaucratic and fiscal. I said that whatever she
wanted would be fine while showing her in countless spiteful ways that this
was far from the truth.
If you live like this, you will veil reality, destroy relations and lose all
sense of power. You will be, in an effect, an idiot or an asshole. I was both.
Even worse􀀀 as the date got closer, I became a better actor. I worked myself
into my role of the groom􀀀to􀀀be. I convinced my brain I was doing the right
thing and the dominating, despotic fear of not being able to be the person
everyone wanted me to be – which they had only formulated since I had
told them I wanted it – stopped me from hearing any of my friend’s cryptic
suggestions that I didn’t have to do anything, that I could just stop this
before I did any more damage. If I did get a whiff of this, I just chalked up
my fear to cold feet, something that countless other happy couples had
gone through, and that when the day arrived I would be ready. I just needed
the stage to play my role more convincingly. There was the occasional flash
of prescience, of knowing that I didn’t identify with my chosen character,
yet I mostly existed in a prolonged dawn of almost, sensing that something
terrible was coming and too afraid to not fulfill my duty or face what was
coming. I was also afraid of hurting M and too blind to realize that by
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
195
staying together only out of a sense of duty, to her and my role, I was only
making matters worse for her and for me and for any sense of justice or
decency I had, if any. We fought like crazy up until a week before the
wedding, when I cut off communication and spent some days in the friend’s
Maybeck concert hall where we would be married – clearing my head,
getting prepared for my most important performance. If we did talk during
those days, there was a part of me thrashing out at the waves, knowing I
was doing the wrong thing, which I expressed through cowardly pettiness.
This person can’t sit at the same table as my uncles􀀀 what do you mean
that the H family is going to cook asparagus, it’s going to be cold and slimy
by the time we eat it. I could argue about all of this for hours. There is
something cruel about rationality, its ability to break down complex
dynamics into pieces that can be individually processed. At this point,
these fights were not trivial though their subject matter was. Their pitch of
urgency was my emotion’s rebellion against my swindled rationality. Days
before the wedding, my body joined the coup. I broke out in hives and the
doctor said it was either syphilis or psychosomatic. The test results were
definitive. It wasn’t syphilis. My body was telling me to stop with its own
intelligence. I didn’t listen, choosing instead to repeat that bastard Beckett
as a mantra, “I can’t go on. I will go on.” My shell was impenetrable, even if
spotted. Besides, I told myself, I couldn’t disappoint all those people flying
in from New York and Germany and Alaska and wherever else. They had all
bought their tickets and were going to come looking for me with pitchforks
if they didn’t stay home. I couldn’t disappoint my parents either. They
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
196
were genuinely happy for me for the first time in forever. I was desperately
scared. And full of rage. Which, on the night of my bachelor party, I took
out on an environmental activist living in a tree on the campus in Berkeley.
I called him a phony and attacked him for paying for his tuition at an
institution investing in weapons with its pension funds. He was complicit􀀀
Oh, brother. Just another fine example of how the critiques we make of
others are often the things we like the least about ourselves.
In any case, I didn’t disappoint anyone. It was a beautiful wedding. M
had planned everything perfectly. Elegant and simple. Homemade and full
of the good spirit of communal effort. Looking at the photos now, I am
amazed at the beauty of the light, the way the Arts 􀀀 Crafts architecture
highlighted the religiosity of the occasion, the laughter in everyone’s eyes
as well as the fear painted across both of our faces. Whether she sensed
what was coming or simply had the appropriate fear for the meaning of the
sacrament is hard to say. If you look at me though, I look tired, distant and
nervous. In some photos you can even make out the small hole I had dug
into the side of my nose when I was showering that morning and had
exfoliated my face until the water was bloody. “I can’t go on, I will go on.”
All the while deforming my face on the one day it would be photographed
more than ever before. I wore makeup that day, like an actor, and you
better believe I complained. Don’t be fooled though – there are a number of
photos where I am, we are, genuinely happy. At the time, I couldn’t have
imagined marrying a better woman.
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
197
“Marriage has a depth and a wisdom, an austere beauty and a logic
we can only get at in poetry… Another way of saying this is that we can
only approach the subject of marriage obliquely. To the mind, this takes the
form of a mystery,” my friend Zeda Samuel, our ordained solemnizer for
the day, says in his pre􀀀vows ceremonial speech, and it continues, “and so
the mind recoils as it will from that upon which it cannot take hold. Fear
and anxiety enter quite naturally here and we are invited either to run
away – which we do, and that’s ok – or to go deeper into the mystery.” I
didn’t go deeper into the mystery. I ran away. But not on that day in front
of all those people. I didn’t think I would live to tell the tale􀀀 This happened
later. After the wedding, when we returned to Berlin. We relived the big day
over and over with friends who couldn’t make it to California and one night
I fell asleep at a screening of the pictures. I just wanted it to be over. And
so, something forced me to decide finally, it would have to be over. Two
and a half months after the wedding, I broke it off. It was a terrible thing to
do and more terrible that I hadn’t done it years before. I had slipped too far
out of the story I wanted to construct, too far into someone else’s. I had
foolishly thought that once the wedding was over that this wasn’t just the
beginning. We had had a different conception of what this would mean and
we weren’t returning to some sort of equilibrium. Compromise is vital in a
relationship as is the necessity to agree on fundamentals, which we didn’t.
She wanted to go back home and have children and I decidedly didn’t – plus
there were the issues of how we interacted with one another. When we
broke up, I told my soon to be ex􀀀wife who was my newly wedded wife that
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
198
she would be much happier with someone else in the role. As far as I know,
she is, and I am happy for her. This wasn’t always true, there were years
where I felt disgusted, idiotic, ashamed and yes, even betrayed. I felt like I
was easily replaceable, that I, as a man, was only a necessary part of the
mechanism, an essential role to get the two children, a house and garden in
California that she always wanted. I didn’t want to live in such a normative
manner and so when I could no longer be cajoled into it, she found
someone else who wanted the same as her. I was hurt, angry and
embittered. At some point, I got over it. In one of the last emails I wrote
her, I said “I’ve always had this feeling that life has somehow dragged me
by the ear and that all of the things that I’ve wanted to do were somehow
disallowed, that it would only mean more pain and strife if I did what I
really wanted. I then had this dual attitude of resigning myself to this fact
by just letting things happen but then I was always resentful to the person
or thing that always seemed to make everything else impossible. I guess
what it boils down to was that I thought I was all very self􀀀aware and
honest with my emotions but in reality I was very unclear. I treated you
poorly… I’m sorry” To which she coolly replied. Good for her.
After she moved back to America, I had the strong sense that none of
this was me. Not that I was possessed by some demon, I just wasn’t the
person I wanted to be. It was not my best self, the person I somehow
believed in. That I could have this faith in myself after everything I had
done was a small miracle. From all the criminals, drug dealers and addicts
I’ve known, they almost all accept life as a given. They’ve seen themselves
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
199
as victims of a system and see life as an inevitability – fate􀀀 providence􀀀 the
moral order􀀀
I don’t want to dispense the myth of the survivor, but I have to
believe that we can make changes, that we can be better attuned with
ourselves and our needs if we are willing to listen and follow through with
the information we receive from the universe. This is not arrogance, this is
faith. A better world must be possible and since we are in the world we are
the ones who must be better. Leaving M and staying in Berlin was my first
major attempt at this. There were no grand proclamations of freedom since
I knew what it took to get there and I regretted hundreds of previous
actions, deeply. I was ashamed of myself.
Shame􀀀 How close you are to my name􀀀 How often they have been
mistaken for one another or playfully strung together, sung to the tune of
Shirley 􀀀 Co.􀀀 “shame, shame, Shane, shame on you…” But no􀀀 Shame. I
am one step beyond you, a full letter, and I no longer want to be crippled by
you.
It is difficult to wade through this fog of shame and reconstruct what
came next as I was shell shocked for a number of years, nevertheless there
actually must have been proclamations of freedom. I was certainly free to
do what I wanted and I must have hoped that something good would come
from my recent decisions, even if I mostly went for long walks at night and
banged my head against my desk, spitefully repeating Beckett. I know I
wanted to begin again and be more responsible to myself and others. I also
know that I failed this on a number of further occasions. I had pulled
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
200
myself out of the game and had no clue what would come next. I had no
rulebook for the way any other game could be played. I spent a lot of time
on Reuterplatz challenging others to ping􀀀pong, a simple back and forth
with brutal closers. I enjoyed spiking the ball to end the game, forever. I
stumbled around with no idea of what a new life could look like, still living
in the negative of what I had denied. I drifted.
And then sunk. I was no longer an actor in my story or anyone else’s.
This was painfully apparent when my beloved Uncle Chris committed
suicide in 2010. I was not in the game or on the sidelines. I was not even in
the arena or country. I could have been named a hundred different things
and never have been further from my family. They were still shocked and
disappointed and angry with my decisions. I had untethered myself and we
never made plans to visit. I couldn’t return to California since the pain and
shame was too great and they didn’t want to come to Germany. And so,
when Chris took his life, his death wasn’t communicated to me. I wasn’t
invited to play a grieving member of the family even though everyone knew
Chris and I had always had a special connection. He was my first friend, the
man who knew how to get through to me and I to him. He was the man who
taught me so much even with his suicide. I learned that no matter what you
do, it has consequences for others.
I had known that Chris was fighting depression and alcoholism from
the reports I would receive on my family’s obligatory yuletide
communications and also from the Facebook chats we shared where he
asked, only days before killing himself, if he could come live with me. I had
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
201
insisted he do that very thing and when I opened my Facebook page to
write him again and see if he had booked his ticket, I received the news. “I
miss you Daddy,” posted by his daughter, my cousin. I saw this almost a day
after his death. I tried to call everyone, got through to no one. I didn’t have
my cousin’s number or my aunt’s or my grandmother’s. When I finally
talked to my mother, she said she hadn’t thought to call me. She was too
busy with her sister. When she finally gave me my aunt’s number, she
warned me she probably didn’t want to speak to me. I called anyway and
when my aunt and I spoke there wasn’t much to say. Other than platitudes
that didn’t match the situation. Chris had done something very
destructive. He had waited for a time when everyone would be out of the
house for an extended period, then took pills and waited to go. When that
didn’t work and he emptied his bowels in the bed, he turned on the car in
the garage and let the carbon monoxide finish him. Before this, though, he
had destroyed the whole house, throwing everything on the ground, broke
windows. The one room he left alone was that of my younger cousin, Jack,
whom Chris always said was just like me. He sent a message with this death,
a disgusting one. That night I had a dream I was living in a beautiful house
with deep red cherry wood shelves in my study and M called my name as I
was sitting behind my desk and I had a gun pressed to my head.
Grief is mysterious and people react in puzzling ways, which is why I
could accept not being notified and not being taken as part of the family. It
was a perfect example that I was no longer present in their lives. What I
couldn’t reconcile, however, was that my family scheduled his funeral for
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
202
the Fourth of July, three days later. It was maddening. Infuriating. Almost
comical. To think he would be buried the same day Americans celebrate the
birth of the nation and I would not be there. My boss at the time assured
me in no soft words that I couldn’t leave on such short notice and expect to
have a position at the language school when I returned. With no money, no
future employment, a job market that was still very thin in the city and no
one who could give me a loan, I would have to grieve, out on the streets,
alone. To my shame, I’ve still never been to his grave to this day. I will.
The following years, all the light that had ripened my eyes
disappeared. I felt like Apollo’s torso, headless and exposed. I would often
read Rilke’s last line, “you must change your life,” and cry like a repentant
sinner. Without guidelines, these words were fireworks that burst and no
more. Life was something that happened to me. It was a carnival ride I
didn’t have the necessary fortune to take part in. Or so it seemed.
Unwilling to ask myself difficult questions, I could find no answers. And
unwilling to face up to my own failures, they didn’t make me want to be
better – or better􀀀 I didn’t want to be better and learn from them. I tanked
into a dark place and just hoped for a better future. With a muddled brain, I
considered myself defeated, still unable to live the way I envisioned. My
confusion slowly molded into cynicism, which is lethal.
It is my belief we all possess the light inside, even if, headless, we
cannot see it. We must learn to live in it and persist even when it is
invisible. Not knowing who to ask to help me put Rilke’s final line into
practice 􀀀and finding no answer on the next page, in the next Rilke poem,
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
203
which celebrated Zeus’ rape of Leda􀀀, I turned to medical practitioners in
2012 and was given their fix􀀀all answer􀀀 a prescription, for antipsychotics,
benzodiazepines and SSRIs. Dizzy from years of spinning in the dark, I
gladly accepted this cathartic cocktail which bubble wrapped my internal
tornado. Now, my problems were even less mine. They were something I
witnessed in faded colors, stuck on spin cycle, behind the washing
machine’s glass window. I just had to wait for the cycle to end – and it did –
but not without effort and gained conviction. My own anagnosis would
come and it would be a renewed appreciation of basketball, meditation and
poetry that would lead me to my own sense of empowerment. I would learn
that when you are fully present, there is no such thing as being passive. As
such, I find no need to condemn spectatorship. We just need to find ways
to keep that level of presence streaming within us.
Before I realized this though, basketball also had to go. Drifting
further from myself, and more into my shell, my love of the game dissolved
like a glacier out at sea. After the first crack in the ice sheet occurred when
I missed the 2005 NBA Finals, I continued watching the game as if nothing
had happened when M and I came to Germany. True, it was painful to
watch healthy bodies move up and down the court when I couldn’t even
carry groceries home but my rock􀀀hard faith in the refuge of sports
endured. It provided a way to enter the presence dimension I was sorely
missing in my life as a bad actor. After awhile, this became increasingly
difficult since, before NBA League Pass came to Europe, there were only
splotchy feeds here in Germany and the games are played in the middle of
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
204
the night. I would try to watch the occasional game from a pirated network
at two in the morning, follow statistics and listen to podcasts. It didn’t
matter. My love of the game broke off and drifted away, leaving without an
explanation. The last game I register watching was the Warriors’ end to the
2010 regular season, the one with Curry and Nelson. I remember this
because it deeply affected me. I was fighting a bout of insomnia and was
amazed by their perseverance as well as disappointed in my lack of it.
Suddenly, it was 2012 and I was thirty. After the psychiatrist’s
chemicals settled in my bloodstream, I filed away basketball as something I
had previously loved like Star Wars. Looking back, I can see another way to
describe the relationship between presence and meaning. No longer
present, very little had meaning. The only thing that brought me into
contact with both was when I read and wrote poetry. As my friend, the poet
CAConrad, says, “I believe in the strength of poetry.” This meant, I was
persevering. My head just didn’t know the light was still there.
A year later, I flew to New York to temporarily escape my submerged
existence in Berlin. I rather randomly brought Dave Hickey’s collection of
essays Air Guitar for the plane. When I got to the “Heresy of Zone
Defense,” I remembered the NBA Playoffs were about to begin. I was
unsure if I would bother watching them. Then, Hickey’s charmed parsing of
the game excited me. Somewhere between Greenland and Newfoundland, it
struck me how much I missed the game, its pace, dimensions and sense of
improvisation. I missed the aesthetics and random statistics announcers
listed, like about a particular left􀀀handed player’s tendency to shoot better
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
205
when his opponent had Aquarius in the ascendant. I was truly excited for
the first time in years􀀀 Reading the “Heresy of Zone Defense,” it became
apparent why basketball had been present for many years beyond my
boyhood love of it.
Basketball is a game that exemplifies an electrifying aspect of social
life. It’s a mode of human togetherness where being in concert, in action, is
of the utmost importance. As Phil Jackson writes in Sacred Hoops􀀀 Spiritual
Lessons of a Hardwood Warrior, “basketball is a sport that involves the
subtle interweaving of players at full speed to the point where they are
thinking and moving as one.” Being in the plural and communicating with
others, basketball allows you to find liberation without resorting to pure
anarchy. Like a learning􀀀play, the lessons it teaches are best learned
through playing but the spectator can still be utilized. All that is needed is
the right approach.
Reading Hickey reintroduced me to this and I am eternally grateful
to him. Although I disagree with his description of basketball as a mere
spectacle we project our desires onto, as well as his claim that the game no
longer educates, his belief that basketball continually demonstrates its
capacity for new beginnings and thus freedom hits nothing but net. Hickey
writes􀀀 “it has always seemed to me that the trick of civilization lies in
recognizing the moment when a rule ceases to liberate and begins to
govern – and this brings us back to the glory of hoops. Because among all
the arts of disputation our culture provides, basketball has been supreme in
recognizing this moment of portending government and in deflecting it, by
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
206
changing the rules when they threaten to make the game less beautiful and
less visible, when the game stops liberating and begins to educate. And
even though basketball is not a fine art – even though it is merely an
armature upon which we project the image of our desire, while art purports
to embody that image – the fact remains that every style change that
basketball has undergone in this century has been motivated by a desire to
make the game more joyful, various, and articulate, while nearly every style
change in fine art has been, in some way, motivated by the opposite
agenda. Thus basketball, which began this century as a pedagogical
discipline, concludes it as a much􀀀beloved public spectacle, while fine art,
which began this century as a much􀀀beloved public spectacle, has ended up
where basketball began – in the YMCA or its equivalent – governed rather
than liberated by its rules.”
This was perfect. It summed up the subterranean issues I had with
Brecht’s didactic dogmatism and it elevated hoops to an ideal form of
governance. Then again, Hickey’s exposition was less than perfect as well.
It suggests only that the binary has been flipped and that art and hoops
have not been or could be recoded to integrate the other. I believe there is
a way to understand the game of basketball as something that teaches and
for the lessons learned to result in more joyful, various and articulate
experiences. Neither pure pedagogy nor pure entertainment, basketball is a
mixture of both, where presence and meaning are united. Or, as Phil
Jackson writes, “inside the lines of the court, the mystery of life gets played
out night after night.”
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
207
Minutes away from landing in America for the first time since I filed
my divorce papers, I had flashbacks of bounce passes. It occurred to me,
again, that basketball is not just a spectacle, it is also a place to learn about
yourself and others. Observing my opponent’s style, their psychological
make􀀀up would become evident – and the opposite is true as well. There are
rude bruisers, flashy movers and me􀀀first ball hogs on playground courts,
in gyms. There are also loud talkers in pickup games who call foul when no
foul has been committed, quiet warriors who let their work speak for them,
nervous nellies expending too much energy on nonsensical moves, lazy
players clapping their hands for the ball even if they don’t have position
and overambitious people not trusting their teammates. People showed
who they were on the court. What is amazing though is that some people
can adjust. Professional players like Michael Jordan and Kobe Bryant
changed their styles dependent on the systems they were in. I wondered􀀀 if
it were possible to change your habits on a team, then couldn’t you shift
these new ways of playing to life off the court as well􀀀 Something was
bubbling.
For those two weeks in New York, I spent every evening in a sports
bar. Sometimes I would just pop in to check on the score before I met with
a poet or attended a reading, and other nights I would sit with the locals
who caught me up on the Knicks’ 2012􀀀13 season and the storylines framing
the playoff picture. As I watched the Los Angeles Lakers beat the San
Antonio Spurs on April 14, 2013 in one of the last games of the regular
season, I was amazed to see that the game had become increasingly
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
208
international. As an “expat” this appealed to me. With players from Africa,
Australia, Europe, Latin America, the US Virgin Islands as well as African
Americans playing in this Lakers􀀀Spurs game, basketball appeared to be a
dazzling Petri dish for practicing coexistence. Even more, I was overjoyed
to witness Hickey’s thesis in action. In the years I stopped religiously
watching the game, it had continued to develop. The players were playing
with more finesse and the game was more articulate, entertaining and
beautiful. Instead of the low􀀀post battles, hand􀀀checks and mid􀀀range
jumpers I remembered from my childhood, the players were moving more
without the ball and some of them had range that was limitless. One night,
somewhere in Williamsburg, I watched the Golden State Warriors play the
Denver Nuggets in the first game of the playoffs. To my great satisfaction,
they were streaming the game from NBA League Pass, which allowed me to
hear the familiar voices of the Warriors’ commentators Bob Fitzgerald and
Jim Barnett. I felt like a boy again. This was the first time both Stephen
Curry and Klay Thompson, the “Splash Brothers,” played in a playoff game
and they lost. Barnett’s comforting voice chalked it up to the jitters. I had
butterflies in my stomach as well. They were different. I was in love.
Like a true prodigal son, I threw myself into the labor of becoming
reacquainted with my familiar territory. I returned to Berlin, stayed up all
night streaming the rest of the playoffs 􀀀even after the Warriors were
eliminated by the San Antonio Spurs in the second round􀀀 and studied the
college careers of Curry and Thompson. I watched YouTube clips and read
every article and blog post imaginable. I even bought a ball and started
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
209
shooting around at my local courts on Hasenheide and Tempelhofer Feld.
To my disbelief, my back seemed strong enough for low􀀀intensity pickup
games and I became engaged with a community of evening ballers. It was
finally spring. And it would only get better. The Warriors would emerge
from the depression of the post􀀀“We Believe” era under the helm of Mark
Jackson and would eventually become something totally inconceivable for
fans who had been raised on this middling to terrible team for decades􀀀 in
2015, they became the NBA Champions for the first time in forty years.
Just how this happened depends as much on administration as
athletics. For anyone who has watched the game in recent years, it is
obvious that the Warriors’ players are some of the greatest ever assembled
on a single team and that their performances are the deciding factor.
Individually they have achieved incredible feats, like Klay Thompson’s sixty
point game where he only dribbled the ball eleven times and had the ball in
his hands for a mere ninety seconds. Yet, the managerial aspect is not
irrelevant. Together, the players and organization changed the team’s
composition and culture. All of this feels predestined in retrospect seeing
as Joe Lacob was informed that his attempt to buy the team was successful
the very day he was taking a helicopter to visit the Oracle of Delphi. It is
almost as if the Gods had wished it.
In a process that has been as fortuitous as charted, the Warriors have
ascended, gradually then at light speed, within a system that accentuates
their stars’ brilliance, who work, individually and as a team, to reach the
highest conceivable dimensions of basketball – and to alter them. The
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
210
Warriors have been lucky on a number of occasions – Stephen Curry was
injured for a number of seasons and so could be locked into a long􀀀term
contract for pennies on the dollar in the market and then there was the cap
space spike in 2016, which made Durant joining the team a reality out of
dreams. Still, they have far exceeded expectations are in the midst of
creating a forward􀀀thinking dynasty. As hyperbolic as this may sound, the
2017 offseason substantiated owner Joe Lacob’s claim that the Warriors are
“light􀀀years ahead” of the competition when more All􀀀Stars changed teams
than ever before and no coach was fired. This was the first time each team
preferred managerial stability over their seasonal medieval phlebotomy
since 1977 when the All􀀀Stars included Julius Irving, Pete Maravich, Rick
Barry and Kareem Abdul􀀀Jabbar. 􀀀Admittedly, this only lasted three games
for the Phoenix Suns􀀀 and not much longer for others􀀀. Now searching for
the right constellation of players who will align with the coaches’
developing styles, every other organization is trying, year in and year out,
to repair their hyperdrives, hoping to outshine the very team that had
remained sublunary since they traded my all time favorite player, Chris
Webber, for clashing with Don Nelson. Which brings us back to the
beginning.
Again, the new Warriors owners fired Don Nelson shortly after the
final game of the 2009􀀀2010 season against the Portland Trailblazers.
Though there are many reasons for this, the conjunction of Nelson’s hell􀀀
bent desire to be the winningest coach in history despite the depleted
roster and his lopsided treatment of players 􀀀praising, for instance, Curry
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
211
above the other players in the final game against the Trailblazers despite
the fact that Monta Ellis also scored thirty􀀀four points and had zero
turnovers􀀀 were emblematic of the me􀀀first, hierarchical culture the new
Warriors organization wanted to decommission. Instead, when Joe Lacob, a
Silicon Valley venture capitalist, and Peter Gruber, a Hollywood film
producer, bought the team from the universally despised Chris Cohan on
July 15, 2010, they set out to create an organizational culture grounded in
collaboration, inclusion, transparency, trust, audacity and grit – all of
which are fundamentals for the startup world Lacob hails from. To do such,
they pressed ctrl alt delete and entered safe mode. They isolated issues
within the operating system then slowly repaired them. After replacing
Nelson with his assistant, an obviously interim Keith Smart, their
subsequent managerial choices would be an alchemical mixture of
established veterans 􀀀such as Jerry “The Logo” West, one of the greatest
basketball players ever and also a vital engineer in designing the lineups of
the championship Los Angeles Lakers teams in the 80s and 00s, who
became an executive board member􀀀 and fresh independents 􀀀such as the
sports agent Bob Myers, who swapped sides at the negotiation table and
was hired as an assistant before being quickly promoted to general
manager􀀀. Together, West and Myers would reconfigure the entire roster.
They would make such incredible acquisitions in the draft, free agency and
trade markets that they seemed to be guided by divination. Through these
channels, they would bring in exceptional players like David Lee, Andrew
Bogut and Harrison Barnes, as well as future cornerstones such as Klay
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
212
Thompson, Andre Iguodala and Draymond Green. Hitting jackpot after
jackpot, it wasn’t tealeaves or Ouija boards that made the team more
complete, it was West and Myers’ selection process guided by an
innovative principle􀀀 “size, then character.”
This maxim pioneered the league’s trend of team building while also
affirming its nascent tendencies. Today, NBA teams are increasingly
devoted to “positionless” basketball, where athletes are expected to be
versatile. Players should be capable of switching on defense as well as
making plays from a variety of spots on the floor. Centers are shooting
threes and point guards are setting off􀀀ball screens. It is a change akin to
the rise of the gig economy. One day you might be building furniture, the
next day writing copy, the next working in a kitchen. In a precarious world,
you need a garage packed with tools even if the garage isn’t yours and you
have to borrow the keys from a friend. With their exceptional skills,
intelligence and athleticism, today’s NBA players are subverting the
traditional roles of the five positions on the court. And to get the
competitive edge in a game where the players slide out of them, the
Warriors have sought tall players. This minimizes mismatches on defense
and creates them on offense. Kevin Durant, a player whose height would
dictate being a center and whose ball handling skills and perimeter
shooting are closer to a guard, doesn’t like being asked about his position.
He invariably answers􀀀 “I’m just a basketball player.” 􀀀For the record􀀀 he’s
listed as a small forward.􀀀
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
213
Old timers will say this court philosophy isn’t all that new. They will
remind us that Jerry West’s sole championship as a player for the 1971􀀀72
Lakers is considered to be the first positionless team in the shot clock era.
They will say that players like Magic Johnson and Scottie Pippen had
expanded these alterations and expectations in subsequent decades. They
will also remind us that culture has always been important in sports. I
would agree. During the Boston Celtics’ eleven championships in the 1950s
and 60s, for instance, this culture was called “Celtic Pride.” The Hall of
Fame Boston Celtic center, Bill Russell, called Celtic Pride a “metaphor for
commitment, team ego, active listening, toughness and tenderness,
craftsmanship, personal integrity, rebounding and resilience, imagination
and collaborative decision􀀀making.” Using a different lingo, these are all
implied in the Warriors’ adoption of Silicon Valley’s organizational
structures. Thus, what the Warriors do isn’t necessarily new. What’s
different today is that the emphasis on culture and positionless basketball
are spreading to the whole league. There are countless teams with players
operating outside of their traditional roles. And when Vlade Divac, the
general manager of the Sacramento Kings, explained why they traded their
superstar center DeMarcus Cousins 􀀀the same player the Warriors would
have drafted had they tanked in 2010 and who joined the Warriors in the
2018–19 season􀀀, Divac said that “culture and character matter.” The
Warriors have adhered to these trends, and their dedication to the
principle “size, then character” is obvious when looking at their 2017􀀀18
roster at the start of the season􀀀 every player is listed as being taller than
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
214
6’6”. The one exception is the only player to remain from Nelson’s
Warriors era􀀀 Stephen Curry.
At the very mortal height of 6’3”, Curry embodies the character West
and Myers were after. Selfless, humble and gritty, Curry is the leader of the
team with the longest tenure. Often the first player on the practice court
and the last one off it, Curry sets the tone for others. It is something that
has drawn other players to the team. As David West, a 2016􀀀17 addition to
the Warriors, told The Athletic, “I value being around intelligent people. I
value being around people who work hard … who are interested in
becoming better everyday.” This attitude can hardly be understated. As
another David, the ex􀀀Warrior, David Lee, told Jack McCallum in Golden
Days, “the number one thing about a franchise being successful is not how
big it is or how much money ownership has. It’s that the max players, the
best players, have to be good􀀀culture guys, great players on the court,
obviously, but they also accept the challenges off the court.” And Curry is
all about the culture.
By focusing on character, the Warriors were shifting the emphasis
from sports’ steadfast obsession with “talent” and “potential.” Other
adjustments to the dark art of scouting had been undertaken before but
most of them had been through statistical analysis, as Michael Lewis’
portrait of the Oakland Athletics, Moneyball, has shown. There is a good
reason to doubt scouting’s witchcraft and its emphasis on potential talent.
Many old scouting reports are as humorous as Y2K apocalyptic visions.
Curry himself is living proof of the scouts’ fallibility􀀀 before being drafted,
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
215
he was scouted as lacking “athletic ability.” Having broken the record for
the most made three point field goals in a season 􀀀272, 2012􀀀13􀀀, then
breaking his own record two seasons later 􀀀286, 2014􀀀15􀀀 and decimating it
the season after 􀀀402, 2015􀀀16􀀀, there should be little doubt that the
“Babyfaced Assassin” possesses incredible ability. These records, though,
were still in the future when the Warriors decided to keep Curry after their
reboot. At the time, Curry was suffering considerable injuries and seemed
an unlikely candidate to ascend the throne of basketball superstardom.
When the Warriors traded Monta Ellis, a player who is the same height as
Curry, played the same position and was even more productive at the time,
instead of Curry, the Warriors organization never gave clear answers. For
fans, this seemed preposterous. It might be that no trade ever came to
fruition with the injury􀀀prone Curry and that the Warriors were able to
procure another important piece for their lineup when they traded Ellis to
the Milwaukee Bucks for the center Andrew Bogut. Still, there is an
unmistakable confluence with Ellis being dismissed and his being sued by a
Warriors’ employee for sexual harassment. It could very well be that by
sticking to their principle “size, then character” the Warriors agreed with
Michel de Montaigne􀀀 “natural inclinations are by institution helped and
strengthened, but they are neither changed nor exceed.”
Enough speculation. The principle “size, then character” is too
precious to waste on salivating boars hungry for rumors. This is because
this principle unearths “the Secret” of basketball. Elucidated in The Book of
Basketball, the sportswriter Bill Simmons maintained that “the Secret” has
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
216
been a vital component of championship teams. Called a secret, it sounds
like an esoteric formula or a map to ancient treasures. In fact, it is a simple
koan that states􀀀 “the secret to basketball is that it’s not about basketball.”
Basketball is about chemistry and relationships. It’s about taking care of
your team and knowing that individual prowess is less important than
being willing to work, together, for a common goal. In other words􀀀
basketball is about character and relationships.
The Secret, which Simmons learned from Hall of Fame guard Isiah
Thomas, is modified by Hall of Fame center Bill Walton in The Book of
Basketball’s epilogue. Walton offers another koan􀀀 the secret is not a secret.
It is a choice. In a world where personal feats and padded statistics
guarantee material success and media attention, players have to choose to
ignore these ego􀀀stroking compensations and dedicate themselves to the
team even if it means they will receive less immediate personal
gratification.
If you are a sports fan, you might be rolling your eyes. Commitment
to the choice is a commonplace among athletes. Nearly every basketball
player applauds their team and promises to communally get better when
they apathetically speak to reporters. Such roted performances only ring
true in those instances where word and deed are united and the teams
exude an enchanting perfume of power, in Arendt’s sense of the word. If
Walton is right that it is a choice, it is an assuredly difficult one to make
and lip service to the choice will never cut it. This is why Walton believes
coaches are so important􀀀 a coach can show you that what matters is
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
217
acting in concert. A coach can lead you to establish relations and create
new realities together. Or, as Phil Jackson writes in 11 Rings, “winning is
about moving into the unknown and creating something new.” And the
only way to do this, Jackson writes, “is to create a culture that empowers
the players and gives them a strong foundation to build upon.”
While the concrete of culture settled in the front office, the Warriors
still needed a coach who would pour it onto the court. Keith Smart swiftly
departed and the Warriors hired Mark Jackson. As a coach, Mark Jackson
became a celebrated defensive strategist with his assistants. He molded the
players into one of the league’s premier defenses and led them to two
consecutive playoffs appearances in 2013 and 2014, the first time the
Warriors had done such since 1992. The Warriors exorcised other demons
in 2014 as well when the team won fifty games 􀀀51W􀀀 for the first time in
twenty years. Following a dramatically disappointing 2011–12 season when
the Warriors did not make the playoffs despite Jackson’s promises to the
contrary 􀀀there are rumors, nevertheless, from ex􀀀assistant general
manager Travis Schlenck, that the Warriors tanked that season to get
Harrison Barnes􀀀, the Warriors seemed to be cruising with Jackson as their
head coach. Then came the unexpected. Jackson was fired after the
Warriors were eliminated in the first round of the playoffs by the Los
Angeles Clippers. It was reported that his “boisterous” personality,
penchant for hierarchies and his us􀀀versus􀀀them mentality did not vibe
with the team’s ethics. Or, as Erik Malinowski writes in Betaball, “in an
organization that sought to encourage dialogue and hold people
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
218
accountable as much as lift them up, Jackson preferred his bubble of
authority, which was well within his rights.” Other basketball aficionados
emphasized that Mark Jackson’s offensive schemes, which other than the
“elevator” relied primarily on isolation plays, did not fully empower the
players and were out of synch with the horizontal model of power the
organization had adopted. Graciously, Lacob tried to minimize the critique
when ESPN interviewed him about the changes. He used the jargon of the
tech world to explain the Warriors’ decision􀀀 “there’s a different CEO that
may be required to achieve success at different stages of an organization’s
success. When you’re a startup company it’s one thing, when you’re a
small􀀀growth company it’s one thing and when you’re a mature company
that’s trying to reach a billion in sales – or in this case win an NBA
championship – perhaps that’s a different person. And we just felt overall
we needed a different person.” That person was Steve Kerr.
And in fact, that person had always been Steve Kerr. Long before he
took the job, Kerr was the coach Lacob always wanted. This may be
surprising. Kerr had no professional coaching experience, although he is
well􀀀known as an ex􀀀player, 􀀀manager, 􀀀team president and –broadcaster.
This is in large part due to his tenacity, clutch performances and sharp
shooting as his intelligence, openness, wit and cool demeanor. Kerr’s
character became clear to the Warriors organization when he showed a
sixteen􀀀page Powerpoint presentation 􀀀entitled “Why I am Ready to Be a
Head Coach”) and detailed the people he planned to hire as assistants
during his job interview. According to Sports Illustrated, this proved to
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
219
Lacob and Myers that Kerr “wouldn’t feel threatened by those around
him.” Kerr fit perfectly into Lacob’s vision of an integrated, inclusive
operation. More importantly, Kerr understood that the team’s culture
would have to be present in every facet of the organization. It could not
just be a stated principle. It had to be lived. And he set out to do such in his
role from the very beginning.
Before training camp began, Kerr flew around the world to establish
a relationship with the players. He applauded their previous work with
Mark Jackson, even in public. According to Malinowski, the players saw
this as “a show of respect” for what they had already accomplished. Still,
Kerr did not intend to simply repeat a successful formula. 51 wins was a
high bar the team would have to jump over. When the players arrived at
the Warriors’ training facility for the 2014􀀀15 preseason, Kerr played a
motivational video for the team that signaled his intentions. It also subtly
hinted at changes he planned to make in terms of the team’s on􀀀court
culture. According to the SF Gate, this video was “preparing the players to
take a step back from individual honors and consider the team as a whole.”
The name of the video􀀀 “Strength in Numbers.”
Never officially released, this initial “Strength in Numbers” video has
remained a ghost in the machine. During his first year in tenure, Kerr often
referred to the video in interviews and journalists mused on its contents as
the Warriors picked up steam. With the best record in the league before the
All Star break, it was obvious that big changes had been made since
Jackson’s departure and that “Strength in Numbers,” which became the
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
220
team’s new motto, had been integral to their success. The video itself was a
question mark. Greedily, I began searching for “strength in numbers golden
state warriors video” and would pan through every Google hit. I would
watch the Warriors’ promotional videos, the keynotes their management
delivered to Silicon Valley firms. I never struck gold. Then, two years later,
Google’s rankings changed. The first hit was suddenly a page detailing the
motto’s creation story. Published after the Warriors won the 2015
championship, the website was a miracle. I opened the page and there it
was. The unreleased video. There was one catch􀀀 it required a password.
More enigmatic than having this page delivered to me after years of
searching was seeing the password directly above the Vimeo link.
Unbelievably, the creator even requested for the video to remain a secret. I
struck it rich and was asked to renounce it. I did. And I will. But not
without first pinching a fingerprint’s worth of gold􀀀 the first sequence of
game􀀀time action is of Andre Iguodala, who hits a corner three and then
runs to his teammates, hugging them, jumping with them, celebrating,
together.
This brief scene would be indicative of the changes Kerr would make.
Days after its initial private screening, Kerr’s first major adjustment would
be to ask Iguodala to move to the second string. Normally a move like this
would be interpreted as a demotion. A former All Star and Gold Medalist at
the Olympics who was still in his prime, Iguodala was one of their best
players. Kerr wanted to start Harrison Barnes to bolster his confidence and
he wanted Iguodala to consider the impact his leadership abilities would
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
221
have on the floor with the second string. Kerr was not asking Iguodala to
step down, he was petitioning him to step up in a new role. He was asking
Iguodala to embrace the team. Fortuitously, Iguodala agreed.
There should be no surprise this came from Kerr. A role player for
his entire career, Kerr knew the positive effects of coming off the bench. He
had performed this role for two of the greatest coaches of he modern era,
Phil Jackson and Gregg Popovich, and had won five championships with
their teams. The awareness of one’s role on the team was not the only
lesson from Kerr’s playing days that he integrated into his approach to
coaching. He also borrowed other experiences and lessons from these
legends, primarily concerning ego􀀀management and establishing a sense of
connectedness.
With his interest in Zen philosophies and Native American Tribes,
Phil Jackson tried to unite his players as a single unit. It is his belief that
“the most effective way to forge a winning team is to call on the players’
need to connect with something larger than themselves.” Gregg Popovich
would not disagree. But whereas Phil Jackson has molded his teams
according to a certain brand of late􀀀hippiedom, Popovich is a military man
with outspoken left􀀀leaning political beliefs and a strong commitment to
diversity. In an interview with ESPN, Gregg Popovich said that what has
made this Spurs so successful are the people they choose to work with􀀀 “we
are looking for character, but what the hell does that mean􀀀 We’re looking
for people … 􀀀who􀀀 have gotten over themselves and you can tell that
pretty quickly. You can talk to someone for four or five minutes, and you
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
222
can tell if it’s about them, or if they understand they’re just a piece of the
puzzle. You’ve got to be able to laugh. You’ve got to be able to take a dig,
give a dig – that sort of thing. And 􀀀you have to􀀀 feel comfortable in your
own skin.” Gregg Popovich and the San Antonio Spurs have also been a
model for the Warriors’ general manager, Bob Myers, who keeps the
following quote of Popovich on his phone􀀀 “a synergy has to form between
the owner, whoever his president is, whoever the GM is, whoever the coach
is. There’s got to be a synergy where there’s a trust. There 􀀀are􀀀 no walls.
There is no territory. Everything is discussed. Everything is fair game.
Criticism is welcome, and when you have that, then you have a hell of an
organization. That free flow through all those people is what really makes it
work. And that includes everything from draft to Os and Xs. Nothing
should be left to one area – only to the president, only to the GM, only to
the coach – or the culture just doesn’t form. At least that’s what’s worked
for us.􀀀
While Jackson and Popovich have different styles, personalities and
methods, they both have developed systems that integrate the players into
a whole. In other words􀀀 they are both coaches who understand the
importance of the Choice and of helping the players to make it. Now at the
helm, Kerr was asking a rather strong Warriors’ team to do the same.
Iguodala was on board and there were only a few other issues to be
addressed.
With his assistant Ron Adams picking up where Mark Jackson’s
defensive crew left off, Kerr set out to retool the Warriors’ offense.
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
223
Borrowing strategies from the famous coaches he had worked with and for
– such as Lute Olsen, Phil Jackson, Gregg Popovich, Cotton Fitzsimmons,
Jerry Sloan and Mike D’Antoni – Kerr established a system that would
integrate all the players. Put simply, his answer was passing. It is the one
statistic they continually track and their goal is for the team to complete
300 passes per game. When they do, they often win. Passing, Kerr believes,
makes every player part of the action. It empowers the players and
disallows them from being passive spectators while the star players go to
work. It also subverts the traditional roles and is an integral feature in
positionless basketball.
An illustration from the Warriors game against the Kings on January
9, 2015􀀀 Curry dishes the inbound pass to Livingston near the half court
line and then runs through the middle of the court, gets a screen from
Green, who steps back behind the three point line, takes the pass from
Livingston and rockets the ball to Curry who has cut past the basket and
back. Curry takes a shot that doesn’t go in and Bogut tips the ball, once,
twice, thrice, four times and finally secures the rebound. He quickly brings
the ball back to the top of the key, tosses a pass to Thompson at the wing
who passes to Curry and then sets a screen for Curry. Curry barrels
towards the basket then passes behind the back to Green at the top of the
three􀀀point line. Green passes to Thompson at the wing who is suddenly
double teamed. He rockets the ball again to Curry who has moved his way
to the corner. Curry catches, shoots and hits the open three. As Jim
Barnett said, “if you watched everything that just happened there, it’d have
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
224
to put a natural smile on your face. The way they moved it. Beautifully
done.”
Constantly moving and passing, the Warriors’ style of play has the
appearance of anarchy. There are very few set plays and they overturn
decades of basketball wisdom that primarily employs isolation plays, pick􀀀
and􀀀rolls and post􀀀ups 􀀀they also turn the ball over a lot􀀀. Doing away with
these conventions, Kerr has often been characterized as a revolutionary, an
amicable enfant terrible. As McCallum writes, “the offense had turned
Curry into a sensation, Thompson into an all􀀀star, Green into an unlikely
all􀀀around playmaker, and Kerr into a genius.” While the media puts him
on a pedestal, Kerr constantly tells the truth about where he acquired his
knowledge and does not give the appearance of being born in a vacuum. He
gives credit to his mentors, predecessors and the players. He is aware that
without the individual brilliance of Leandro Barbosa, Harrison Barnes,
Andrew Bogut, Stephen Curry, Festus Ezeli, Draymond Green, Justin
Holiday, Andre Iguodala, Ognjen Kuzmic, David Lee, Shaun Livingston,
James Michael McAdoo, Brandon Rush, Maurice Speights and Klay
Thompson, the 2015 championship would never have been possible – and
the same goes for the following years and the rosters on those teams. He
makes no claim of being a revolutionary or genius. He is the wise􀀀ass clown
of an Elizabethan Tragedy who tells the truth no one wants to hear. For the
most part, the media has decided not to listen. There’s no story in someone
who constantly deflects attention away from his person, which would
explain why there have been no substantial books written about Gregg
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
225
Popovich. If Kerr didn’t want to be a genius, they would turn him into one.
They would stuff him up in the likeness of a basketball messiah. Following
this logic, they will also, eventually, have to make him an effigy.
I believe there is a way to start from the media’s premise without
reaching their flaming conclusion. Kerr is brilliant, just not for the reasons
the press attributes to him. Kerr should be respected for the system he
implemented for his remarkable players. He should be respected even more
for uniting words and deeds. In his own life, he shows that “Strength in
Numbers” is not only a slogan, it is a way of living. He empowers his team
to find their light inside and asks them, like Rilke, to change their lives.
Warriors’ Four Core Values. Take Four.
After the press’ infatuation with the Warriors’ “Strength in
Numbers” motto during the 2014􀀀15 season, reports surfaced at the
beginning of the 2015􀀀16 season about Kerr’s peculiar locker room
philosophy. To find their strength in numbers, Kerr had urged the players
to operate according to the values of joy, mindfulness, compassion and
competition. I repeat􀀀 Kerr’s four core values for the Golden State
Warriors are joy, mindfulness, compassion and competition.
Imagine the sports world’s confusion. Kerr was not asking the
players to fit into the stereotype of a tough guy􀀀 he was modeling the team
on something from a yoga class 􀀀Kerr also asked the players to do yoga􀀀.
Some journalists didn’t understand what these values had to do with
basketball. Others asked more damning questions. Are they just another
instantiation of Silicon Valley infiltrating the Warriors’ locker room􀀀 Or
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
226
are they, the basketball aficionados asked, another tactic Kerr had pilfered
from Phil Jackson􀀀 Neither of these questions or their conclusions are
wrong necessarily. Yet they fail to give credence to the potential of Kerr’s
four core values. While it is true that Jackson emphasized compassion as a
fundamental aspect of building teams in Sacred Hoops and even writes
about the other values in high esteem, Kerr and Jackson have different
approaches. Drawing inspiration from the Lakota people and Zen
Buddhism, Jackson’s primary goal is to have the players act
compassionately within the dimensions of the court. Jackson, in other
words, is someone who believes in the refuge of sports. When he was the
head coach of the Chicago Bulls in the 1990s, he even decorated the Bulls’
practice facilities with artifacts from Native Americans. His stated aim was
to create a sanctuary for the players, away from the concerns of the world.
To preserve this sanctity, he disallowed players from bringing their family
members on road trips. He even kicked Jerry West out of a meeting when
both were working for the Lakers since he considered him a “ball boy,” an
outsider. In contrast, Kerr welcomes staff, journalists and family members.
He remembers how special it was to take his son on the road with him
when he was playing for Popovich in San Antonio. Kerr is someone who has
integrated these opposing lessons and structures from Jackson and
Popovich, and does not want basketball to be separate from the world.
As Kerr told the Positive Coaching Alliance, these four core values
should help the players “get better in a lot of different ways” – both on and
off the court. In other words, Kerr intends for these values to be part of a
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
227
life practice. They should help the players create richer, more articulate
and beautiful experiences. By doing such, Kerr confirms that the secret
isn’t a secret but a choice. He is asking them to choose to live more
joyfully, mindfully, compassionate and competitive. Basketball really isn’t
about basketball. It’s about choosing to live in the world.
Kerr has stressed the incredible power of the human connection as
well as the willingness to work for a common goal if you know someone is
trying to help you in his interview with the Positive Coaching Alliance. As a
guard who came off the bench for almost every game in his professional
career, Kerr was familiar with the importance of fulfilling a role for a team
and the way he coaches is the totality of his experience􀀀 “I try to keep
things consistent with who I am … it has to be incorporated into my own
personality.” And since, as Emerson said, the force of character is
cumulative, I’d like to now shove the self􀀀effacing coach of the Warriors
into the fore. Kill the floodlights􀀀 Spotlight􀀀
Characterized by dramatic spikes, Steve Kerr’s early career can be
read like a cardiogram of someone engaged in heavy lifting. Born on
September 27, 1965 to two American academics in Beirut, Lebanon,
Stephen Douglas Kerr grew up in Beirut, Cairo and Los Angeles as a
baseball and basketball enthusiast. He attended the University of Arizona
on a basketball scholarship but his first year under Lute Olson’s tutelage
was overshadowed by the assassination of his father, Malcolm H. Kerr,
outside of his office at the American University of Beirut on January 18,
1984. Notified of the tragedy in the middle of the night, Kerr chose to use
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
228
basketball as a refuge and played against his team’s rivals, the Arizona
State Sun Devils, two nights later, scoring twelve points. Although he would
later tell the New York Times “it was cathartic for me just to play,” Kerr’s
ability to use basketball as a refuge would almost be revoked when he tore
his right knee’s MCL and ACL in a USA Basketball game in 1986. Told that
he would never play again, this would turn out to only be a short interlude,
an interval as the ventricles filled, and he returned to the court nine
months later, setting an NCAA record for best three􀀀point field goal
percentage in a single season in 1987􀀀88. This phase of rarefaction was
followed by compression when he discovered the delicacy of using
basketball as a refuge on February 25, 1988. Playing the rival Arizona State
again, some dozen Sun Devils’ fans began heckling him before the game
and chanted “PLO” 􀀀Palestine Liberation Organization􀀀, “your father’s
history,” and “why don’t you join the Marines and go back to Beirut􀀀”
Deeply upset, Kerr had to take a moment to gather himself. Then,
according to his own admission, he played vindictively, a rarity for him,
and hit all six of his three pointers, finishing the game with twenty􀀀two
points. With a desire to silence the crowd, he played a strong game and
would continue to do such for the final two games of the season as well as
during the beginning of the NCAA competition before entering a trough
when he shot two for twelve in the 1988 Final Four against Oklahoma, the
worst game of his young career. Emerson􀀀 “the voyage of the best ship is a
zigzag line of a hundred tacks.”
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
229
This lackluster finish didn’t prevent him from being drafted by the
Phoenix Suns in 1988 but his professional career would continue to wildly
fluctuate until he was signed to the Chicago Bulls in 1993. Changing to
another new team, Kerr began to see the game differently. As he explains in
his foreword to Jerry Lynch’s Let Them Play􀀀 The Mindful Way to Parent
Kids for Fun and Success in Sports, “for many years as a professional player,
I was a wreck. I would hear the fans’ jeers, read journalist jabs and succumb
to an opponent’s trash talk. I fashioned myself as poised and fearless but
the truth is I was vulnerable.” This would change when Phil Jackson and his
coaching staff introduced him to Jerry Lynch, Jon Kabat􀀀Zinn and Timothy
Gallwey, and Kerr learned to “focus my effort on the only thing that
mattered – my own play.”
Achieving this, Kerr’s spikes would reach new heights and level off at
the top for many years to come. Even after Michael Jordan returned to the
Bulls in the 1995􀀀96 season after a twenty􀀀month leave of absence and
punched Kerr in the face at practice, this black eye would not cause
another dip or make him more vulnerable􀀀 it earned Kerr the respect of the
greatest player on earth for not backing down. This was evident in Game 6
of the 1996 Finals when Jordan knew he was going to be double teamed and
told Kerr to be ready to make the game winning shot if need be. He was and
he did and the Bulls won the championship and would pick up two more in
the following two seasons.
Kerr’s extended high plain continued even after he was traded to
Gregg Popovich’s San Antonio Spurs and this potential trough became an
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
230
unexpected continuation of the apex when the Spurs won the
championship in 1998. Kerr became one of only two players in NBA history
to have four consecutive championships aside from the players on the
Boston Celtics in the 1960s but his wave would seem to compress and move
towards equilibrium when he was traded to the Portland Trailblazers in
2001. Resembling the beginning of his career’s wild oscillations, the end of
his career dipped and then peaked again when he was traded back to the
Spurs for the 2002􀀀03 season and he earned another ring. This was the
same year Kerr came off the bench and spurred the team to victory in
Game 6 of the 2003 Western Conference Finals. With a career three􀀀point
average of 45.4 percent, he retired as the greatest three􀀀point shooter in
the history of the game, in terms of conversion rate, and then turned to
journalism and basketball management.
Kerr’s career as a player had always been testament to his focus and
competitive spirit but just how fundamental the notion of nurturing your
ecology was to his understanding of basketball would only become explicit
through his writing. In an article for Grantland where he focused on
creating “better basketball􀀀life􀀀social􀀀teamwork” experiences, Kerr spelled
out the importance of players staying in college for more than a year – not
only because it would benefit the league but because players should get an
education, develop as individuals and learn the importance of teamwork􀀀
“that’s the single most important part of a player’s development and we
ignore it like it doesn’t matter – basic foundation points like learning how
to commit to a team, embracing the unity of the group, trusting your
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
231
teammates, and working within a larger framework.” The argument for
Kerr was not based on hypotheticals or an ethical dictum that would deny
anyone from impinging upon the rights of legal adults􀀀 it was based on the
benefits of maturity he had seen in his own life and history.
Having experienced the joy of five championships, learning the
power of mindfulness with the Bulls, expressing his convictions on
compassion in his writing and exhibiting his competitive spirit during his
entire playing career, Kerr would deliver these messages to his players as a
coach and would become one of the most successful coaches in history at
the beginning of his career. The accolades are dizzying􀀀 67 wins and a
championship his first season, a record 73 wins his second season 􀀀a record
he had previously held as a player on the 95􀀀96 Bulls when they had 72
wins􀀀, 67 wins and a second championship in his third season and 58 wins
and a championship in his fourth season. Kerr often pays tribute to Mark
Jackson for establishing the fundamentals for the Warriors but it is
undeniable that he was able to take their strengths to new levels. “There is
no proven formula to produce a great coach,” the Bulls sportswriter Sam
Smith suggests, “though there generally is one trait common to all the
great ones, which is an ability to communicate, a mastery of human
understanding without any training or degree, a concern for individuals
amidst the harsh demands and generally a wry outlook on their crazy
world.” Having studied under some of the best coaches in the history of the
game 􀀀Phil Jackson, Gregg Popovich, Lenny Wilkens, Cotton Fitzsimmons
and Lute Olsen􀀀, Kerr learned that the most important thing is to be
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
232
yourself. And as he has taught the rotating cast of the Warriors the four
core values, he continued to embody them himself.
December 15, 2016 wasn’t only the night Steph Curry honored the
victims of the Ghost Ship fire with his shoes. That day the legendary
sideline reporter Craig Sager had also passed away. A good friend of Kerr
and part of the NBA family, it would have made sense to honor Sager with
a moment of silence. But Kerr announced to Oakland’s Oracle Arena that
Sager wouldn’t like to be remembered with stillness. Known as much for his
ostentatious suits as his cheer, Sager never let himself be discouraged
during a two􀀀year long battle with leukemia. He believed that “the way you
think influences the way you feel and the way you feel determines how you
act.” Staying positive and active until the end, Sager asked when being
awarded the Jimmy V Award for Perseverance􀀀 “what is time really􀀀 Do
you count each hour or see each day as a blessing􀀀 Time is not something
that can be bought, it cannot be wagered with God and it is not in endless
supply. Time is simply how you live your life.” After listing a number of
things Sager loved and telling anecdotes about the time Kerr spent with
him as a broadcaster, Kerr determined it would be more appropriate “given
the way Craig lived his life and the joy he brought to so many people to
have a moment of joy” instead. Kerr then asked the entire Oracle Arena to
join him in applauding “a great man and a life well lived” and the whole
place erupted.
Living your life well includes exuding joy but also being focused on
the present, something which doesn’t come natural to the highly cerebral
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
233
Kerr. Although he had demonstrated his ability to get into the zone as early
as the game in Arizona in 1988, it is my belief that he has only reached the
level of consciousness that Bill Russell spoke of since becoming a coach. On
March 5, 2017, he demonstrated the collective aspect of being conscious,
that in the zone “you know the other players,” when he gave Steph Curry a
pep talk on the bench. Curry was going through a shooting slump and Kerr
reminded him that it didn’t matter, he was making an impact on the game
anyway, his plus􀀀minus numbers were through the roof. Kerr encouraged
him to just stay locked in and when the Warriors came back from the
intermission between halves, Curry scored fifteen points in the third
quarter. Fully aware of his star player’s shooting struggles meddling with
his self􀀀perception, Kerr stepped in, told him to focus on his efforts and
helped Curry press the delete button.
But pressing that button and being conscious doesn’t always mean
stepping in. Sometimes it means precisely the opposite – it requires
consciousness to tell the difference. When Kerr’s back problems were
affecting his ability to stay in the moment, he decided to leave the coaches’
bench during the playoffs. Telling reporters that he did not want to create a
distracting narrative, he chose to remain away from his dream job during
the most exciting and crucial time of the season so that his players could
focus on the task at hand and he could work on returning to full health,
which is more important than basketball. As part of the Warriors’ ecology,
it only made sense to remove himself until he could further investigate the
causes of his headaches and nausea. After a procedure afor a leakage of
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
234
spinal cord fluid, he slowly reintegrated himself into the daily life of the
Warriors, showing up at practice and then the stadium before taking over
the head coaching duties in the second game of the Finals. By doing such,
Kerr demonstrated that nurturing your ecology does not mean valuing
winning above your own wellbeing. Nurturing your ecology means taking
care of yourself and the others around you.
Life is bigger than basketball is a mantra Kerr constantly repeats,
which is why his true competitive nature isn’t best exemplified by the
games against the Sun Devils or the skirmish with Michael Jordan. Instead,
it is his readiness to fight for what he believes in when the opportunity
presents itself. This is something he inherited from his family. While his
grandparents, Stanley E. Kerr and Elsa Kerr, were missionaries for the Near
East Relief during the Armenian Genocide in Central Anatolia and worked
at orphanages in Lebanon, his father and mother picked up the baton.
Malcolm E. Kerr shifted the emphasis to scholarly discourse on Middle
Eastern politics before his untimely death and Ann Kerr is the Fulbright
Coordinator for UCLA, and had previously accompanied high school
students to study in the Middle East. Another pass of the baton was made
to the next generation and Steve’s three siblings have worked in British
politics, America’s National Security Council and Third World agricultural
economics. By all appearances, Steve would seem to be apolitical in
comparison, sticking to the refuge of basketball, away from the problems of
the world. But as his older brother John Kerr, a professor of Community
Sustainability at Michigan State, told the New York Times, Steve is
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
235
“carrying out the family business in another discipline.” Although politics
was suppressed in the NBA for a long time after the Civil Rights movement,
Kerr opposed the Iraq War after 9􀀀11 and consequently fell out of favor in
Texas while playing in San Antonio. Now with Adam Silver welcoming the
opinions of coaches and players, Kerr has spoken openly about his belief
that people should show respect for one another, especially in the realm of
politics. Shortly after the 2016 election, Kerr analyzed our current political
situation at a press conference􀀀 “people are getting paid millions of dollars
to go on TV and scream at each other, whether it’s in sports or politics or
entertainment, and I guess it was only a matter of time before it spilled into
politics. But then all of a sudden you’re faced with the reality that the man
who’s going to lead you has routinely used racist, misogynist, insulting
words. That’s a tough one. … It’s tough when you want there to be some
respect and dignity, and there hasn’t been any.”
Voicing his disapproval of the current president, Kerr has
consistently spoken up in an attempt to shape reality and emphasized that
he is against the culture of hatred that is currently being proliferated from
the highest seat in the nation. He has done this, like all things, because they
are integral to his identity.
This extended consideration of Kerr’s career in relationship to his
four core values is not to suggest that he is a priest telling the world how it
should definitively be or that he is a calm Bodhisattva. Although he has
united word with deed and used words, as Arendt suggests, not to veil
intentions but to disclose realities and not committed deeds to violate and
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
236
destroy but to establish relations and create new realities, he’ll still karate
chop through a clipboard or get a technical for arguing with the refs. Yet,
this is always done to get his team back on track, to nurture their ecology.
Emerson again􀀀 “goodness must have some edge to it, – else it is none.” In
fact, Kerr is much more porous than our normal depiction of the holy or
leaders. He may believe it is important for every player to be involved in
the game and to have the ball in their hands during possessions since magic
happens when everyone is involved, but he was willing to abandon his
prescriptions when Mike Brown suggested the Warriors should exploit the
Curry􀀀Durant pick and roll during Game 5 of the Finals. Listening to
Brown’s suggestion, the Warriors ran the play more often that game than
they had the entire regular season. As decisive as that was for their victory,
it also illustrates two crucial aspects of Kerr’s outlook and personality􀀀
everyone has a voice, and as a member of an ecology, you sometimes have
to relinquish control.
The ability to rely on spontaneity, intuition and to listen to others
requires trust. But trust is not the same as confidence. Following Isabelle
Stengers, confidence takes the current situation as a given and concedes all
authority to it while trying to find a solution to a problem. Game 4 of the
2017 Finals is a perfect example of this. We were confident that we would
win from the fact that we had won three games in a row against the
defending world champions. Ad we lost. In contrast, trust doesn’t accept
the current situation as an authority, it puts more faith in the ability to find
a solution in the face of whatever will come. This is what we demonstrated
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
237
during Game 5 when the Cavaliers played almost as brilliantly as they had a
game before but we continued to find solutions to the problems we were
facing, including running the Curry􀀀Durant pick and roll. In this game, we
made the leap of faith into our own capabilities and those of our teammates
and the trust paid off.
Trust is fundamental for an active participation in the world and
implies being fluid, not ruled by what compulsively regulates all of life
through reason. This is not an indictment against cognitive faculties but a
demand for using them in a world that doesn’t always match up to our pre􀀀
established categories. “We do not need a totality to work well,” as Donna
Haraway writes, we need only a reliable map and a dependable compass if
we’re on a journey. For me, Kerr’s four core values are reliable coordinates
to navigate through the world. They are not a GPS system that dictates
where to turn and when but a way to survey the landscape, an indication of
whether I have kept moving in the right direction or have walked astray.
Should the needle point to all four directions at once, then one of Heiner
Müller’s utopian moments has been reached and it is my belief that with
more practice they can become more consistent.
At the time these four core values were released in November 2015,
Kerr was only a spectator of the team. Experiencing complications from a
botched back surgery, the pain kept him off the bench. Nevertheless, he
was an active participant in the team’s daily routines. He continued to live
these principles and empowered others to do the same. As Klay Thompson
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
238
said at the time, “we want to continue doing those four things.” And I
wanted to begin.
I wanted to understand how Kerr had semantically retooled these
values to fit them to the court. I wanted to understand whether they meant
the same thing on the court as off the court and whether his interpretation
could be used by spectators. I wanted even more to know whether I could
live according to these values. I worried that my character record was too
damning. Yes, I had decided that I’d had enough of the life that I had lived
and was willing to change but could I move on from the suffering􀀀 The one
I had been on both sides of􀀀 My mother had often said “hurt people hurt
people” and I hoped that you could switch out the adjective and verb. Could
it be that “healing people heal people􀀀” Or would it have to be in the past
tense of the adjective􀀀
At the time, it occurred to me that Kerr’s interpretation of these
values for his players led to something akin to Brecht’s utilized spectator
but with an essential distinction. Uniting these four core values, even while
watching basketball, does not lead to distanciation and a critical notion of
spectatorship. It is an empathetic practice that utilizes our plurality and
freedom and nudges us to what David Foster Wallace suggested in This is
Water that “the really important kind of freedom involves attention, and
awareness, and discipline, and effort, and being able to really care about
other people and to sacrifice for them, over and over, in a myriad petty
little unsexy ways, every day.” It is a practice that helps to unite presence
and meaning and as such makes life, for me, worth living.
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
239
The release of these values couldn’t have found me at a better
moment. I had been off the medication for a year and a half and was fresh
in love. I had met my new partner when we were both performers in one of
her brother’s pieces and I had been drawn to her immediately – to the point
that I had begged the organizers of the piece not to let us work together.
When the piece was over and we finally came together, I began to feel
things I had kept under the tight wraps of the shell for years. With the
support of Melanie and the meditation practice she introduced to me, I felt
strong enough to face life’s challenges. I was no longer willing to retreat.
The light was in my eyes and I had the desire to unite word and deed. By
admitting to my time on the bench, I only want to suggest that if I can get
back in the game, then everyone else can as well. If we choose to, we can all
take part in the action.
Learning this has given me hope. Hope that we can learn strategies
to stop ignoring reality and be present. Hope is not the blanket term abused
in the last decade but a methodology based on the four core values of joy,
mindfulness, compassion and competition. Hope, then, has nothing to do
with confidence, sitting on the bench and believing that the world is what it
is and always will be and that if you just pray enough, the pearly gates will
open. Hope has to do with trust, with our belief that we can correct the
mistakes we’ve made in the past and shape the world into the one we want
to live in. Hope comes off the bench and makes an impact where it can. We
have too long given into philosophy’s method of doubt, which judges
everything skeptically until it can be affirmed by our other beliefs. Like
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
240
inventors and artists and activists have done for centuries, a method of
hope leaps into the unknown and loves its possibilities. For some reason we
forgot that, as Plato said, philosophy begins in wonder, not in cynicism. We
have also forgotten that life begins in wonder as well. Observing a baby’s
excitement at even the simplest of things is proof enough for me. To live in
wonder and not fear has been the way of poets as well, which is the real
reason why Plato should not banish them from the kingdom. Poets have
not given in to skepticism and focused solely on judgment, they continue to
soak in the world around them. Living like this is difficult, but everything
that is worth it is.
Now that this extended preseason is coming to a close, I would like
to thank my coaches – my partner, Melanie Sehgal, my mother, Stephanie
Anderson, my meditation teacher, Yashi Kunz, my best friend, Luciano
Chessa, my deceased uncle, Chris Lacroix, and Coach Kerr. Ideally, the
relationship between teacher and student or coach and player is reciprocal
and rewarding for both and it is necessary that each person be willing to
reach out towards the other in their different roles. The activist, educator
and writer, bell hooks, takes the term “role” seriously and has proposed
that teachers are performers, not “in the traditional sense of the word in
that our work is not meant to be a spectacle. Yet it is meant to serve as a
catalyst that calls for everyone to become more and more engaged, to
become active participants in learning.” What learning means differs from
situation to situation but for our current purposes the words of the head
coach of the Seattle Seahawks, Pete Carroll 􀀀who also happens to be a
Shane Anderson – After the Oracle
241
mentor to Kerr􀀀, are delightful􀀀 “we help players develop a vision of who
they want to be, of their best selves, and get them to agree to that vision.
Our job is then to keep that vision in front of them and to prove to them
that they can become the best version of themselves.” As for the students,
they must have an idea of who they would like to be and approach this with
vigilance and humility.
In the Zen tradition, there are stories about would􀀀be bratty monks
who refuse to wash the floorboards or sweep the stairs because these tasks
are too worldly and not fit for someone seeking enlightenment. When the
student decides to stay, he has to sweep the stairs anyway. Years pass and
nothing happens. He is tired of menial labor, indignant at his master for
not revealing the secret to enlightenment. Throwing down his broom, he
storms towards his master and brazenly demands the key. His master slaps
him and he achieves satori, awakening – and laughs. Which is to say􀀀
wisdom can be achieved, even instantaneously, but we must be willing to
do the work.
And so, here we are, the players, in the world. There’s no one on the
bench and we’re down by ten but there’s still some time on the clock. Let’s
make magic together.
